Summary
What is the purpose of this Privacy Policy?
Who controls your personal data
The legal basis for using your personal data
The personal data the Club holds about you and how we use your personal data
Sharing personal data with third parties
Change of Purpose
Automated Decision-Making and profiling
Data Security
How long will the Club keep your information for?
Your legal rights
Children under the age of 16
Data Protection Officer
Changes to this Privacy Policy
Service providers & Official Partners
Summary of Privacy Policy
What is the purpose of this Privacy Policy?
This Privacy Policy tells you about the personal data we collect and what we do with it.
Further details in Section 1
Who controls your personal data?
Your personal data is controlled by Aston Villa Football Club Limited and / or Aston Villa Foundation and/or Aston Villa Women’s Football Club Limited.
Further details in Section 2
What is the legal basis for using your personal data?
We may use your personal data for a number of reasons. In particular:
to perform a contract with you;
because we have a legitimate interest to do so;
because you have agreed (consented);
to comply with the law.
Further details in section 3
What personal data does the Club hold about you and how do we use it?
We collect a variety of personal data in connection with:
your registration and use of our websites or mobile applications;
any products or services provided by the Club that you purchase or use;
any marketing preference you have given to us;
any visit to our premises;
any other communication you may have with us.
Further details in section 4
Who do we share your personal data with?
We may share your personal data with third parties, including:
our service providers;
other companies within our group;
law enforcement agencies;
other football clubs;
Official Lions Clubs;
certain other third parties; and / or
where required by law
Some third parties that we share personal data with may be based outside of the United Kingdom.
Further details in section 5
Will we change the purpose for which we process your personal data?
We only use your personal data for the purposes we collected it for or for another reason compatible with that purpose.
Further details in section 6
Do we operate automated decision making?
No. We do not operate automated decision making, but some third parties we work with may do (for example, for season ticket financing).
However, we do carry out profiling. See the next question below and Section 7 for more information.
Further details in Section 7
Do we carry out profiling?
Yes. We use specialist data providers to provide us with profile information about our supporters. We use this to better understand our supporters and influence the way we communicate with them.
You are entitled to object to us carrying out this profiling using your personal data. If you wish to object, you can contact the Club at
dpo@avfc.co.uk
or using the postal address details given in section 2.
Further details in section 7
What security measures do we put in place?
We have put in place appropriate security measures to prevent your personal data from being accidentally lost, used or accessed in an unauthorised way, altered or disclosed.
Further details in section 8
How long will we keep your information for?
We only retain personal data for as long as necessary to fulfil the purposes it was collected for.
Further details in section 9
What are your legal rights
You have a number of legal rights in relation to personal data, including the rights to request access, correction and / or erasure and to object to certain processing.
Further details in section 10
What about children under 16?
We expect parents and guardians to supervise their children when they access the Club’s websites, mobile applications and other services provided by the Club.
Further details in section 11
Does the Club have a Data Protection Officer?
Yes. You can contact the Club’s DPO at
dpo@avfc.co.uk
or using the postal address details given in section 2.
Further details in section 12
What about changes to this Privacy Policy?
We may change this Privacy Policy from time to time. Please check back for updates.
Further details in section 13
What is the purpose of this Privacy Policy?
Aston Villa Football Club Limited, Aston Villa Women’s Football Club Limited and Aston Villa Foundation (together “
the Club
”) are committed to protecting the privacy and security of your personal data.
This Privacy Policy aims to give you information on how the Club collects and processes your personal data through your use of the Club’s websites and / or other services.
The Club’s websites and services include:
the Club’s Official Website at
avfc.co.uk
;
the Club’s VillaTV channel
the Club’s Event Website at
www.villaparkstadium.com
the Club’s Ticket Office (online at
tickets.avfc.co.uk
, via phone or in store at the Ticket Office, Villa Park);
the Club’s Official Mobile Application;
the Club’s official social media channels (including, for example, Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, YouTube, LinkedIn, Sina Weibo, YouKu, AudioBoo, Google+).
It is important that you read this Privacy Policy together with any other privacy policy, statement or fair processing notice we may provide on specific occasions when we are collecting or processing personal data about you so that you are fully aware of how and why we are using your personal data. This Privacy Policy supplements any other notices we provide and is not intended to override them.
Back to top
Who controls your personal data
There are three different legal entities within the Club’s group of companies that process personal data:
Aston Villa Football Club Limited (Company Number 03375789)
Aston Villa Foundation (Company Number 08589263; Charity Number 1152848)
Aston Villa Women’s Football Club Limited (Company number 08414046)
This Privacy Policy is issued on behalf of these companies so when we mention "
the Club
", "
we
", "
us
" or "
our
" in this Privacy Policy, we are referring to the relevant company in the Club’s group that is responsible for processing your personal data.
Which company controls your personal data will depend on the way you interact with the Club or the services you are using. In most cases, Aston Villa Football Club Limited will be the data controller.
Aston Villa Women’s Football Club Limited runs the Aston Villa Women first team and women’s development teams. In most cases, Aston Villa Football Club Limited or Aston Villa Women’s Football Club Limited (depending on the context) is the data controller in respect of any personal data processed in connection with the Aston Villa Women’s teams.
Aston Villa Foundation runs the Club’s soccer schools, community benefit programmes matchday raffles. When you use these services, or any other services offered by Aston Villa Foundation, then Aston Villa Foundation will be the data controller.
Our contact details are:
Email address
: dpo@avfc.co.uk
Postal address
: Legal Department, Aston Villa Football Club, Villa Park, Birmingham, B6 6HE
Back to top
The legal basis for using your personal data
There are a number of legal bases for using personal data. This section sets out more information on the main legal bases which the Club relies on. For further information on when each legal basis applies, please see section 4.
Performance of a contract with you
If we have entered into a contract with you, or are about to enter into a contract with you, we may need to process your personal data so that we can honour that contract. For example, if you buy tickets online we need to know your name and contact details so that we can send those tickets to you.
If you do not provide personal data that we need to perform a contract with you, we may not be able to perform that contract. This means that, where the contract is to provide you with a product or service, we may not be able to process your order or provide you with that product or service.
Legitimate interests
We may process your personal data where it is necessary for our interests (or those of a third party). We will only do this where:
those interests are legitimate;
AND
those interests are not overridden by your interests and fundamental rights.
You have the right to object to the processing of your personal data where we are processing that personal data as necessary for our legitimate interests. For more information, please see section 10.
Consent
If you have opted in to receive marketing information related to the Club, its products and services, Villa Park conference hire, coneferences and events, or the products and services of our partners (which includes both the Club’s Official Partners and Affiliates of the Aston Villa Pride Rewards Scheme), we (or our partners) will process your personal data and contact you in accordance with your consent.
Click HERE to see a list of our current partners.
We will only rely on consent when processing your personal data where you have clearly told us (or the third party that collected the personal data) that you consent to your personal data being processed by the Club.
Where you may have provided your consent to the collection, processing and transfer of your personal data for a specific purpose, you have the right to withdraw your consent for that specific processing at any time.
To withdraw your consent, you can:
follow the instructions provided in any relevant communication you have been given (for example, by logging into your account or clicking “Unsubscribe” on a related email you have received); or
where such service is not available, contact the Club using the details provided in section 2. When doing this, please ensure that you provide sufficient information so that the Club can verify your identity and clearly state what you are withdrawing your consent to. If you withdraw your consent in this way, the Club may need to contact you to clarify your instructions – if you do not provide contact information then the Club may not be able to process your request if there are any relevant issues.
Legal obligation
We may need to process your personal data to comply with a legal or regulatory obligation.
Back to top
The personal data the Club holds about you and how we use your personal data
Personal data means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
Information collected by the Club
The Club may collect some or all of the following personal data about you and may use it as follows:
Activity and the personal data we collect
Why we collect that personal data
The lawful basis for processing your personal data
When you create an account with us, use our services or sign up to receive communications from the Club, we will collect the identity and contact details that you provide us. This may include your name, title, date of birth, postal address, email address and telephone number(s). We will also collect your login information such as username and password. We may assign a unique identification number (known as a FanID) to your account.
To provide you with a personalised account when making use of the Club’s services.
To provide you with information, products and services you have requested, to tell you about the status of requests or to resolve any issues that have arisen).
To personalise communications with you (including marketing communications, where you are opted in to receive them).
Performance of a contract / potential contract with you.
Where you purchase a Matchday or season ticket (including half season tickets), ticketing memberships services or buy other products and services from us from us, we collect details of your identity (which may include your image / photograph), contact details, account information, purchase history and marketing preferences.
To provide you with tickets, products and services you have purchased and to maintain a record of your purchase history.
To conduct analysis of how supporters use our products / services so that we may to develop and improve our products and services, and develop our business (we may use third party suppliers to help us to this, and may share your personal data with those third party suppliers for that purpose).
We may share your data with the police or other law enforcement or governmental agencies, football Governing Bodies (for example The FA, the Premier League and The English Football League) and other football clubs in the event that we ban you from attending our matches or other events (for further information, see Section 5 below).
In addition, we may share your data with Fourth Wall FEP1 Limited in order to assist the Club to fulfil any ticketing membership products or services that you have purchased from the Club.
Performance of a contract / potential contract with you.
Necessary for our legitimate interests (for sale of a ticket or other products and services, to provide a dedicated seat and to control the number of individuals in the stadium; to ensure tickets for high demand fixtures are limited to active / loyal supporters and to support authorities (the police and other law enforcement agencies, the Health and Safety Executive and other government agencies) football Governing Bodies and other football clubs in delivering a safe and secure event; to study how supporters use our products/services; to develop them and to develop our business).
Where you purchase tickets for away matches from us, we collect details of your identity (which may include an image of you), contact details, account information, ticket purchase history and marketing preferences.
To provide you with tickets you have purchased and to maintain a record of your purchase history.
To provide other clubs with details of any away tickets you have purchased to attend their stadium.
We may share your data with the police or other law enforcement or governmental agencies, football Governing Bodies (for example The FA, the Premier League and The English Football League) and other football clubs in the event that we ban you from attending our matches or other events (for further information, see Section 5 below).
Necessary for both our and the other club’s legitimate interests (ensuring supporters who have purchased valid tickets are permitted entry to the other club’s stadium, ensuring safety and security for all staff and visitors to the other club’s premises; to identify, protect against and report actual, potential or suspected fraud or criminal activity; to respond to claims).
When purchasing a product or service from us we will also collect your payment card details and, if that purchase is not made in person (for example you purchase online or over the phone), we will also collect your billing address. We will also collect details of your historic payment method and purchase history. We do not retain payment card details once the payment has been processed.
To collect payment from you for products and services you have purchased.
Performance of a contract / potential contract with you.
Necessary for our legitimate interests (to recover debts due to us).
When purchasing a non-football related product or service via the website www.villaparkstadium.com, we will collect your name, email address, phone number and the event type that you are interested in.
To respond to your enquiry, to contact you to assist you with your enquiry, and to send you marketing information (if you have opted in to receive it). In addition, if relevant, to share your personal data with Compass Contract Services (UK) Limited (trading as “Levy Restaurants”) to allow them to contact you to assist you with your enquiry, and to send you marketing information (if you have opted in to receive it). To understand how Levy Restaurants will use your personal data please refer to their privacy policy at
https://www.compass-group.co.uk/privacy-notice
Performance of a contract / potential contract with you.
Consent.
Where you sign up for auto renewal of your season ticket or automatic purchase of cup tickets and provide your payment card details and billing address, those details will be stored (by our third party payment gateway provider) for as long as you are a member of the relevant scheme (or until you update those payment details with new details). Once the details have been entered and provided to our third party payment gateway provider, the Club cannot access these details (they are masked).
To collect payment from you for products and services you have purchased.
Performance of a contract / potential contract with you.
Necessary for our legitimate interests (to recover debts due to us).
If you enter a competition, prize draw or other promotion that we may run, we will collect information that you may give us when you enter (or in any follow up communications we have with you), such as your name, Fan ID, contact details or social media handle(s), date of birth and proof of age (if relevant to entry), proof of address (if relevant to entry) and details of the prize won.
To administer the competition, prize draw or promotion and (if you are successful) to provide you with your prize.
Performance of a contract / potential contract with you.
As you interact with our websites and mobile applications, or use our WIFI services, we automatically collect data about your equipment, network connection details, browsing actions and patterns. We collect this personal data by using cookies, and other similar technologies. We may also receive such information about you if you visit other websites employing our cookies. Please
click HERE
to see our cookie policy for further details.
To use data analytics to improve our websites, products/services, marketing, information services, supporter relationships and experience.
To study how supporters use our products/services, to develop them and to develop our business.
To monitor the use of our WIFI network by guests visiting our premises.
Necessary for our legitimate interests (to define types of supporters for our products and services; to study how supporters use our products/services; to keep our websites and products / services updated and relevant; to develop our business and inform our marketing strategy and information services strategy; for security).
Where we communicate with you by email, we collect details of whether you opened that email and / or interacted with any of the content within that email.
To analyse, personalise and improve our communications, marketing, information services and supporter relationships.
Necessary for our legitimate interests (to understand relevance of our email communications; to develop our supporter experience; to develop our business; and inform our marketing strategy and information services strategy).
We may collect your age, contact details and marketing preferences to tell us how you prefer to be contacted when we communicate with you, or when you unsubscribe from receiving marketing communications. If you do not consent to any marketing, we also keep a record of this.
To send age appropriate marketing communications to supporters and to provide supporters with information services about the Club and products / services they have purchased.
Consent
Necessary for our legitimate interests (to provide age appropriate information, information services and marketing to supporters, to grow our supporter database; to develop our business; and inform our marketing strategy and information services).
If you have consented to receive Digital Advertisements, we will pass your personal data, in encrypted form, to social media platforms and other third party organisations in order for them to show advertisements regarding Club news, products and services to you on our behalf. If you do not consent to Digital Advertisements we will also keep a record of this. This consent does not cover campaigns where a social media platform or other third party organisation may use the personal data that they may hold about you to show you advertisements regarding Club news, products and services. Whilst your personal data will not be passed onto any such organisations by the Club for those purposes, you may still receive digital advertisements, including about the Club, if you have consented to receive the same from such organisation.
To send age appropriate marketing communications to supporters and to provide supporters with information services about the Club and products / services.
Consent
Necessary for our legitimate interests (to provide age appropriate information, information services and marketing to supporters, to grow our supporter database; to develop our business; and inform our marketing strategy and information services).
We may collect your child’s name and age, photographs of them, film or video recordings of them, their medication details and your name, relationship to child and contact details in connection with your child’s mascot experience and for use in marketing communications. If you do not consent to any marketing, we will also keep a record of this.
To administer the mascot experience, in particular if we need to contact you in the case of an emergency. For the child’s first name and image to be used in connection with publicity and marketing purposes for the Club to provide supporters with information services about the Club and its products and services.
Performance of a contract / potential contract with you
Consent
Necessary for our legitimate interests (to provide age appropriate information, information services and marketing to supporters, to grow our supporter database; to develop our business, ensuring safety and security for all staff and visitors to our premises; to respond to any claims and to claim from our insurers).
To comply with our legal obligations.
If you contact us, for example with an enquiry, comment or complaint, we collect any personal information you may give in such correspondence with us.
To investigate, review and respond to your enquiry, comment or complaint.
Necessary for our legitimate interests (supporter relations; to improve our information services, products, services and supporter experience; and to develop our business).
If you call us, for example to buy a match ticket, season ticket, membership, hospitality, or event, or in relation to a ticketing, hospitality or event enquiry, we may record the phone call
For training or monitoring purposes and to respond to any enquiry, comment, or complaint.
Necessary for our legitimate interests (supporter relations; to improve our information services, products, services and supporter experience; and to respond to enquiries and complaints).
For security and safety of the Club and those visiting Club premises, the Club uses CCTV in and around Villa Park and the Club’s other premises (this includes the Club’s training ground and car parks) and certain streets surrounding the Club’s premises and so if you attend either of those premises your image may be captured on CCTV recordings. The Club’s security staff and matchday stewards may also use body worn cameras which may also capture your image when attending our premises.
To monitor and review any accidents or incidents and for the safety and security of visitors to our premises.
We may share CCTV with the police or other law enforcement or governmental agencies, football Governing Bodies (for example The FA, the Premier League and The English Football League), insurance companies and / or the Club’s service providers (including the Club’s Catering and Events Partner and Retail Partner) where such sharing necessary and in accordance with data protection (for example, where sharing CCTV is necessary for the purposes of the prevention or detection or crime, the apprehension or prosecution of offenders or in relation to prospective or ongoing legal proceedings).
Necessary for our legitimate interests (ensuring safety and security for all staff and visitors to our premises; to improve our safety / security operations; to identify, protect against and report actual, potential or suspected fraud or criminal activity; to respond to claims).
To comply with our legal obligations.
If you have an accident whilst at our premises, we may record details of your identity and contact details, as well as details of the accident, any injury sustained, treatment received and any other relevant factors or medical conditions.
To maintain a record of any accidents or incidents in line with legislation and good industry practice, for our insurance purposes and to protect the Club in the event of any future claims or legal action.
Necessary for our legitimate interests (ensuring safety and security for all staff and visitors to our premises; to respond to any claims and to claim from our insurers).
To comply with our legal obligations.
If you are involved in any security related incident during a Matchday (whether at the Club’s stadium or at any other stadium or event which the Club participates in), we will keep details related to that incident, for example the identity and contact information of people involved or potential witnesses, details of the incident and copies of any relevant video footage.
To maintain a record of any accidents or incidents in line with legislation and good industry practice, for our insurance purposes and to protect the Club in the event of any future claims or legal action.
We may share your data with the police or other law enforcement or governmental agencies, football Governing Bodies (for example The FA, the Premier League and The English Football League) and other football clubs in the event that we ban you from attending our matches or other events (for further information, see Section 5 below).
Necessary for our legitimate interests (ensuring safety and security for all staff and visitors to our premises; to improve our safety / security operations; to identify, protect against and report actual, potential or suspected fraud or criminal activity; to respond to claims and to claim from our insurers).
To comply with our legal obligations.
We may collect details of your identity (including image from CCTV or other camera footage) together with any relevant details of any convictions, orders, arrests or suspected involvement in incidents which may impact on the safety or security of any Matchdays or other events the Club takes part in.
To ensure safety and security for all staff and visitors to our premises.
We may share your data with the police or other law enforcement or governmental agencies, football Governing Bodies (for example The FA, the Premier League and The English Football League) and other football clubs in the event that we ban you from attending our matches or other events (for further information, see Section 5 below).
Necessary for our legitimate interests (ensuring safety and security for all staff and visitors to our premises; to identify, protect against and report actual, potential or suspected fraud or criminal activity; to respond to claims).
To comply with our legal obligations.
If you attend an event hosted or arranged by the Club, we may take photographs and / or film or video recordings of the event, which may include your image.
For use in marketing materials and / or media coverage of the event.
Depending on the event, we may share these details with a third party (for example, Aston Villa Foundation may share copies of images with its grant funders, when the event was related to a grant funded project). We will tell you if we plan to do this and you will have the ability to opt out.
Where consent is sought prior to or at the relevant event: consent.
Where the Club deems it inappropriate to seek consent prior to or at the relevant event: necessary for our legitimate interests (to develop our business).
Regardless of the basis upon which this personal data is processed, the Club will respect a request not to use your image in any future marketing materials.
If you attend the Club’s premises (for example the  Villa Park stadium or Bodymoor Heath training ground) for a match or other event (or attend as part of any preparation for such match or event), the Club may need to collect your identity and contact information (such as name, company you are from, purpose of your visit and contact details). We may also need to collect any other information relevant to ensuring the safety and security of our premises and the people who use it.
We collect this information to comply with our obligation to provide a safe working environment and to fulfil our duty of care to those visiting and working at the Club’s premises. We may need to share your data with our football Governing Bodies (for example The FA, the Premier League and The English Football League) and Regulatory Bodies (for example the Health and Safety Executive), where necessary for the purposes of competition integrity.
We may also share your data with the police or other law enforcement or governmental agencies, football Governing Bodies (for example The FA, the Premier League and The English Football League) and other football clubs in the event that we ban you from attending our matches or other events (for further information, see Section 5 below).
Necessary for our legitimate interests (operating the stadium in a safe and lawful manner and ensuring safety for all staff and visitors to our premises).
To comply with our legal obligations.
As a result of the Covid-19 pandemic and the Club’s related obligations and protocols when permitting people to access the Club’s premises, if you attend the stadium for a match or other event (or attend as part of any preparation for such match or event) or attend the Club’s training ground, the Club may need to collect information about your health.
We collect this information to with our obligation to provide a safe working environment and to fulfil our duty of care to those visiting and working at the Club’s stadium and to make an assessment of whether you are fit and well enough to be permitted access to the stadium. We may need to share your data with our football Governing Bodies (for example The FA, the Premier League and the English Football League), but only where necessary for the purposes of competition integrity.
Necessary for our legitimate interests (operating the stadium in a safe and lawful manner and ensuring safety for all staff and visitors to our premises).
To comply with our legal obligations.
Information received from third parties or publicly available sources
We may also receive personal data about you from various third parties and public sources as set out below.
Click HERE
to see a list of the names of our current third-party service providers.
Activity and the personal data we collect
Why we collect that personal data
The lawful basis for processing your personal data
The Club’s official retail channels (which includes over the phone, and online at shop.avfc.co.uk) are operated by Fanatics (International) Limited (“Fanatics”). When you buy products or services via those channels, we may receive information from Fanatics about your identity, contact details, purchase history and marketing preferences (only where you have given Fanatics consent to do so). You can view Fanatics’ privacy policy in relation to the operation of the Club’s official retail channels at:
https://shop.avfc.co.uk/en/astonvilla-privacy-policy/ch-1422
To market to you in line with your marketing preferences.
To study how supporters use our products/services, to develop them and to develop our business.
Consent
Necessary for our legitimate interests (to study how supporters use our products and services; to develop our products and services; and to develop our business).
We may receive details of your identity, contact details, account information, ticket purchase history and marketing preferences from the provider of our Online Ticket Office and back office ticketing software. They will tell us if you have purchased a ticket to any match or event at the Club’s stadium or for an away match in which one of the Club’s teams takes part.
To provide you with tickets you have purchased and to maintain a record of your ticket purchase history.
Performance of a contract / potential contract with you.
Necessary for our legitimate interests (to study how supporters use our products/services; to develop them and to develop our business).
If you access the Club’s WIFI service, we collect details of your identity (name, email address, post code, confirmation of being over 18) and marketing preferences as part of your registration for our WIFI service from the provider of our WIFI registration services.
Our third party provider also collects details of your browsing session, including the device and browser you are using and sites you visit whilst using our WIFI services.
To provide you with WIFI access at the Club’s premises.
To market to you in line with your marketing preferences.
To analyse and understand who uses the Club’s WIFI services.
For security and monitoring to ensure compliance with the law and terms and conditions of use of the services provided.
Performance of a contract / potential contract with you.
Consent
Necessary for our legitimate interests (supporter relations; to improve products / services / supporter experience and to develop our business; and to identify, protect against and report actual, potential or suspected fraud or breaches of our terms and conditions of service or criminal activity).
In periods where we expect high demand for tickets (e.g. key matches or periods where season tickets go on sale), we may use the services of a call centre to assist us with ticket purchases over the telephone. Where this occurs, you may be directed to a call centre when you call the Club’s Ticket Office. They will collect your identity, contact and payment details and provide them to us / our Ticket Office software provider to process the purchase.
To ensure your call is answered as quickly as possible; and to provide you with tickets you have purchased.
Performance of a contract / potential contract with you.
Necessary for our legitimate interests (to study how supporters use our products/services; to develop them and to develop our business).
We may receive details of your identity, contact details and account information received from the provider of our Pride Rewards scheme and e-cash scheme to tell us about your membership and use of the scheme (including products / services you have purchased from third party affiliates using your Pride Rewards e-cash card).
To administer the Pride Rewards and E-cash scheme.
To analyse and understand how supporters use the Pride Rewards and E-cash scheme.
Performance of a contract / potential contract with you.
Necessary for our legitimate interests (supporter relations; and to improve products / services / supporter experience and to develop our business).
We may receive details of your identity, contact details and transaction information from our secondary ticketing partner to tell us about any tickets you have purchased or sold on our official secondary ticketing platform.
To process any ticket sale / purchase made through our secondary ticketing partner.
Performance of a contract / potential contract with you.
When you use your Matchday ticket, season card or membership card to gain access to the Club’s facilities services at Villa Park (the Club’s stadium), we receive details of usage of your tickets from the providers of our stadium access control system.
To provide you with access to the Club’s stadium (Villa Park) and the Club’s facilities / services.
To analyse and understand how and when our supporters use our facilities / services.
Performance of a contract / potential contract with you.
Necessary for our legitimate interests (supporter relations; and to improve products / services / supporter experience and to develop our business).
When you purchase a product or service, we receive your contact details, payment details and details of the transaction from our payment gateway provider.
To collect payment from you for products and services you have purchased.
Performance of a contract / potential contract with you.
Necessary for our legitimate interests (to recover debts due to us).
If you have an accident whilst at our premises and are treated by a third party (for example, St John’s Ambulance), we may receive details of your identity and contact details, as well as details of the accident, any injury sustained, treatment administered and any other relevant factors or medical conditions.
To maintain a record of any accidents or incidents in line with legislation and good industry practice, for our insurance purposes and to protect the Club in the event of any future claims or legal action.
Necessary for our legitimate interests (ensuring safety and security for all staff and visitors to our premises; to respond to any claims; and to claim from our insurers).
To comply with our legal obligations.
We may receive details of your identity (which may include your image) from government and law enforcement authorities, football Governing Bodies (such as The FA, the Premier League and the English Football League) and / or other football clubs together with any relevant details of any convictions, orders, arrests, bans from other football or sporting events or suspected involvement in incidents which may impact on the safety or security of any Matchdays or other events the Club takes part in.
To ensure safety and security for all staff and visitors to our premises.
Necessary for our legitimate interests (ensuring safety and security for all staff and visitors to our premises; to identify, protect against and report actual, potential or suspected fraud or criminal activity; to respond to claims).
To comply with our legal obligations.
We may receive details relating to any conduct, act or statement that is abusive, insulting, intimidating, offensive or discriminatory which has been directed to the Club or any member if its staff, player, match official or other individuals attending a Club football match, whether such conduct, act or statement takes place within the Club’s stadium, otherwise in person or online. Such information may be received from government and law enforcement authorities, football Governing Bodies (such as The FA, the Premier League and the English Football League) and / or other football clubs)
To meet the commitment made by the Premier League and its member football clubs (including Aston Villa Football Club) to ensure that any individual found to have engaged in discriminatory or abusive conduct is not only prevented from attending football matches at the stadium of the club that they support, but all Premier League football matches.
Necessary for our legitimate interests and the legitimate interests of the Premier League, its member football clubs and the wider public (preventing abusive and discriminatory behaviour).
If you are an away fan attending the Club’s stadium (Villa Park) and have purchased your tickets via the away club, we may receive details of your name and ticket details from that away club.
To ensure safety and security for all staff and visitors to our premises.
Necessary for both our and the away club’s legitimate interests (ensuring supporters who have purchased valid tickets are permitted entry to the Club’s stadium, ensuring safety and security for all staff and visitors to our premises; to identify, protect against and report actual, potential or suspected fraud or criminal activity; to respond to claims.
When you agree to receive notifications from our websites and / or mobile applications, our third party notification services providers will collect information about your device, the pages on our websites and / or mobile applications that you visited, the start and end time of your session(s) and the location of your device when visiting our websites and / or using our mobile applications. This information is collected on an anonymised basis (whilst this information is linked to the device you used, we do not link that information to an individual or an IP address).
To provide tailored notifications to you based on your websites and mobile applications usage, device type and location (subject to you providing your consent to receive notifications).
Consent
If you agree to take part in an online Club survey or other data capture exercise hosted by a third party (for example, Survey Monkey), the Club will receive the information that you provide as part of that survey
To review and analyse the results of the survey or other data capture exercise. To administer any prize draws or competitions that are related to the survey or other data capture exercise. There may also be other purposes for collecting the personal data, which will be specified within the form used to collect the personal data.
Generally, the lawful basis for processing personal data captured via a survey or other data capture exercise will be consent.
There may a separate lawful basis – if so, details will be set out in the form used to collect the personal data.
Specialist data providers provide us with profile information about our supporters. We use this to segment and understand our supporters and the way we communicate with them (including any marketing we may send).
Currently, we use two companies to do this: Experian Limited and X Channel Marketing Limited– you can visit their websites and view their privacy policies at
www.experian.co.uk
and
https://www.xcm-uk.com/
).
To understand supporter preferences. To provide supporters with relevant information and improve our products and services.
Necessary for our legitimate interests (supporter relations; and to improve products / services / supporter experience and to develop our business).
Data analytics providers provide us with: (a) data on supporters’ behaviour on our websites and mobile applications (e.g. how much time supporters spend on which pages / sections, which links they choose to click, what supporters do and don’t like, etc.); and (b) devices used to access our websites and mobile applications (in particular device's IP address (in an anonymised form), screen size, type (unique device identifiers), browser data, geographic location (country only), preferred language).
Currently we use Hotjar Limited to do this for website data and Shift6 Limited (trading as “AppSee”) for mobile application data.
Hotjar, AppSee and the Club will never use this information to identify individual supporters or to match it with further data on an individual supporter.
For further details, please see Hotjar’s website and privacy policy at
www.hotjar.com
and AppSee’s website and privacy policy at
www.appsee.com
To understand the needs of supporters and to optimise service and experience.
Necessary for our legitimate interests (supporter relations; and to improve products / services / supporter experience and to develop our business).
The Club’s Catering and Hospitality Services partner (currently Compass Contract Services (UK) Limited, trading as Levy Restaurants) operates “frictionless retail units at the Club’s Villa Park Stadium. Where you use one of these frictionless retail units, your personal data will be collected and processed by Levy Restaurants.
Data collected by Levy Restaurants and processed pursuant to Levy’s privacy notice (
www.compass-group.co.uk/about/privacy-notice/
).
Data collected by Levy Restaurants and processed pursuant to Levy’s privacy notice (
www.compass-group.co.uk/about/privacy-notice/
).
Back to top
Sharing personal data with third parties
The Club may share your personal data with third parties, including other entities in the wider Club Group, where required by law, where it is necessary to administer the working relationship with you, where the Club has another legitimate interest in doing so.
Transfers to Third Party Service Providers
The Club uses third parties to help us provide you with products and services. We will share your personal details with those third parties where it is relevant to the service we are providing to you.
We may also share your personal data with third party suppliers to assist us in analysing how supporters use our products / services, so that we may to develop and improve our products and services, and develop our business
.
Details of the Club’s third party service providers can be found
HERE
.
Transfers pursuant to the events website www.villaparkstadium.com
Where you have provided data to the Club on the events website,
www.villaparkstadium.com
, the Club will share your data with Compass Contract Services (UK) Limited (trading as “Levy Restaurants”).
Transfers within the Club’s group of companies
The Club may share your personal data with other entities in its group as part of its regular reporting activities on Club performance, in the context of a Club reorganisation or restructuring exercise, for system maintenance support and hosting of data.
Transfers to law enforcement,other agencies and other third parties in connection with security, crime, law enforcement and / or legal claims
We may share information with the police or other law enforcement or governmental agencies where necessary:
for maintaining safety and security at the Club’s premises and matches and other events that the Club takes part in; or
for the prevention or detection of crime or the apprehension or prosecution of offenders.
This includes sharing personal data with the police or other law enforcement or governmental agencies in connection with the commitment made by the Premier League and each of its member football clubs (including Aston Villa Football Club) to ensure that any individual found to have engaged in discriminatory or abusive conduct is not only prevented from attending football matches at the stadium of the club that they support, but all Premier League football matches.
The Club may also share information with other relevant third parties, including:
third parties who use the Club’s premises (such as the Club’s Catering and Hospitality Services Partner (currently Compass Contract Services (UK) Limited), the Club’s Official Retailer (currently Fanatics International Limited) and the Club’s In Stadium where such information is relevant to their operations or use of the Club’s premises; and
insurance companies in connection with insurance claims about which the Club may hold CCTV footage or other relevant information
where such sharing is necessary:
for maintaining safety and security at the Club’s premises and matches and other events that the Club takes part in; or
for the prevention or detection of crime or the apprehension or prosecution of offenders.
Transfers to other football clubs
We may share ticketing information with other football clubs where the Club is taking part in a match at their stadium, to ensure that any issues with the Club’s travelling fans who have purchased tickets can be resolved quickly and easily or do address any safety or security issues which may arise.
If the Club has banned you from attending football matches or events which are held at the Club’s premises or the Club participates in, we may also transfer your personal data to other football clubs. This includes sharing personal data with other football clubs in connection with the commitment made by the Premier League and each of its member football clubs (including Aston Villa Football Club) to ensure that any individual found to have engaged in discriminatory or abusive conduct is not only prevented from attending football matches at the stadium of the club that they support, but all Premier League football matches.  The personal data that we may share may include your name, date of birth, contact details and image (where we have such personal data).
Transfers to Governing Bodies
We may need to share information with our football governing bodies (for example, The Football Association, the Premier League and / or the English Football League) where required pursuant to any regulations we may be subject to by those Governing Bodies.
We may also transfer your personal data to our football Governing Bodies where the Club has banned you from attending football matches or events which are held at the Club’s premises or the Club participates in. This includes sharing personal data with Governing Bodies in connection with the commitment made by the Premier League and each of its member football clubs (including Aston Villa Football Club) to ensure that any individual found to have engaged in discriminatory or abusive conduct is not only prevented from attending football matches at the stadium of the club that they support, but all Premier League football matches.  The personal data that we may share may include your name, date of birth, contact details and image (where we have such personal data).
Transfers to Lions Clubs / chairman
If you create an account on the Club’s official website to register to join an Official Lions Club, we will pass your information (name and email address) to that Lions Club as part of your application. The Lions Club will be the data controller of that information in respect of anything that Lions Club does with it. The Lions Club will tell us whether or not your application is successful and we will contact you to tell you. If successful, we will keep a record of this so that we can give you access to any Club benefits you may be entitled to receive as an Official Lions Club member.
Transfers to your friends and family (when connected)
If you (or another person on your behalf) links your ticketing account with another person’s ticketing account, we will share your personal data (name, FanID, ticket purchase history and ticket use) with that person (via their Club Ticketing Account).
We advise that you keep your FanID secure and only link or permit links with close friends and family that you trust to have access to this information. You can find out who is linked to your account or has linked your account to theirs and add / edit / remove links through your account profile by logging in at tickets.avfc.co.uk.
Transfers to other third parties
The Club may share your personal data with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the Club’s business. In this situation the Club will, so far as possible, share anonymised data with the other parties before the transaction completes. Once the transaction is completed, the Club will share your personal data with the other parties if and to the extent required under the terms of the transaction.
The Club may also need to share your personal data with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law.
Transfers outside of the United Kingdom
This may occur when the third party that we share your data with is situated outside the United Kingdom, or they use servers or other cloud services based outside the UK. If the Club does so, the Club will do its best to ensure a similar degree of protection in respect of your personal data as if the transfer was made within the UK.
Ensuring security when transferring personal data to third parties
All of the Club’s third-party service providers and other entities in the Club’s group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal data in line with the Club’s policies and the law and to treat the information confidentially. The Club does not allow the Club’s third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. The Club only permits them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with the Club’s instructions.
Back to top
Change of Purpose
The Club will only use your personal data for the purposes for which we collected it, unless the Club reasonably considers that it needs to use it for another reason and that reason is compatible with the original purpose. If the Club needs to use your personal data for an unrelated purpose, the Club will notify (by updating this Privacy Policy) and explain the legal basis for doing so.
Please note that the Club may process your personal data without your knowledge or consent, in compliance with the above rules, where this is required or permitted by law.
Back to top
Automated Decision-Making and profiling
Automated decision-making
The Club does not currently operate any automated decision-making. However, we do carry out profiling (see below).
Please note that V12 Retail Finance, the company which offers a finance solution for the Club’s season ticket purchasers may use automated decision-making when deciding whether or not to offer you credit. The Club has no influence or involvement in this. Please refer to V12 Retail Finance’s website for further information. V12 Retail Finance’s Privacy Notice can be found at
https://www.v12retailfinance.com/privacy-policy
(please note this will take you to a third party website – the Club is not responsible for V12 Retail Finance’s website).
Profiling
We do use specialist data providers to provide us with profile information about our supporters, by grouping people who are likely to share similar demographics, lifestyles or behaviours (sometimes referred to as “segmentation”). The data used by our providers for this purpose comes from a combination of both individual and household data and aggregated data (such as postcodes, towns or regions). We use segmentation data to better understand our supporters and their likely preferences. This information may influence the way we communicate with our supporters (including any marketing we may send).
Currently, we work with two companies to do this: Experian Limited and X Channel Marketing Limited. You can visit their website and view their privacy policy at
www.experian.co.uk
and
https://www.xcm-uk.com/
.
You are entitled to object to us carrying out this profiling using your personal data. If you wish to object, please email
dpo@avfc.co.uk
or write to the Club at the postal address given in Section 2.
The Club may also apply flags to supporter accounts based on its own internal analysis. For example:
the Club's current season ticket holders may have a 'flag' applied to their account which states that a current season ticket is registered with that account; or
recent customers of the AVFC Online Store may have a flag applied to their account which states that they have recently purchased a product from the AVFC Online Store.
The Club uses such flags:
to tailor any marketing communications that we send to our supporters who have opted in to receive marketing communications (for example, to send an early bird ticket price special offer to our existing season ticket holders);
to tailor any communications that we send in connection with a product or service that a supporter has purchased from the Club (for example, to notify a match ticket purchaser of a change in the arrangements for a match); and
on an aggregated and anonymised basis in internal analysis to understand our fans (e.g. to identify how records have both the ‘current season ticket holder flag’ and the ‘recent retail purchase’ flag).
The Club’s systems do not currently have the functionality to permit you to opt out of the placing of flags on a your account or the use of flags on an aggregated and anonymised basis in internal analysis. However, you can:
opt out from receiving marketing communications at any time (which would prevent the use of flags in connection with sending marketing communications);
request deletion of your personal data (which would include any flags associated with their personal data). Note that this would result in the deletion of any Digital Account, FanID and ticket purchase history which you may have with the Club and you may be required to register for a new Digital Account and / or FanID should you wish to access the Club’s products or services in the future (for example, tickets, memberships or VillaTV).
Back to top
Data Security
The Club has put in place appropriate security measures to prevent your personal data from being accidentally lost, used or accessed in an unauthorised way, altered or disclosed. In addition, the Club limits access to your personal data to those employees, agents, consultants and other third parties (referred to in section 5) who have a business need to know. They will only process your personal data on the Club’s instructions and they are subject to a duty of confidentiality.
The Club has put in place procedures to deal with any data security breach and will notify you and any applicable regulator of a breach where the Club is legally required to do so.
Back to top
How long will the Club keep your information for?
The Club will only retain your personal data for as long as necessary to fulfil the purposes it collected it for, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, accounting, or reporting requirements. The Club has in place a Data Retention Policy which includes recommended data retention periods for your personal data.
In some circumstances the Club may anonymise your personal data so that it can no longer be associated with you, in which case the Club may use such information without further notice to you.
We keep information related to your Official AVFC Website account for as long as your account remains active. To delete your Official AVFC Website Account, please contact the Club using the details provided in section 2.
We keep supporter personal data in our Club database for the longer of:
2 years from the supporter’s last known interaction with the Club; or
in the case of Club ticket purchases, 5 seasons since the last purchase.
As we review our databases on a quarterly basis, personal data may be retained for slightly longer than the periods specified above, until the next quarterly review.
Where you have opted in to receive marketing, we retain details of your consent and shall continue to market to you in accordance with your preferences for a period of 2 years from your last interaction with the Club or until you opt out, whichever is earlier.
For the purposes of retaining personal data, we currently regard the following as interactions with the Club: attending a Club match; logging into your online account; purchasing a product from the Club’s Online Store; opening an email from the Club. We may update this from time to time, depending on the data available to the Club to capture interactions.
We keep information which may relate to accidents or injuries for a period of 3 years from the date of the last entry in the log in which it is recorded (or, where the accident involves a child/ young adult, until that person reaches the age of 21, if longer). We do this in case there are any queries and to respond to any claims in relation to that incident. If we are aware that claim or legal action is or ongoing in relation to an accident or injury, we will keep relevant information until that claim or legal action has concluded.
We keep other information which may relate to a claim or legal action for a period of 7 years (or longer, if a claim or legal action is in progress). We do this in case there are any queries and to respond to claims in relation to that incident.
We keep CCTV footage for a period of 28 days following the recording (or longer if required in connection with an ongoing issue or if required by law).
Back to top
Your legal rights
It is important that the personal data the Club holds about you is accurate and current. Please keep the Club informed if your personal data changes.
Under certain circumstances, by law you have the right to:
Request access
to your personal data (commonly known as a "data subject access request"). This enables you to receive a copy of the personal data the Club holds about you and to check that it is lawfully processing it.
Request correction
of the personal data that the Club holds about you. This enables you to have any incomplete or inaccurate information the Club holds about you corrected.
Request erasure
of your personal data. This enables you to ask the Club to delete or remove personal data where there is no good reason for it continuing to process it. You also have the right to ask the Club to delete or remove your personal data where you have exercised your right to object to processing (see below).
Object to processing
of your personal data where the Club is relying on a legitimate interest (see section 3 for those circumstances) (or those of a third party) and there is something about your particular situation which makes you want to object to processing on this ground. We may be able to continue processing even if you object (if we have compelling legitimate grounds which override your interests, rights and freedoms or if in connection with legal claims).
Object to processing
where the Club is processing your personal data for direct marketing purposes.
Request the restriction of processing
of your personal data. This enables you to ask the Club to suspend the processing of personal data about you, for example if you want the Club to establish its accuracy or the reason for processing it.
Request the transfer
of your personal data to another party.
Withdraw consent at any time
where we are relying on consent to process your personal data. However, this will not affect the lawfulness of any processing carried out before you withdraw your consent or of any processing that is lawfully carried out for another purpose (for example, to comply with a contract or a legitimate interest). If you withdraw consent, we may not be able to provide certain products or services to you. We will advise you if this is the case at the time you withdraw your consent.
If you want to review, verify, correct or request erasure of your personal data, object to the processing of your personal data, or request that the Club transfers a copy of your personal data to another party, please contact the Club in writing using the contact details given in section 2. Please ensure you give us details of your identity and contact details so we can identify you and the personal data in question and contact you in relation to your query.
You will not have to pay a fee to access your personal data (or to exercise any of the other rights). However, the Club may charge a reasonable fee if your request for access is clearly unfounded or excessive. Alternatively, the Club may refuse to comply with the request in such circumstances.
The Club may need to request specific information from you to help it confirm your identity and ensure your right to access the information (or to exercise any of your other rights). This is to ensure that personal data is not disclosed to any person who has no right to receive it.
Back to top
Children under the age of 16
We expect parents and guardians to supervise their child when they access the Club’s websites, mobile applications and other services provided by the Club.
If you are under the age of 16, you must ask your parent / guardian for consent before you access the Club’s services or provide personal data or other information to the Club.
Back to top
Data Protection Officer
The Club’s designated Data Protection Officer (
dpo@avfc.co.uk
) will oversee compliance with this Privacy Policy. If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy or how the Club handles your personal data, please contact the Club using the details given in section 2.
Whilst we hope you would contact the Club (using the details provided in section 2) with any issues first, you have the right to make a complaint at any time to the Information Commissioner's Office (“
ICO
”), the UK supervisory authority for data protection issues.
You can contact the ICO online HERE
, or by post at:
Information Commissioner's Office
Wycliffe House
Water Lane
Wilmslow
Cheshire
SK9 5AF
Back to top
Changes to this Privacy Policy
We will update this Privacy Policy from time to time, so please check this Privacy Policy periodically, so you are aware of any updates. The date below records when this Privacy Policy was last updated.
January 2025
Back to top
Service providers & Official Partners
3rd party service providers who process personal data
The following organisations process personal data on Aston Villa’s behalf as part of services provided:
Name of 3
rd
party service provider
Details of service provided
Adobe Inc (AdobeSign)
Provides cloud based e-signature services
African Adventures Limited
Provide services to Aston Villa Foundation in relation to volunteer activities/trips in Africa
Amazon Web Services Inc (AWS)
Provides web hosting services in relation to the Club’s Official Website and Official Mobile Application
Apex ESG Ratings Limited
Carbon Footprint monitoring services
Appcheck Limited
IT security services
Aston Manor Academy
Provider of Aston Villa Foundation college programme
Baker Goodchild Direct Marketing Limited
Provides the Club with mail fulfilment services. The Club also uses other mailing houses from time to time, and the mailing house used will vary from campaign to campaign. The Club typically runs two campaigns per season (to deliver season ticket and half season tickets).
BD Sport Limited
Operate the Club’s matchday betting kiosks within the Stadium
Blinkfire Analytics Inc
Social media insight services
Challenge Central Limited
Provide services to Aston Villa Foundation in relation to 3 peaks challenge events (for fundraising, etc)
Check Point Software Technologies Ltd (trading as Avanan)
Provide cloud email security services
Compass Contract Services (UK) Limited (trading as “Levy Restaurants”)
Provide catering and events services to the Club.
Docusign Inc
Provides cloud based e-signature services
ECAL Marketing Ltd
Provides calendar services (enabling users to import Club events into their electronic calendars)
Equals One Ventures Sdn Bhd (trading as "Howuku”)
Provides website analytics (e.g. details of website use)
We use Howuku in order to better understand our website users’ needs and to optimize the website service and experience.
Essendex Limited
Provides services enabling the Club to send SMS messages to people on the Club’s Customer Relationship Management system
Experian Limited
Provide consumer classification systems (i.e. profiling)
Facebook Inc / Facebook Ireland Limited
Display relevant advertising to you on their platform (where you have provided your consent for us to do so).
Fanatics (International) Limited
Operates the Club’s retail channels (including the Online Store at
www.shop.avfc.co.uk
)
Fortress GB Limited
Jointly operate the Club’s stadium entry (access control) system
Jointly operate the Club’s Pride Rewards scheme (including the online Portal at
https://rewards.avfc.co.uk
Jointly operate the Club’s e-cash season card / membership card scheme
Fourth Wall FEP1 Limited
Operate the fulfilment of the Club’s ticketing membership services.
Google
Display relevant advertising to you on their platform
(where you have provided your consent for us to do so).
Provides website analytics (e.g. details of website use)
Hotjar Limited
Website analytics (e.g. details of website use)
Immediate Care Medical Limited
Provides emergency first aid services on matchdays and at other events.
Instagram
Display relevant advertising to you on their platform
(where you have provided your consent for us to do so).
Legends Sales and Marketing (UK) Limited
Provide modelling, profiling and marketing sales support to the Club.
LinkedIn
Display relevant advertising to you on their platform
(where you have provided your consent for us to do so).
M3 Communications Limited
Provides the Club with “pay per click” advertising services and “search engine optimisation” services.
Meta Platforms, Inc.
Display relevant advertising to you on their platform
(where you have provided your consent for us to do so).
Microsoft Limited
Provides Office 365 Services
Ormit Solutions Limited (trading as “Splash Access”)
Provide customer WIFI access registration services for use of WIFI at the Club’s premises.
Premier League Charitable Fund
Provide grant funding to Aston Villa Foundation (Premier League Charitable Trust only have access to anonymised data)
Premier League Limited
Provides fan contact details and communication preferences (with fan consent)
Ring Central, Inc
Provides telephone systems
Rival UK Partners LLC
Provides esports platform services to the Club
Rostrvm Solutions Limited
Provides call centre software services
Salesforce UK Limited
Provide monitoring and evaluation software to Aston Villa Foundation in relation to programmes run by Aston Villa Foundation using Premier League Charitable Fund grant funding.
Shift6 Limited (trading as “AppSee”)
Provide mobile application analytics (e.g. details of app use)
SurveyMonkey Europe UC
Provide online survey and data capture tools.
The Lowery Centre Limited (trading as “Quay Tickets”)
Provide call centre services for the Ticket Office in times of peak demand
The Rocket Science Group LLC
Provides ticket purchase confirmation emails
TikTok Information Technologies Limited
Display relevant advertising to you on their platform
(where you have provided your consent for us to do so).
TopTix Sport UK Limited (trading as “Seat Geek”)
Provide the Club’s online Ticketing Website and at
www.tickets.avfc.co.uk
and back office ticketing software.
Two Circles Limited
Provide customer analysis services.
UK Skydiving Adventures Limited
Provide services to Aston Villa Foundation in relation to skydiving events (for fundraising, etc)
Urban Zoo Studios Limited
Provides the Club’s Official Website at
www.avfc.co.uk
,
the Club's OTT Platform (VillaTV), the Club’s Single Sign On service and the Club’s Official Mobile Application
V12 Retail Finance Limited
Provide finance options to the Club’s season ticket purchasers
Woobox LLC
Website data collection services (e.g. mailing list sign ups and online form collections)
WorldPay (UK) Limited
Barclays Bank UK Plc (trading as “Barclaycard”)
The Club’s payment gateway providers for all card payments taken by the Club (whether in person, online or over the telephone)
X
Display relevant advertising to you on their platform
(where you have provided your consent for us to do so).
X Channel Marketing Limited (“XCM”)
Provides customer relation management systems and consumer classification systems (i.e. profiling)
Xi Communications Limited
Provides telephone systems
Youtube LLC
Display relevant advertising to you on their platform
(where you have provided your consent for us to do so).
YouGov Plc
Research services
The 3
rd
party service providers list is updated from time to time. Please check back periodically for any changes.
Last updated: January 2025
Official Partners / Pride Rewards Affiliates
The following organisations are Official Partners of Aston Villa Football Club:
Name of Partner
Partner Designation
Products and services you may be contacted about
adidas
Official Retail Partner
Kit and training wear
Aston University
Official UK University Partner
Further education and research
Cadbury (part of the Mondelez Group)
Official Confectionary Supplier
Confectionery
Carlsberg
Official Beer Partner
Lager, cider and other drinks
Betano
Official Shirt Partner
Sports Betting
Corpay
Official Commercial Foreign Exchange Partner
Foreign Exchange
eSentire
Official Cyber Security Partner
Online security
Fanatics
Official Retailer and Official Online Retailer
Aston Villa merchandise, sports and leisurewear
JD Sports
Official UK and Europe Sports Fashion Retail Partner
Sports retail
Emmiera Group Limited
Official Partner
Furniture
Levy Restaurants / Compass
Catering and Hospitality Services Provider
Catering, events and hospitality services
Monster Energy
Official Energy Drinks Partner
Energy drinks
Nemiroff Vodka
Official Vodka Partner
Vodka
Premier League
Football and the products and services of the PL’s official partners from time to time (available at
www.premierleague.com
)
Seatgeek
Official Primary Ticketing Partner
Ticketing
Trade Nation
Official Sleeve Partner
Trading
Socios
Offical Fan Token Partner
Fan tokens
The following organisations are affiliates of Aston Villa’s Pride Rewards Scheme:
Name of Pride Rewards Affiliate
Products and services you may be contacted about
Alton Towers Holiday
Experience
APH (Airport Parking and Hotels)
Accomodation/travel
Appleyard Flowers
Florist
Barrio (4 sites)
Food & beverage
Best Gym Equipment
Gym equipment
Best Western Hotels
Accomodation
Boots Online
Retailer
Britannia Hotels
Accomodation
BT Broadband & Mobile
Broadband
BT Sport
Telecom
BT WiFi
Internet
Bunches.co.uk
Florist
Burton UK
Men
Cadbury Gifts Direct
Food & beverage
Card Factory
Retailer
Carphone Warehouse
Electronics
Chesterfield Sofas
Furniture
Clare Florist
Florist
Clarks
Footwear
Confused.com
Insurance/financial
Côte Brasserie (94 Sites)
Food & beverage
Cotswolds Hideaways
Accomodation
Craft Gin Club
Food & beverage
Deichmann (103 Sites)
Footwear
Deliveroo (new & existing clients)
Food & beverage
Duke & Dextor
Footwear
Easy Bathroom & Tiles (118 Sites)
Retailer
EasyJet Holidays UK
Travel
EasySkinz UK
Retailer
eBay
Retailer
Ellis Brigham (22 Sites)
Clothing & footwear retailer
Ernst Jones
Jewellers
Fanatics
Sports retailer
Fiit
Healthy & fitness
Frankies & Bennies
Food & beverage
Funky Pigeon
Retailer
Gaucho
Food & beverage
Go Ape (34 Sites)
Experiences
Groupon UK
Retailer
H Samuel
Jewellers
Hamleys
Retailer
Harvey Nicholls
Retailer
Harvey Nics (6 stores)
Retailer
Heathrow Express
Travel
High Street TV
Retailer
Holiday Taxis
Travel
Hoppa UK
Travel
Hughes Electrical LTD (33 Sites)
Electrical
Hussle
Fitness
Hussle
Health & fitness
Inamo
Food & beverage
Inamo Restaurants
Food & beverage
Innkeeper's Lodge (54 Sites)
Accomodation
Just Eat For Business
Food & beverage
Just Park
Travel
Klass (42 Sites)
Fashion Retailer
LA Muscle
Health & fitness
Laithwaites Wine
Food & beverage
Lastminute.com
Accomodation
Learning 24/7
Courses
Legoland Discovery Centre (2 sites)
Experience
Lloyds Pharmacy
Health
Luke Roper
Men's fashion retailer
Macellaio
Food & beverage
Madame Tussauds (2 sites)
Experience
Magazines Direct
Magazines
Mainline Menswear
Men's fashion retailer
Malmaison
Accomodation
Marks & Spencers
Food & beverage & fashion retailer
Meet & Greet Manchester Airport Parking
Travel
Mindful Chef
Food & beverage
Miss Empire
Retailer
Morphy Richards
Electronics
My M&Ms
Food & beverage
Myprotein UK
Health & fitness
New Era Caps
Accessories
Norfork Hideaways
Accomodation
NOW TV
TV
Octopus Energy
Energy
Opodo
Travel
Otticanet UK
Sunglasses retailer
P&O Ferries
Travel
Pact Coffee
Food & beverage
Park & Ride Birmingham
Travel
Park & Ride Manchester
Travel
Pearson Cycles
Sports equipment retailer
Pieminister (16 stores)
Food & beverage
Plusnet Broadband
Broadband
Pontins
Accomodation
ProBikeKit UK
Sports equipment retailer
Purple Parking
Travel
Radisson Hotels
Accomodation
Raging Bull
Fashion retailer
Red Letter Days
Experience
Reware the World (was The First Club)
Corporate gifts
Sandals
Footwear
Sea Life (11 sites)
Experience
Segway Events (10 Sites)
Experiences
Shreks Adventure
Experience
Simply Cook
Food & beverage
Size
Footwear
Ski France
Holiday
Spaghetti House
Food & beverage
Sports  Breaks
Experiences
Sticks n Sushi (9 Sites)
Food & beverage
Stuarts London
Footwear
Swan
Electrical
Swan (multiple stores)
Retailer
TalkTalk Phone and Broadband
Telecommunications
TenPin
Experiences
The Bear Grylls Adventure
Experience
The Bear Grylls Adventure
Experience
The Blackpool Tower Eye
Experience
The Dungeons (5 sites)
Experience
The Entertainer
Toy retailer
The Entertainer
Retailer
The London Eye
Experience
The Protein Works
Health & fitness
Thorntons
Food & beverage
Toffs Ltd
Sport Retailer
Tower of London
Experience
Travel Supermarket
Travel
Travelzoo
Travel
Twinings
Food & beverage
UK Bungee Club (9 Sites)
Experiences
Village Hotels
Accomodation
Virgin Wines
Food & beverage
Wahl UK
Hair & Beauty
War Paint For Men
Men's health & beauty
Waterstones
Book retailer
Whittard of Chelsea
Food & beverage
Wowcher
Retailer
Yo Sushi
Food & beverage
Yopa.co.uk
Estate Agent
Zavvi UK
Retailer
ZSL London Zoo
Experience
ZSL Whipsafe Zoo
Experience
The Official Partners and Rewards Affiliates lists are updated from time to time. Please check back periodically for any changes.
Last updated: January 2025.
The 3
rd
party service providers list is updated from time to time. Please check back periodically for any changes.
Last updated:
March 2023
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.compass-group.co.uk/privacy-notice:
Contact
What We Do
Foodservice
Facilities Management
Guest Services
Cleaning Services
Vending & Micromarkets
Procurement & Supply Chain
Where You'll Find Us
Business & Industry
Education
Healthcare
Sport, Leisure & Hospitality
Defence & Government Services
Energy & Offshore
Jobs
Search Jobs
Why Compass
Early Careers
Grads
Our Impact
Social Value
Our Social Promise
Our Climate Promise
Our Wellbeing Promise
Responsible Sourcing
Media
About Us
Our People & Culture
Our Brands
Our Work
Our Resources & Insights
Our Executive Team
Our Heritage
Diversity & Inclusion
Armed Forces Community
COMPASS JOBS
Contact
Compass Jobs
Compass UK&I Privacy Notice
About this Privacy Notice
Purpose of the Privacy Notice
Contacts
How do you engage with our organisation
Giving us feedback
You are applying to work for us as an employee or apprentice
You supply food, equipment or services to us
You eat our food at a public venue, your place of work or study, or any other private site
You stay with us at a residential site
You visit an event or conference, sports event or venue, or any other leisure facility
You order or pay for your food via an app
You use one of our 'frictionless' retail units
You buy our services
You visit our offices or operational sites
You order through Foodbuy
You receive sales or marketing information about our food or services to you or your organisation
You’ve taken part in one of our surveys or a competition
You’ve engaged with us on social media
You’ve visited one of our websites
You receive a newsletter or other communication from us
General data protection information
Change of purpose
Failure to provide personal data
Your Rights
Data retention
Data security
Processing information outside the UK or EEA
How to complain
Compass UK&I Privacy Notice
Compass UK&I Privacy Notice
About this Privacy Notice
Purpose of the Privacy Notice
Contacts
How do you engage with our organisation
Giving us feedback
You are applying to work for us as an employee or apprentice
You supply food, equipment or services to us
You eat our food at a public venue, your place of work or study, or any other private site
You stay with us at a residential site
You visit an event or conference, sports event or venue, or any other leisure facility
You order or pay for your food via an app
You use one of our 'frictionless' retail units
You buy our services
You visit our offices or operational sites
You order through Foodbuy
You receive sales or marketing information about our food or services to you or your organisation
You’ve taken part in one of our surveys or a competition
You’ve engaged with us on social media
You’ve visited one of our websites
You receive a newsletter or other communication from us
General data protection information
Change of purpose
Failure to provide personal data
Your Rights
Data retention
Data security
Processing information outside the UK or EEA
How to complain
This is the external privacy notice of Compass Group, UK & Ireland Limited, a company incorporated in England & Wales under number 02272248 whose registered office is at Parklands Court, 24 Parklands, Birmingham Great Park, Rubery, Birmingham B45 9PZ together with all its subsidiary companies and trading divisions (“Compass”).
Compass respects your privacy and is committed to protecting your personal data. This privacy notice informs you of who we are, how we collect, share, use and protect your personal data, however you provide it to us, and tells you about your privacy rights and legal protections.
This privacy policy tells you how Compass collects and processes your personal data through your provision of that data to us and use of any of our group websites, including but not limited to any data you may provide when you sign up to a newsletter, purchase a product or service, take part in a survey or enter a competition, or are apply for a role within a Compass brand.
It is important that you read this privacy notice together with any other information we may provide on specific occasions when we are collecting or processing personal data about you so that you are fully aware of how and why we are using your data. This privacy notice is complementary to the other information which we might provide in specific circumstances and will not override it.
Who is the Controller and Data Protection Officer?
When we use ‘Compass’, ‘we’, ‘us’ or ‘our’ in this privacy notice, we are referring to Compass Group, UK & Ireland Limited. We are the ‘data controller’ for your personal data under the applicable legislation and it is primarily responsible for processing and ensuring proper protection of your data.
This means that we are responsible for deciding how we hold and use personal information about you. We are required under data protection legislation to notify you of the information contained in this privacy notice.
This notice does not form part of any contract we might have with you and we can update it at any time but if we do so, we will provide you with an updated copy as soon as reasonably practical.
It is important that you read and retain this notice, together with any other privacy notice we may provide on specific occasions when we are collecting or processing personal information about you, so that you are aware of how and why we are using such information and what your rights are under the data protection legislation.
As noted in the introduction, Compass has subsidiary companies through which it operates and operates through trading divisions. Some group subsidiaries will contract in their own legal name but for the purposes of this privacy notice, they will be operating as subsidiaries of Compass Group, UK and Ireland Limited. The trading divisions, by contrast, might have their own names or brands but they have no legal status themselves. Any contract you enter through them will be, legally speaking, with Compass.
We have appointed a Data Protection Officer (DPO) who is responsible for overseeing questions in relation to this privacy notice and data protection issues in general. If you have any questions about this privacy notice, including in relation to your legal rights, please contact the DPO using the details set out below.
Contact details
Full name of legal entity
Compass Group, UK and Ireland Limited
Who to contact
Data Protection Officer
Email address
DPO@compass-group.co.uk
Postal address
Parklands Court, 24 Parklands, Birmingham Great Park, Rubery, Birmingham. B45 9PZ
Please use the navigation bar on the left to go to the section that matches most closely with the way you engage with Compass.
Consumers provide feedback to businesses for various reasons, including the desire to share their experiences and influence future service and product offerings. Through comments, consumers can offer constructive suggestions for improvement or highlight areas that need attention. Compliments are often given to express appreciation for exceptional service, quality products, or a positive experience, which helps businesses recognize and reward their staff and maintain high standards. Conversely, complaints are submitted when consumers encounter issues or dissatisfaction, enabling businesses to address and resolve problems, enhance customer satisfaction, and foster loyalty. This feedback loop is crucial for businesses aiming to meet and exceed customer expectations continuously. Throughout this process, limited personal data supplied by the individual will be processed to ensure accurate and relevant feedback.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms you use to give us feedback will vary but the general theme applies where we aim to gather sufficient information to understand the feedback fully, whilst meeting the data minimisation principle.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses
Date of birth
Transaction or visit date
CCTV footage and other information obtained through electronic means
Voice recordings online with this facility. You will be informed if call is recorded
Other information you choose to share with us an any free text field
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information either directly from you or sometimes from a third party.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations when providing our services to you or under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
Where your personal data is not relevant to any follow on actions, we will anonymise the feedback.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Responding to your feedback either directly or via a third party or client
Processing payments or refunds
Administering the contract we have entered into with you
Conducting performance reviews, managing performance and determining performance requirements
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or other employees, workers and contractors, including accidents at our place of work
Complying with health and safety obligations
To detect or prevent fraud
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We do not ask for special category of personal data as part of our feedback processes, but you may share it with us as part of any free form text fields in our forms. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to providing our services to you (most importantly so that we provide them properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass as part of our process of dealing with your feedback.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer our service provision, or our contract with you.
We may be required to share your personal information with clients or suppliers to help resolve details of your feedback.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: receiving payment for the services we provide, product or service quality assurance, and meeting our health and safety obligations including accident and incident management.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
As a prospective employee, apprentice, trainee or site contractor, you will need to provide us with some personal data. We may need some data in order to take steps at your request prior to entering into a contract with you and, if your application is successful, in order to enter into the contract itself. In some cases, we need to process personal data in order to comply with legal obligations. For example we are required to check your eligibility to work before employment starts. Some personal data will be needed to generally manage the recruitment process, to assess and confirm your suitability for employment, and to decide whether to make a job offer. We may also need to process personal data in order to respond to or defend legal claims. Health and other special category data may be needed in order to make reasonable adjustments during the recruitment process and for equal opportunities monitoring purposes. And for certain types of roles we may be obliged to carry out a criminal records check in order to satisfy ourselves that there is nothing in your record that makes you unsuitable for the role. The different circumstances in which we will process your data are set out in more detail under "Situations in which we will use your personal information". The categories of personal data we need to collect, store and use in pursuit of those purposes is set out below:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and personal email addresses
Date of birth
Gender
National Insurance number
Salary and annual leave
Start date and, if different, the date of your continuous employment
Location of employment or workplace
Copy of passport (either as ID evidence or to use for travel arrangements if the role demands it)
Right to work in the UK status including current immigration status
Copy of driving licence (either as ID evidence or qualification evidence if the role demands it)
Recruitment information (including copies of right to work documentation, references and other information included in a CV or cover letter or as part of a job application process)
Any information you provide to us during an interview (whether face-to-face, by phone or video platform, or in any other way)
Previous employment records (including job titles, work history, working hours, holidays, training records and professional memberships)
Competency certification or other regulatory or industry-related certification necessary for your role
Professional or trade qualifications that are relevant to the industry and/or role for which you are applying
Tax documentation where this is necessary for us to work with national or international tax authorities to administrate your tax status or the status of emoluments you earn either in the UK or aboard, where applicable.
Credit history or other background checks. (Some of our clients operate in industries where they are obliged to undertake stringent vetting on their own employees and those of contractors. In such circumstances, we will have to undertake a level of investigation about you that might seem unnecessarily intrusive.  We will only do this where our client reasonably demands this of us.  If we do not do this, our client might not grant you access to their premises and you might be unable to perform your intended role.)
Results of government revenue & customs or local tax office employment status check, details of your interest in and connection with the intermediary through which your services are supplied (should you provide services in a way that might legally qualify you as an employee in the eyes of the law or in accordance with government revenue & customs or local tax office guidance and regulation on the status of individuals and their tax affairs)
Specific types of data that may be processed as part of any psychometric testing that we may carry out, such as test scores, personality traits, cognitive abilities and behavioral tendencies
We may also collect, store and use the following "special categories" of more sensitive personal information:
Information about your race or ethnicity, religious beliefs, sexual orientation and political opinions
Heath information (to make reasonable adjustments in the recruitment process)
Credit reference agency checks
Information about criminal convictions and offences, where these are relevant to the role for which you have applied (or to which you are being transferred if already employed by us) and where client expectations and regulation to which they are subject obliges us to obtain such data (for example; working in schools or hospitals where there are children or vulnerable adults and our clients have a safeguarding obligation and standard which we must meet ourselves, or other sites requiring high levels of security)
This sort of special category information is required if the role you are applying for demands it, or if the role is on a client site where the client has obliged us to vet potential staff to this extent (for example; clients in the finance industry or the defence sector are very strict about security, clients in the education and health sectors are very strict about criminal convictions because they have statutory or safeguarding obligations to meet, and to which our own staff or contractors must adhere).  These sorts of information might not seem to be appropriate to the nature of the role you are applying for, but we might still have to obtain it from you for the reasons above.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information about employees, workers, apprentices, trainees or learners and contractors (whether on a permanent, part-time or casual basis) through the application and recruitment process, either directly from candidates or sometimes from an employment agency or background check provider.
We may sometimes collect additional information from third parties including former employers, credit reference agencies or other background check agencies.
We may work with our third parties or agencies to help with our selection process.
We may also use other sources of personal information including but not limited to:
Sanctions and Watch Lists issued by governments, financial market regulators and law enforcement bodies form across the world
Baseline Personnel Security Standard (BPSS)
Outstanding County Court Judgments (CCJs), IVAs, Bankruptcies, alias names and address history using the electoral register
The Disclosure and Barring Service and Disclosure Scotland in respect of criminal convictions
The Home Office Employers Checking Service in respect of Right To Work in the UK
Your named referees
Trustees or managers of pension arrangements operated by a group company, if relevant.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need information prior to take steps at your request to enter into a contract (employment contract or training or learning agreement) and to enter into the contract or agreement itself
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and employer best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Assess your skills, qualifications, and suitability for the work generally or the role specifically
Carry out background and reference checks, where applicable
Communicate with you about the recruitment process
Carrying out interview either face to face, by phone or video links, or chat platforms
Make decisions throughout our recruitment process
Keep records related to our hiring processes
Determine the terms on which you work for us
Check you are legally entitled to work in the UK
Psychometric testing and evaluations
Keep your details on Compass systems (including Apps) that allow our contract managers to offer or select you for casual work, overtime or emergency cover
Defend or responding to legal claims
Comply with health and safety obligations
Equal opportunities monitoring
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to the contract or agreement, we have with you (most importantly so that we perform it properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to undertake your role, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the employment contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you. The most likely use of automated decision making is in response to questions we ask about your entitlement to work in the UK. These decisions will be based on the information you provide to us.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers, and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship, we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) or other entities within our group who we might use to help administer the employment contract or agreement we have with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the employment contract we have with you: IT services, foreign jurisdiction permission to work, occupational health, and security vetting.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider which triggers our obligation to disclose anonymised data under the Transfer of Undertakings (Protection of Employment) Regulations 2006 (TUPE).
In this situation we will, so far as possible, share anonymised data with the other parties before the transaction completes.  Once the transaction is completed, we will share your personal data with the other parties if, and to the extent required under the terms of the transaction or by TUPE.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law. This may include making returns to government revenue & customs or local tax office, disclosures to stock exchange regulators and disclosures to shareholders such as directors' remuneration reporting requirements.
Please note: if we on-board you as an employee, apprentice or trainee, please refer to our Employee Privacy Notice for further information.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data). For most of our suppliers, the vast majority of the data we process is not regarded as personal data. However, we do deal with a small number of sole traders. For sole traders, more aspect of the data is regarded as personal data. We apply appropriate standards of security to all data that we process. Please refer to the Security section to understand this further.
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms and processes we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to perform our contract with you and to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship. If you work for a limited company, the personal data will be minimal, but if you operate as a sole trader, there will be more data that is regarded as personal.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses
Date of birth
Bank account details, and tax status information
Credit history
CCTV footage and other information obtained through electronic means such as swipe/access card record
Information about your use of our information and communications systems
Photographs
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information during the on-boarding process, either directly from you or sometimes from your employer or credit check provider.
We may collect additional personal information in the course of job-related activities throughout the period for which you work with us.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to perform our contract with you.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Determining the terms on which you work for us
Administering the contract we have entered into with you
Business management and planning, including accounting and auditing
Conducting performance reviews, managing performance and determining performance requirements
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or other employees, workers and contractors, including accidents at work
Complying with health and safety obligations
Invitations to events, meetings, business briefings or other direct communication with you to add value to our relationship with you
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to the contract we have with you (most importantly so that we perform it properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer the contract we have with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the relationship we have with you: contract, finance, tax and treasury management, events training and conferences, business meetings with you or our clients.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law. This may include making returns to government revenue & customs or local tax office, or disclosures to other regulators.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to provide you with our services, perform a contract with you or to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses
Date of birth
Bank account details or other payment details
CCTV footage and other information obtained through electronic means
Information about your use of our information and communications systems
Photographs
If you received subsidies on goods or services, we may collect data to determine if you are eligible for the subsidy
Health or allergen information
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information either directly from you or sometimes from a third party.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations when providing our services to you or under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to provide our services to you or perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Providing you with food or our services
Processing payments or refunds
Administering the contract we have entered into with you
Business management and planning, including accounting and auditing
Conducting performance reviews, managing performance and determining performance requirements
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or other employees, workers and contractors, including accidents at our place of work
Complying with health and safety obligations
Where you have given your consent, use your image for internal or external marketing or promotion, the purpose of which will be documented when you gave your consent
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
Checking the eligibility of subsidies
We may process certain health or allergen information about you if you require a medical or special diet. Where you do, we will only process this personal data to provide you your meal, and statistical analysis. In some of our business contracts, we may be acting as the data processor of our client. Any personal data will be collected directly from you, your parent or guardian, or sometimes our client.
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to providing our services to you (most importantly so that we provide them properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer our service provision, or our contract with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: receiving payment for the services we provide, product or service quality assurance, marketing where we have your consent or a legitimate interest and meeting our health and safety obligations including accident and incident management.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to provide you with our services, perform a contract with you or to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses
Date of birth
Bank account details or other payment details
CCTV footage and other information obtained through electronic means
Information about your use of our information and communications systems
Photographs
Voice recordings online with this facility. You will be informed if call is recorded
Health or allergen information
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information either directly from you or sometimes from a third party.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations when providing our services to you or under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to provide our services to you or perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Providing you with food or our services
Processing payments or refunds
Administering the contract we have entered into with you
Business management and planning, including accounting and auditing
Conducting performance reviews, managing performance and determining performance requirements
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or other employees, workers and contractors, including accidents at our place of work
Complying with health and safety obligations
Where you have given your consent, use your image for internal or external marketing or promotion, the purpose of which will be documented when you gave your consent
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may process certain health or allergen information about you if you require a medical or special diet. Where you do, we will only process this personal data to provide you your meal, and statistical analysis. In some of our business contracts, we may be acting as the data processor of our client. Any personal data will be collected directly from you, your parent or guardian, or sometimes our client.
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to providing our services to you (most importantly so that we provide them properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer our service provision, or our contract with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: receiving payment for the services we provide, product or service quality assurance, marketing where we have your consent or a legitimate interest and meeting our health and safety obligations including accident and incident management.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to provide you with our services, perform a contract with you or to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses
Date of birth
Bank account details or other payment details
CCTV footage and other information obtained through electronic means
Information about your use of our information and communications systems
Photographs
Voice recordings online with this facility. You will be informed if call is recorded
Health information if it is relevant to the operation of the facility e.g. relating to the use of any gym or sports facilities
Allergen information
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information either directly from you or sometimes from a third party.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations when providing our services to you or under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to provide our services to you or perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Providing you with food or our services
Processing payments or refunds
Administering the contract we have entered into with you
Business management and planning, including accounting and auditing
Conducting performance reviews, managing performance and determining performance requirements
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or other employees, workers and contractors, including accidents at our place of work
Complying with health and safety obligations
Ensuring that sports activities are appropriate for you
To detect or prevent fraud
Where you have given your consent, use your image for internal or external marketing or promotion, the purpose of which will be documented when you gave your consent
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may process certain health or allergen information about you if you require a medical or special diet. Where you do, we will only process this personal data to provide you your meal, and statistical analysis. In some of our business contracts, we may be acting as the data processor of our client. Any personal data will be collected directly from you, your parent or guardian, or sometimes our client.
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to providing our services to you (most importantly so that we provide them properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer our service provision, or our contract with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: receiving payment for the services we provide, product or service quality assurance, marketing where we have your consent or a legitimate interest and meeting our health and safety obligations including accident and incident management.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online forms we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, we are likely to be collecting your personal information when you register for an app account, we provide you with our services, perform a contract with you or to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses
Date of birth
Bank account details or other payment details
Information about your use of our information and communications systems including transactional data
Profile data including your username and password (in those circumstances where you might have a technological relationship with us through a smartphone or computer), purchases or orders made by you, your interests, preferences, feedback and survey responses
Marketing and Communications Data may include your preferences in receiving marketing or service messages from us and will reflect your communication preferences. You will not be contacted for third party marketing purposes unless you have given us your express consent to do so
Location data may include your location, the location of your device or where the facility that serves you is located. You select the unit or location that you wish to use.
Voice recordings online with this facility. You will be informed if call is recorded.
The location data are selected by you so that we can offer you relevant menu and booking information for the location of the services we offer. We have a legitimate interest to know the location of the service you want us to offer you, but you can adjust this through your settings.
Where you receive marketing communications, we may use your contact information to market similar goods and services that you already used or purchased. You may object to us using your data for marketing purposes at any time by contacting us directly or adjusting your settings. If you contact us, we will use the information to give to manage your request.
We process payment information to receive payment for the goods or services you buy from us and, if you choose and the function is available, to hold a credit balance on your account. We partner with several payment providers to process card payments. We carry out due diligence on our partners to ensure their PCI compliance and we have standard contractual clauses in place with them. Our systems do not process any payment information or card details. Your payment is processed by our payment provider and the pseudonymised transactional data is then shared with us.
Information that we collect from your use of the app
Technical Data may include internet protocol (IP) address, login data, browser type and version, time zone setting and location, browser plug-in types and versions, operating system and platform and other technology on the devices you use to access any of our websites
Usage Data may include information about how you use our websites and purchase our products and services.
We also collect, use and share Aggregated Data such as statistical or demographic data that may be derived from your personal data but is not considered personal data as this data does not directly or indirectly reveal your identity. For example, we may aggregate your Usage Data to calculate the percentage of users buying a product.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information either directly from you or sometimes from a third party, for example we may receive a list of new users to set up with accounts from our client.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations when providing our services to you or under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to provide our services to you or perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Providing you with food or our services
Processing payments or refunds
Administering your account or the contract we have entered into with you
Presenting you with discounts or additional offers based on your preferences or agreements with our clients
Business management and planning, including accounting and auditing
Dealing with legal disputes involving you
Complying with obligations to ensure your health and safety when purchasing our goods or services
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to providing our services to you (most importantly so that we provide them properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer our service provision, or our contract with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: receiving payment for the services we provide, product or service quality assurance, marketing where we have your consent or a legitimate interest and meeting our health and safety obligations including accident and incident management.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online forms we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, we are likely to be collecting your personal information when you register for an app account, we provide you with our services, perform a contract with you or to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and/or email addresses
Date of birth
Bank account details or other payment details
Information about your use of our information and communications systems including transactional data
Profile data including your username and password (in those circumstances where you might have a technological relationship with us through a smartphone or computer), purchases or orders made by you, your interests, preferences, feedback and survey responses
Marketing and Communications Data may include your preferences in receiving marketing or service messages from us and will reflect your communication preferences. You will not be contacted for third party marketing purposes unless you have given us your express consent to do so
Location data may include your location, the location of your device or where the facility that serves you is located. You select the unit or location that you wish to use
Your image that are captured on cameras inside the unit.
The location data are selected by you so that we can offer you relevant information for the location of the services we offer. We have a legitimate interest to know the location of the service you want us to offer you, but you can adjust this through your settings.
Where you receive marketing communications, we may use your contact information to market similar goods and services that you already used or purchased. You may object to us using your data for marketing purposes at any time by contacting us directly or adjusting your settings. If you contact us, we will use the information to give to manage your request.
We process payment information to receive payment for the goods or services you buy from us and, if you choose and the function is available, to hold a credit balance on your account. We partner with several payment providers to process card payments. We carry out due diligence on our partners to ensure their PCI compliance and we have standard contractual clauses in place with them. Our systems do not process any payment information or card details. Your payment is processed by our payment provider and the pseudonymised transaction data is then shared with us.
In 'frictionless' retail units, we capture your image. We then process these images to create a pseudonymised avatar and associate a unique ID. We use machine learning to infer over 30 joints (or key points) on the body. We monitor the movements and gestures of this avatar to determine the products that you choose and will charge your account for those goods. If you select goods and leave the unit with those goods, you will be charged for those goods. Please refer to the Specific Terms and Conditions for full details. We do not use facial recognition technologies as you move around the unit, so we do not process this special category of personal data.
Information that we collect from your use of the app
Technical Data may include internet protocol (IP) address, login data, browser type and version, time zone setting and location, browser plug-in types and versions, operating system and platform and other technology on the devices you use to access any of our websites
Usage Data may include information about how you use our websites and purchase our products and services.
We also collect, use and share Aggregated Data such as statistical or demographic data that may be derived from your personal data but is not considered personal data as this data does not directly or indirectly reveal your identity. For example, we may aggregate your Usage Data to calculate the percentage of users buying a product.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information either directly from you or sometimes from a third party, for example we may receive a list of new users to set up with accounts from our client. We capture your image from equipment installed in the unit.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations when providing our services to you or under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to provide our services to you or perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Providing you with food or our services
Processing payments, receipts or refunds
Administering your account or the contract we have entered into with you
Presenting you with discounts or additional offers based on your preferences or agreements with our clients
Business management and planning, including accounting and auditing
Dealing with legal disputes involving you
Complying with obligations to ensure your health and safety when purchasing our goods or services
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to providing our services to you (most importantly so that we provide them properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Resolving disputes
In normal use, we use digital images which are not regarded as biometric data. In any case where there may be a dispute, for example if you were to query a transaction, we would review these digital images to identify you, and this would then be classified as special category of personal data, and only be processed as part of our contract with you.
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
In 'frictionless' retail units, we capture your image. We then process these images to create a pseudonymised avatar. We use machine learning to infer over 30 joints (or key points) on the body. We monitor the movements and gestures of this avatar to determine the products that you choose and will charge your account for those goods. If you select goods and leave the unit with those goods, you will be charged for those goods. Please refer to the Specific Terms and Conditions for full details.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer our service provision, or our contract with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: receiving payment for the services we provide, product or service quality assurance, marketing where we have your consent or a legitimate interest and meeting our health and safety obligations including accident and incident management.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms and processes we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to perform our contract with you and to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship. If you work for a limited company, the personal data will be minimal, but if you operate as a sole trader, there will be more data that is regarded as personal.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses. This information is about you at your place of work and your organisation contracts with us to provide services.
CCTV footage and other information obtained through electronic means such as swipe/access card record
Voice recordings during the sales process or to manage our service to you. We may record calls to improve our processes, or for training purposes. May may refer back to recordings or transcripts of calls to check details we agreed during the call to improve our service to you or in the case of any dispute. Our systems may process the recordings to help identify trends or profile prospects or customers. We have carried out a data protection impact assessment to document the controls we put in place to process special category of personal data and the profiling we may carry out.
You will be informed if the call is recorded.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information during the pre-contract or tendering process, either directly from you or sometimes from your employer or tender portal provider.
We may collect additional personal information in the course of job-related activities throughout the period you work with us.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Business development activity
Preparing contract or tender documents
Determining the terms on which you work with us
Administering the contract we have entered into with your organisation
Business management and planning, including accounting and auditing
Conducting performance reviews, managing performance and determining performance requirements
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or your organisation, including accidents at work
Complying with health and safety obligations
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to the contract we have with you (most importantly so that we perform it properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer the contract we have with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: contract, finance, tax and treasury management.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law. This may include making returns to government revenue & customs or local tax office, or disclosures to other regulators.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to provide you with our services, perform a contract with you or to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, email addresses, and vehicle registration number
CCTV footage and other information obtained through electronic means
Information about your use of our information and communications systems
Photographs
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information either directly from you or sometimes from a third party.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations when providing our services to you or under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to provide our services to you or perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Business management and planning, including accounting and auditing
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or other employees, workers and contractors, including accidents at our place of work
Complying with health and safety obligations
Where you have given your consent, use your image for internal or external marketing or promotion, the purpose of which will be documented when you gave your consent
To detect or prevent theft or fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to providing appropriate facilities for you (most importantly so that we provide them properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help operate our facilities.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us: providing access to, security for, or the safe management of our facilities, including the monitoring of and processing of CCTV and ANPR technologies.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms and processes we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to perform our contract with you and to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship. If you work for a limited company, the personal data will be minimal, but if you operate as a sole trader, there will be more data that is regarded as personal.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses
Date of birth
Bank account details, and tax status information
Credit history
Information about your use of our information and communications systems
Photographs
Voice recordings online with this facility. You will be informed if call is recorded.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information during the on-boarding process, either directly from you or sometimes from your employer or credit check provider.
We may collect additional personal information in the course of job-related activities throughout the period for which you work with us.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Determining the terms on which you work for us
Administering the contract we have entered into with you
Business management and planning, including accounting and auditing
Conducting performance reviews, managing performance and determining performance requirements
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or other employees, workers and contractors, including accidents at work
Complying with health and safety obligations
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to the contract we have with you (most importantly so that we perform it properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making, unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer the contract we have with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: contract, finance, tax and treasury management.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law. This may include making returns to government revenue & customs or local tax office, or disclosures to other regulators.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to provide you with our services, perform a contract with you or to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses. This information could be about you at your place of work, or at home.
Information about your use of our information and communications systems
Voice recordings during the sales process or to manage our service to you. We may record calls to improve our processes, or for training purposes. May may refer back to recordings or transcripts of calls to check details we agreed during the call to improve our service to you or in the case of any dispute. Our systems may process the recordings to help identify trends or profile prospects or customers. We have carried out a data protection impact assessment to document the controls we put in place to process special category of personal data and the profiling we may carry out.
You will be informed if the call is recorded.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information either directly from you or sometimes from a third party.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to tell you about our goods or services, or perform our contract with you if we already have one.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
This section makes a clear distinction between marketing communications, i.e. communicates that sell our goods or services, or to collect to help it (or others) to contact people for marketing purposes at a later date, and genuine service or market research communications. Direct marketing rules do not apply to the later.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests. For example, if we believe that we can offer you similar services to those you have either bought from us or expressed an interest in buying from us. In these circumstances, it won’t surprise you to hear from us, unless you’ve expressly asked us not to. All of our communications to you will give you that option and you can tell us at any time.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Tell you about our food or services
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
If we are marketing our goods and services to you at work, we are essentially marketing to your organisation rather than directly to you. That means that we may have sent unsolicited communications to you. However, we recognise that people work in the organisation we market our goods and services to. Your personal information is just that; personal to you, and you have the same rights. Please let us know if you do not want to receive this these communications. If you’d prefer those communications go to another role in your organisation, please let us know.
If we are marketing to you at home, we will not send unsolicited communications to you unless you have given us your consent to do so, or we have a legitimate interest in sending you information about goods or services similar to those you have either previously bought or expressed an interest in buying from us.
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to providing our services to you (most importantly so that we provide them properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making, unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer our service provision, our contract with you, or how we communicate with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the relationship we have with you: receiving payment for the services we provide, product or service quality assurance, and marketing where we have your consent or a legitimate interest.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms and processes we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to perform our contract with you and to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship. If you work for a limited company, the personal data will be minimal, but if you operate as a sole trader, there will be more data that is regarded as personal.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses. This information could be about you at your place of work and your organisation contracts with us to provide services, or at home if you have bought food or services from us at a public venue.
Photographs
There may be other aspects of personal data we ask for in the survey or competition. If that is the case, we will explain the purpose of this within the survey or competition itself, and it will be supported by this Privacy Notice.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information when you complete the survey or enter a competition. This may be a paper or digital tool, or may be via one of our apps.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations under the terms of the survey or competition
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Processing the outcomes of the survey or competition
Making improvements to our food or services
Understanding how you use our services
Understanding how we interact with you and helping us improve
Understanding your use of our marketing channels and which produces the best outcomes for consumers and our operations
Conducting performance reviews, managing performance and determining performance requirements
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or your organisation, including accidents at work
Complying with health and safety obligations
Where you have given your consent, use your image for internal or external marketing or promotion, the purpose of which will be documented when you gave your consent
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
Other specific requirements set out in the introduction to specific surveys or competitions
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to the contract we have with you (most importantly so that we perform it properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making, unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer the delivery, use of or assessment of the survey or competition.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: service improvement, product improvement, operational and support improvements, as well as the delivery of the survey, how the survey operates and any assessment of completed surveys, processing the entries of the competition, fulfilling winners of the competition, processing any marketing consent given as part of the competition.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law. This may include making returns to government revenue & customs or local tax office, or disclosures to other regulators.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms and processes we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to perform our contract with you and to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship. If you work for a limited company, the personal data will be minimal, but if you operate as a sole trader, there will be more data that is regarded as personal.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, email addresses and profile information. This information could be about you at your place of work and your organisation contracts with us to provide services, or at home if you have bought food or services from us at a public venue.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information when you send us a message or interact with our social media channel. This may be via one of our apps.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Responding to your engagement with us
Making improvements to our food or services
Understanding how you use our services
Understanding how we interact with you and helping us improve
Understanding your use of our marketing channels and which produces the best outcomes for consumers and our operations
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or your organisation, including accidents at work
Complying with health and safety obligations
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify your use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to the contract we have with you (most importantly so that we perform it properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making, unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer the delivery, use of social media accounts.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: service improvement, product improvement, operational and support improvements, as well as the operation of our social media accounts.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law. This may include making returns to government revenue & customs or local tax office, or disclosures to other regulators.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms and processes we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to perform our contract with you and to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship. If you work for a limited company, the personal data will be minimal, but if you operate as a sole trader, there will be more data that is regarded as personal.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, email addresses and profile information. This information could be about you at your place of work and your organisation contracts with us to provide services, or at home if you have bought food or services from us at a public venue.
IP address, cookies and tracking technologies. The use of these technologies is covered in a separate Policy which can be found on our websites.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information when you send us a message, interact with our social media channels or visit our websites. This may be via one of our apps.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where want try to provide a tailored experience of our digital presence
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Responding to your engagement with us
Making improvements to our food or services
Understanding how you use our services
Understanding how we interact with you and helping us improve
Understanding your use of our web sites or marketing channels, and which produces the best outcomes for consumers and our operations
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or your organisation, including accidents at work
Complying with health and safety obligations
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify your use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to the contract we have with you (most importantly so that we perform it properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making, unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer the delivery, use of our websites or digital platforms.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: service improvement, product improvement, operational and support improvements, as well as the operation of our social media accounts.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law. This may include making returns to government revenue & customs or local tax office, or disclosures to other regulators.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms and processes we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to perform our contract with you and to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship. If you work for a limited company, the personal data will be minimal, but if you operate as a sole trader, there will be more data that is regarded as personal.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses. This information could be about you at your place of work, or at home.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information when you sign up for the newsletter. This may be a paper or digital tool, or may be via one of our apps.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests. For example, if we believe that we can offer you similar services to those you have either bought from us or expressed an interest in. In these circumstances, it won’t surprise you to hear from us, unless you’ve expressly asked us not to. All of our communications to you will give you that option.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Provide you with the communications you want from us
Making improvements to our food or services
Understanding how you use our services
Understanding how we interact with you and helping us improve
Understanding your use of our marketing channels and which produces the best outcomes for consumers and our operations
Conducting performance reviews, managing performance and determining performance requirements
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or your organisation, including accidents at work
Complying with health and safety obligations
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to the contract we have with you (most importantly so that we perform it properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making, unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to maintain our relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help develop and deliver our communications to consumers, clients or members of the public.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: developing relevant communications, delivery of our communications, reviewing and assessing the delivery methods we use.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law. This may include making returns to government revenue & customs or local tax office, or disclosures to other regulators.
We will only use your personal information for the purposes for which we collected it, unless we reasonably consider that we need to use it for another reason and that reason is compatible with the original purpose. If we need to use your personal information for an unrelated purpose, we will notify you and we will explain the legal basis which allows us to do so.
Please note that we may process your personal information without your knowledge or consent, in compliance with the above rules, where this is required or permitted by law.
If you fail to provide certain information when requested, we may not be able to perform the contract we have with you, or we may be prevented from complying with our legal obligations (such as to ensure we comply with our health and safety obligations) or you may not be permitted to enter operational sites.
You have rights under data protection laws in relation to your personal data. Under certain circumstances your rights are as follows:
Request access to your personal data
(commonly known as a "data subject access request" or “DSAR”). This enables you to receive a copy of the personal data we hold about you in order to check that we are processing it lawfully
Request correction of the personal data that we hold about you
. This enables you to have any incomplete or inaccurate data we hold about you corrected, though we may need to verify the accuracy of the new data you provide to us
Request erasure of your personal data
. This enables you to ask us to delete or remove personal data where you believe we have no legitimate reason for continuing to process it. You also have the right to ask us to delete or remove your personal data where you have successfully exercised your right to object to processing (see below), where we may have processed your information unlawfully or where we are required to erase your personal data to comply with local law. Note, however, that we may not always be obliged to comply fully with your request of erasure for specific legal reasons which will be notified to you, if applicable, at the time of your request
Object to processing of your personal data
where we are relying on a legitimate interest (or those of a third party) and there is something about your situation which makes you want to object to processing on this ground as you feel it impacts on your fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we might demonstrate that we have compelling legitimate grounds to process your information which override your rights and freedoms
Request restriction of processing of your personal data
. This enables you to ask us to suspend the processing of your personal data in the following scenarios: (a) if you want us to establish the data's accuracy; (b) where our use of the data is unlawful but you do not want us to erase it; (c) where you need us to hold the data even if we no longer require it as you need it to establish, exercise or defend legal claims; or (d) you have objected to our use of your data but we need to verify whether we have overriding legitimate grounds to use it
Request the transfer of your personal data to you or to a third party
. We will provide to you, or a third party you have chosen, your personal data in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format. Note that this right only applies to automated information which you initially provided consent for us to use or where we used the information to perform a contract with you. Again, it is subject to any overriding legal, accounting and reporting rights we might have to retain copies of your data; and
Withdraw consent at any time where we are relying on consent to process your personal data
. However, this will not affect the lawfulness of any processing carried out before you withdraw your consent. If you withdraw your consent, we may not be able to provide certain products or services to you. We will advise you if this is the case at the time you withdraw your consent.
If you wish to exercise any of the rights set out above, please contact us at DPO@compass-group.co.uk
No fee usually required
You will not have to pay a fee to access your personal data (or to exercise any of the other rights). However, we may charge a reasonable fee if your request is clearly unfounded, repetitive or excessive. Alternatively, we may refuse to comply with your request in these circumstances.
What we may need from you
We may need to request specific information from you to help us confirm your identity and ensure your right to access your personal data (or to exercise any of your other rights). This is a security measure to ensure that personal data is not disclosed to any person who has no right to receive it. We may also contact you to ask you for further information in relation to your request to speed up our response.
Time limit to respond
We try to respond to all legitimate requests within one month. Occasionally it may take us longer than a month if your request is particularly complex or you have made several requests. In this case, we will notify you and keep you updated.
How long will you use my information for?
We will only retain your personal information for as long as necessary to fulfil the purposes we collected it for, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, accounting, or reporting requirements.
We maintain a Document and Data Retention Policy and record the retention period for data relating to each activity in our Records of Processing as defined in data protection legislation.
To determine the appropriate retention period for personal data, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the personal data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorised use or disclosure of your personal data, the purposes for which we process your personal data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal requirements.
In some circumstances we may anonymise your personal information so that it can no longer be associated with you, in which case we may use such information without further notice to you.
Once we no longer need to process your personal information, we will securely destroy your personal information in accordance with our Document and Data Retention Policy which is informed by the applicable laws and regulations that we are required to take into account.
At the end of
a client
contract to provide goods or services, we may share your personal data
as part of the staff transfer process
. This may be with our client or any new service provider. We do this to minimise the impact of any change of service provider of the goods or services
that
our client uses
. Any data sharing will be carried out in line with Data Sharing Code of Practice. We will document the data sharing and the controls we put in place to protect and respect your personal data. If there is likely to be high risk to you associated with this data sharing, we will carry out a Data Protection Impact Assessment (DPIA) at the start of the design of the data sharing so that we ensure we develop appropriate controls.
We have put in place appropriate security measures to prevent your personal data from being accidentally lost, used or accessed in an unauthorised way, altered or disclosed.
In addition, we limit access to your personal data strictly to those employees, agents, contractors and other third parties who have a need to know that data in order to further the transaction in which we are both concerned. They will only process your personal data on our instructions, and they are subject to a duty of confidentiality.
Whilst we are in control of our own data environment unfortunately the transmission of information via the internet is not always completely secure. Our organisations policy is to only send personal data through an encrypted format.
This makes it as secure as possible, but it is still not completely secure. You should be aware that if you send us anything in an unencrypted format that we will not be able to secure it until it has securely entered our network. As such any transmission is at your own risk. We have put in place procedures to deal with any suspected personal data breach and will notify you and any applicable regulator of a breach where we are legally required to do so and, in a format, and within timescales stipulated by the applicable regulator or the applicable data protection legislation.
You also play a part in ensuring the security of your personal data. We recommend that you choose a password that is unique to our service. You are responsible for keeping this password confidential. Please do not share this password with anyone else. We will not be liable for any unauthorised transactions performed through our service where the user's credentials have been compromised.
Where we, or our partners, process your personal information outside the UK or EEA, you can expect an essentially equivalent degree of protection in respect of your personal information (and certainly no less than expected in the data protection legislation in relation to the countries and entities which process your information). Where we do process your personal data outside the UK or EEA, we would only to so in order to carry out activities to operate our business and support the processing of personal data we need to carry out. This processing may include special category of personal data and this will depend on the activity being carried out by us or our partners. Such processing would be made only on terms that meet the UK or EU’s expectations in terms of the countries where that data is being processed and the specific terms on which the data processor is retained by us so that the process provides an adequate level of protection for your personal information. Your data will be processed in the UK, EU and US, but may be processed in other jurisdictions, such as India or other third countries, where we have service providers or data processors. In most circumstances, we rely on approved standard contract clauses (SCC) which we include in our agreements with data processors and service providers, but may also rely on other mechanisms recognised in data protection legislation including an International Data Transfer Agreement (IDTA) in the UK.
We use Office 365, which offers a suite of applications we use in our daily operations. These include for example Outlook, Word and Excel, but also other applications are included in our subscription. The data within our Office 365 tenant are processed in the US. Our contract with Microsoft is supported by a Data Processing Agreement which details the controls we have in place to protect and respect personal data, and which complies with UK and Irish law on international transfers of data.
You have the right to make a complaint at any time to your local supervisory authority.
In the UK that is the Information Commissioner's Office (ICO) (www.ico.org.uk)
In Ireland that is the Data Protection Commission (DPC) (www.dataprotection.ie)
We would, however, appreciate the chance to deal with your
concerns
before you approach the ICO or the DPC; so please contact us in the first instance.
Full name of legal entity
Compass Group, UK and Ireland Limited
Who to contact
Data Protection Officer
Email address
DPO@compass-group.co.uk
Postal address
Parklands Court, 24 Parklands, Birmingham Great Park, Rubery, Birmingham. B45 9PZ
2/14/2025, 9:50:24 AM
Cookies Button
By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts. For more information about cookies and how we use them, please click on the cookie icon.
Read our cookie policy.
Accept All Cookies
Reject All
Customise
Cookie Policy and Privacy Preference Centre
When you visit our website, we use cookies, which are small files of letter and numbers which sits on your device or browser and assists with information flow and functionality. 
This Cookie Policy Statement explains how Compass Group UK&I Limited (“Compass”, "we", "us", and "ours") use cookies and similar technologies when you visit one of our websites. It explains what these technologies are and why we use them, as well as your rights to control our use of them. 
If you have any queries in relation to data protection, please email us at gdpr@compass-group.co.uk. 
Your privacy is important to us and we want to be transparent about the types of cookies used by this Website. 
For more information about the cookies we use, please click on the icon below to expand the selection and see the cookie details
Read our cookie policy.
User ID:
0b2df225-7a42-4a69-9f78-dd5c1b1ca16d
This User ID will be used as a unique identifier while storing and accessing your preferences for future. Please make a note of this ID.
Timestamp:
--
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages.    If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Other cookies
Targeting Cookies
Switch Label
label
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites.    They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Performance Cookies
Switch Label
label
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site.    All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookies Details‎
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms.    You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 1
https://shop.avfc.co.uk/en/astonvilla-privacy-policy/ch-1422:
Help Centre
Privacy Policy
Last updated: January 15, 2025
This privacy policy on this page (“Privacy Policy”) lets you know what happens to any
    personal data that you provide to us, or any that we may collect, observe
    and/or infer about you. If you need any more information, contact us at
privacy@fanatics.co.uk
.This Privacy Policy was last updated on January 15, 2025 to better communicate how we use your personal data and your rights in
    relation to it.
The Privacy Policy describes how Fanatics
    (International) Limited, together with its subsidiaries or affiliates
    (collectively, "Fanatics,” “we,”
    “our,” or “us”) uses, discloses, and otherwise processes your personal data
    collected when you visit our websites, use our mobile applications (“apps”),
    purchase something from us through the websites, apps, but also through
    in-venue/event purchases we offer or in-person/online events we may organize
    (collectively our “Properties”),contact us by telephone or email
    (e.g., in the context of contacting our customer services team) or receive a
    communication from us or otherwise interact with us on our social media
    channels, surveys or advertising.
We share some of your personal data with Aston
    Villa Football Club Limited (“Aston Villa F.C.”) who shall be the controller of
    that data shared with them. Their
Privacy
        Policy
sets out how they will use
    this data. For purposes of this Privacy Policy, Aston Villa F.C. will act as a
    Business Partner (as defined below). Please see Section 8 for additional information about the sharing of
    your personal data with Aston Villa F.C.
Table of Contents
1. About us and how to contact us
2. What personal data do we process and what are their sources?
3. How do we use your personal data?
5. Third-Party Websites and Social Media Services
6. Children’s Data
7. Social Media, Widgets and Open Forums
8. Who do we share personal data with and where are they?
9. How long do we keep your information for?
10. Updates to this Privacy Policy
1.
    About us and how to contact us
We are Fanatics (International) Limited, the
    controller of your personal data processed from visitors to
    our website/mobile application, our Properties, or as otherwise identified
    in this Privacy Policy. You can contact us at
privacy@fanatics.co.uk
to exercise your privacy rights. Our address is Stubbs Mill, Upper Kirby Street,
    Manchester M4 6FN.
2.
    What personal data do we process and what are their sources?
Sources of
        the personal data
We collect
    information from you when you visit and interact with our websites“ and apps”,
    purchase something from us through our “Properties”, contact us by
    telephone or email (e.g., in the context of contacting our customer services
    team) or receive a communication from us or otherwise interact with us on our
    social media channels, our advertising.
We may also collect information about you from our
    Fanatics group entities (such as our affiliates, including parent and sister
    companies to the extent they also collect personal data about you), services
    providers, other third parties that provide information to us, such as Business
    Partners (as defined below), advertising networks, public sources, social media
    platforms and networks, third party log-in services, data
    enrichment services, and organizations that prepare events with/for us.
You are not
    required to provide your personal data to us, however, if you do not provide us
    with certain information (such as Transaction Information or Contact
    Information), we may not be able to fulfil your order.
We may
    combine information that we receive from the various sources and make
    inferences from the information to create a profile about you reflecting your
    preferences and characteristics.
Categories of
        personal data we process
Category of
        personal data:
Contact
    Information.
Examples of your personal data:
Name, Email
    Address, Telephone Number, or information regarding your attendance at a
    venue/event, in case of an in-venue/event sale (e.g., your seat number or
    sector where you are seated so we can deliver/arrange the pickup of your
    order).
Category of
        personal data:
Transaction
    Information.
Examples of your personal data:
Purchase
    details, delivery details, payment details, age or date of birth information,
    and any communications we have about your purchase.
Category of
        personal data:
Legal
    Information.
Examples of your personal data:
Fraud checks or
    flags raised about your transactions, payment card refusals, complaints and
    information related to their resolution, legal requests.
Category of
        personal data:
Preference
    Information.
Examples of your personal data:
Your marketing
    preferences, your account settings including any default preferences, any
    preferences we have observed and/or inferred, such as the types of offers that
    interest you (e.g., what teams/sports you like, which types of products are
    your favourite, etc.), or the areas of our website that you visit, likelihood
    that you will (not) interact with our Properties in a certain way (e.g., how
    (un)likely are you to buy merchandise from certain teams/leagues).
Category of
        personal data:
Communications.
Examples
        of your personal data:
Communications we may have with you, whether
    relating to a transaction or not. Please note that we keep all written
    communications and record calls to our customer services team.
Category of
        personal data:
Account
    Information.
Examples of your personal data:
Your name,
    password, account ID and other information specifically associated with your
    account.If you have account with us, we may associate your activity
    on and off our Properties with your account, such as Transaction Information,
    Contact Information, Observed Information, and other data.
Category
        of personal data:
Other Voluntary Information
Examples
        of your personal data:
Voluntary information you provide/indicate to
    us/allow us to collect other than the above, such as your age or date of birth, gender, favourite teams or players, responses to
    surveys or competition entries, or pictures/videos of you, authorisations
    (e.g., given to third party log-in services), or consents you have given to us.
Category of
        personal data:
Observed
    Information.
Examples of your personal data:
Online and other
    electronic activity that is gathered automatically when you visit or interact
    with our Properties, communications and advertisements, or those of our service
    providers, Business Partners, or other third parties that share information with
    us.
This includes details of your online browsing
    activities, such as the pages, products or areas that you visit and
    communications that you interact with (such as when you open an email/text
    message you received from us), the date and time you access/open them, the
    operating system you are using or which link has brought you to a particular
    website/advertisement (e.g., when you clicked on it in an email
    communications/other websites). We also collect your device and other
    identifiers (such as advertising IDs, pixel, and cookie IDs (see our
Cookie Policy
), and IP
    address) and other information we may infer about you, such as a geographical
    region, based on your IP address; income and gender based on your geographical
    region or purchases, and how you feel about our brand, based on social media
    data.
Our
    third-party service providers may allow us to append additional information
    they observed or inferred about you, such as income and gender, to help us
    understand additional characteristics about you.
3.
    How do we use your personal data?
We
    use the data we collect about you for various purposes. European/UK/Swiss
    data protection legislation sets out specific “lawful bases” for processing
    personal data. The below sets out under which basis we process different
    information about you and explains the purpose of that processing.
Lawful basis
        and purpose: Consent
to us or to our
    affiliates/Business Partners or other third parties sending you direct marketing communications (e.g., through emails, SMS,
    or other digital channels) in accordance with the preferences you select when
    you sign up to receive updates or purchase products, or where you ask us to
    send you abandoned cart emails (where you have placed items in your basket but
    not completed your order). Where you provided your consent, we will keep such
    consent to as evidence (including where we collected such consent on behalf of
    a third party). We may rely on our
Legitimate Interest
to send
    you direct marketing communications if you provide us with your Contact
    Information in the course of a sale (or negotiations for a sale) of a product
    or service (for example if you bought a merchandise on our website). On the
    basis of legitimate interest, we may also ask you to review our services and
    products on third party websites, respond to customer satisfaction surveys to
    measure and report on customer satisfaction and loyalty as well as to improve our
    customer service efforts, unless we are specifically required to ask for your
    consent by law. You can always change your preferences/opt-out of these
    communications via the unsubscribe link on any communication from us. If you
    created an account with us, you can also change your preferences there. Direct
    marketing communications may include a technology (called a web beacon)
    that unobtrusively collects analytics or other electronic network
    activity, such as whether you have received or opened the communication,
    clicked a link in the communication and technical information such as your IP
    address and information about your device. We may also combine your personal
    data collected through direct marketing communications, surveys, and other
    technologies with personal data we collected through other channels for the
    same purposes as outlined in this Privacy Policy.
What personal data do we
        use?
Contact Information, Other Voluntary Information and Observed
    Information.
Lawful basis
        and purpose: Consent to us/our legitimate interest to:
provide you with high-quality customer support,
    improve overall customer experience and resolve disputes by recording calls you
    make to our customer support team. More precisely, we record these calls for
    the following purposes:
(i)
Quality assurance
: Call recordings are used to ensure that our customer support
    team is following our protocols and provides accurate and helpful information
    to you as a customer. This is important for maintaining high standards of
    customer service and ensuring that all customers receive a consistent level of
    service.
(ii)
Training
: Call recordings are often used to train new members of the customer
    support team, providing real-world examples of how to handle customer issues
    and inquiries. These recordings can also be used to train existing team members
    to improve their skills and learn new techniques for handling difficult
    customer situations.
(iii)
Dispute resolution
: Call recordings can be used as evidence in the event of
    disputes. They can provide a detailed record of what was said during a call,
    which can be used to resolve any misunderstandings or disputes that arise.
When recording
    calls, we commit to comply with applicable data protection law, which may amongst
    others require us to provide specific notice to you, offer you the possibility
    (as applicable) to opt-in or opt-out to call recordings, or to delete your
    personal data retained for this purpose after a certain period.
What
        personal data do we use?
Contact Information, Communications, Other
    Voluntary Information and Transaction Data.
Lawful basis
        and purpose: Our legitimate interests:
tomanage our social media presence, engage with you, and analyse
    social media data in order to resolve issues and improve our brand perception, product
    and service offering. This may involve
    responding to comments and messages, monitoring brand mentions, responding to
    inquiries or complaints, initiating conversations with potential customers,
    tracking key performance indicators such as engagement rates, sentiment
    analysis, or identifying trending topics.
What personal data do we use?
Contact Information, Communications, Observed Information, and other Voluntary
    Information.
Lawful
        basis and purpose: Our legitimate interest:
to provide you with
    high-quality customer support and improve overall customer
    experience by making automated chat, chatbot, AI-driven customer support
    systems, and feedback or survey tools available to you through our Properties.
    As such, if you are contacting to us through these tools, which include
    AI-driven systems designed to assist you with common inquiries and support needs
    through different communication methods like phone calls, messaging, and text,
    your personal data and conversation content may be monitored, recorded, and
    further analysed to personalize the support you are seeking (e.g., to tailor
    responses to your needs or interests, providing a more customized experience)
    and improve user experience.
What personal data do we use?
Communications,Contact Information, Other Voluntary Information and Transaction
    Information.
Lawful basis
        and purpose: Consent
you gave us
    to send you notifications to let you know, for example, when the products/sizes
    you are interested in are back in stock.You can always change your
    preferences/opt-out of these types of communications via the unsubscribe link
    on communication from us.You may also sign up to receive specific
    notices about product or service offerings that are separate from your direct
    marketing preferences.For example, if you asked us to notify you
    when products/sizes you are interested in are back in stock, you will still
    receive these messages, even if you unsubscribed from general marketing
    messages in the marketing preference centre you accessed through your Account
    or when clicking on unsubscribe button in one of the general marketing
    messages.
What personal data do we use?
Contact
    Information.
Lawful basis
        and purpose: Consent:
To collect
    certain personal data about you via cookies or other tracking technologies (including
    session replay or screen recording tools) or from third party sources, as well
    as infer Observed Information for purposes that include:
(i)
    analytics, such as where we, sometimes with or other third
    parties, (such as our data enrichment services providers), interpret
    information to detect general trends related to what our customers like or
    dislike.These insights into customer behaviour and preferences,
    allow us to tailor our sales strategies to better target our audience and
    increase conversion rates.’
(ii)
    better targeting advertising to your interests (about our
    products, products of our affiliates or other third parties and services) such
    where we or other third parties try to build a better picture of the types of
    Properties, products, offers and communications from us, our affiliates,
    Business Partners (as defined below) and other third parties that we/they can
    provide, which you might be interested in, so that the these are more relevant
    to you.This may also include us trying to determine how likely it
    is that you will (not) interact with these (e.g., how (un)likely are you to be
    a basketball fan);
(iii)
    analysing how you interact with our Properties and webforms and
    identifying areas where you may encounter problems or confusion. This
    information can then be used to improve the user experience and make the
    Properties and webforms more intuitive and user-friendly. Similarly, this
    information can help our developers identify and troubleshoot technical issues,
    such as broken links, slow page load times, or software bugs;
(iv)
    ensuring we recognize that you are a returning customer to allow
    you to benefit from your preferred settings on our properties, and to recommend
    the intended geographic website for the location we observed you may be in
    (e.g., based on your IP address); and
(v)
    identifying your activity across devices, channels, and
    platforms for the above purposes.
Information related to cookies and trackers are
    further fully described in our
Cookie Policy
. We may rely on our
Legitimate
        Interest
to place/access cookies that are necessary for us to operate
    the website and provide other requested services to you; or where we consent is
    not required for further use of data collected through cookies or trackers on
    our Properties.
What personal data do we use?
Contact
    Information, Preference Information, Observed Information, Other Voluntary
    Information. Where possible, we will use statistical or pseudonymised data for
    these purposes.
Lawful basis
        and purpose: Our legitimate Interests:
To broaden our marketing activity to an audience, which is/may be
    interested in visiting our Properties. This means that we share details of
    existing customers with third parties, including with social media companies to
    show Fanatics products (and those of our Business Partners) to our customers
    while they are visiting such social media sites as well asto create ‘lookalike’
    audiences. We do this to build a more complete picture of the type of
    individuals who may be interested in our products and focus our marketing
    activity on those individuals. This marketing activity may occur on one of our
    Properties or on other websites that you may visit (including social media
    sites).
What personal data do we use?
Contact Information,
    Preference information, Observed Information
Lawful basis
        and purpose: Performance of our contract with you:
to fulfil your order, take payment and deliver your goods to you
    or the recipient you indicate, to deal with any complaints or any after sales
    services, including for warranty purposes, online or at a venue/event, in case
    of an in-venue/event sale.
What personal data do we use?
Transaction
    Information, Contact Information.
Lawful basis
        and purpose: Legitimate Interest of us and our Business Partners:
to fulfil your order and deliver your goods,
    where, in certain cases, we fulfil orders on behalf of our Business Partner,
    who have a contract with you, from our own stock.
What personal data do
        we use?
Transaction Information, Contact Information.
Lawful basis and purpose:
our
Legitimate interest:
to
    facilitate payment options, we share your personal data with
    our payment services providers (such as Klarna – you can find information on Klarna
here
) to assess whether you qualify for their payment options and to tailor
    the payment options for you. Your interactions with payment services providers,
    including how they process your personal data, are governed by their respective
    privacy policies.
What personal data do we use?
Transaction
    Information, Contact Information.
Lawful basis and
        purpose: Our legitimate interest
: To provide you with an option to log in
    to your account and access our services using third-party services log-in (such
    as Sign in with Google). Consult relevant service provider’s website on
    how to stop using the third-party log-in to access your Fanatics account. If you stop using the third-party log-in, we
    may retain Personal Data we received from those third parties, for other
    relevant purposes outlined in this Privacy Policy (e.g., to continue providing
    our services), in line with our standard retention practices.
What personal
        data do we use?
Contact Information, Other Voluntary Information.
Lawful basis
        and purpose: Complying with legal obligations/our legitimate interest
: To confirm your identity. To keep records
    required by law or to evidence our compliance with laws, including tax laws,
    consumer protection laws and data protection laws (e.g., to keep evidence that
    we complied with your data subject requests, to make sure we are able to
    identify you when checking whether you gave us your consent or not, e.g., based
    on cookie or other information we collect/observe/infer about you). To provide
    information to law enforcement agencies or other authorities where we are
    required to do so.
What personal data do we use?
Legal
    information, Transaction information, Communications (where relevant), Contact
    Information, Preference information.
Lawful basis
        and purpose: Our legitimate interests
: For our internal business administration, to manage customer accounts,
    including keeping general records of customers, sales, customer care and other
    interactions and to protect genuine customers and our business from fraud to
    minimise the risk of false details being used, and abuse of card details by
    fraudsters. This is necessary for us to operate efficiently, deal with any
    issues which may arise and to protect ourselves against any future legal claims
    and ourselves and others against fraudulent transactions.
What personal
        data do we use?
Transaction information, Legal information,
    Communications, Preference information, Contact information, Preference
    information, Communications, Other Voluntary information.
Lawful basis
        and purpose: our Legitimate Interests
: To manage any competitions, other promotions, or public out-reach
    activities that you have chosen to participate in. In certain
    circumstances, we may ask you to give us your
consent
with
    processing of your data, for example when we organize an event/competition for
    youth participants and would like to use your pictures/other input or to share
    this information with media for promotional purposes. Where such
    competitions/promotions are based on specific terms and conditions, we may
    process your personal data to
perform a contract
between us
    (e.g., to provide you with a discount following your request to participate in
    a Sign up & Save promotion).
What personal data do we
        use?
Transaction information, Contact Information, Preference
    information, Communications, Preference information, Other Voluntary
    information, Observed information.
Lawful basis
        and purpose:
our
Legitimate
        Interest
: When we want to hire a service provider to help us analyse/enrich
    personal data for one of the above purposes, we want to make sure that they can
    provide services we need adequately. We may share limited personal data with
    them to test/ensure quality of analytics services they offer. Where
    possible, we will use anonymised or pseudonymised data for these
    purposes.
What personal data do we use?
Contact
    Information, Other Voluntary Information, Observed Information, Preferences
    Information, Transaction Information.
4.
What are your rights and how to exercise them?
Accessthe personal data, we hold about you and obtain a
    copy of such data.
Correctinaccurate or incomplete personal data, we hold
    about you.
Ask to have your personal data erased under certain
    circumstances.
Restrict our use of your personal data under certain
    circumstances.
Ask that we transfer the information you gave us from one
    organisation to another, or give it to you. The right only applies if we are
    processing information based on your consent or under, or in talks about
    entering into a contract and the processing is automated (this is known as a
    Data Portability right).
Refuse or withdraw consent, where we ask(ed) you for one. The
    lawfulness of our processing of your data that occurred before you withdrew
    your consent will not be affected.
Object to our processing of your personal data for the those of
    the above purposes, where we rely on our legitimate interest to do so (e.g.,
    where we use third party service providers to learn additional attributes about
    our customers to improve our services and advertising). You always have the
    right to object when we process your personal data for direct marketing
    purposes (see below how).
You
    may exercise any of the rights outlined above, or for any concerns about how
    yourpersonal data is processed, by emailing us at
privacy@fanatics.co.uk
and we will try to resolve your concerns.
    However, if you consider that we are in breach of our obligations under data
    protection laws, you may lodge a complaint with the Information Commissioner’s
    Office in the United Kingdom or your home country.
Mobile
        Application-Based Opt-Outs.
Personalized Advertising
. To the extent we have launched an App, you
    may opt out of certain personalization of advertisements on mobile applications
    or reset advertising identifiers via your device settings. Depending
    on your operating system, you may be asked for consent with certain
    personalized advertising. To learn how to limit ad tracking or to
    reset the advertising identifier on your iOS and Android device, click on the
    following links:
o
    iOS -
https://support.apple.com/en-us/HT202074
o
    Android -
https://support.google.com/ads/answer/2662922?hl=en
Location Tracking.
In some cases, such as when using an App, you may also
    adjust the settings on your mobile device to allow or restrict the sharing of
    location information. For example, the “location” permissions on your mobile
    device may allow you to elect whether to never share location information with
    us, to share location information only while you are using the Properties or
    always share location information even if you are not using the Properties. If
    you elect to not share your location information, you may be unable to access
    some features of our services that are designed for mobile devices. Also, if
    you prevent the sharing of location information, we may still estimate your
    general location based on the IP address you use to access our services.
5.
    Third-Party Websites and Social Media Services
The website
    may contain links to other websites or Internet resources. When you click on
    one of those links, you are contacting another website or Internet resource. We
    have no responsibility or liability for, or control over, those other websites
    or resources or their collection, use and disclosure of your personal data. We
    suggest that you read the privacy policy and terms of use of each such website,
    which govern your interaction with them.
6.
    Children’s Data
Our Properties are generally not intended for
    individuals below 16 years of age/13 years of age in specific countries, which
    allow for personal data collection based on child’s own consent (such as the
    UK). As a general rule, we do not knowingly collect any personal
    data from children under 16 years of age/13 years of age in certain specific
    countries, such as the UK, without consent of their parents/legal guardians. If
    you believe that we have inadvertently collected personal data from a child under
    the age of 16/13 in the UK without such consent, please contact us at the
    address above and we will use reasonable efforts to delete the child’s data
    from our databases. Please refer to our
Terms and Conditions
to
    consult age restrictions on making Orders through our Properties for minors
    under 18 years of age.
We may
    organize dedicated events for children of various age brackets. In
    such cases, we may further supplement this Privacy Policy with a dedicated
    notice, as necessary.
7.
    Social Media, Widgets and Open Forums
Our
    Properties may allow you to engage with social media services, such as
    Facebook, Twitter, Pinterest, and Instagram (“Social Networks”), and widgets
    such as the “Share this” button, or interactive mini programs that run on our
    website or which link from Social Networks to our website (“Social Functions”).
    These Social Functions may access, collect, and integrate with your Social
    Network accounts and information. For example, these Social Functions may
    collect your IP address, identify which page you are visiting on our
    Properties, or set a cookie. We may make available the opportunity for Social
    Functions to be used to register you as a website user. For example, if you are
    not currently registered as a website user and you use certain Social
    Functions, you will be asked to enter your Social Network credentials and then
    be given the option to register and join the Website. If you choose to use
    these Social Functions, you may be sharing certain Social Network profile
    elements with us, including your name, birthday (month/day), comments,
    contacts, email address, photos, or favourite teams. This sharing is subject to
    each Social Network’s own privacy policy and terms of use. We do not control
    those Social Networks or your profiles on those services. Nor do we modify your
    privacy settings on those services or establish rules about how your personal
    data on those services will be used.Social Functions are either hosted by
    a third party or hosted directly on our website. Your interactions with them
    are governed by the privacy policy of the company providing them. Please refer
    to the privacy settings in your Social Network account to manage the data that
    is shared with us through your account. Information you include and transmit
    online in a publicly accessible blog, chat room, or Social Network, or that you
    share in an open forum such as an in-person panel or survey, may be viewed and
    used by others without us being able to restrict their use by third parties (to
    the extent we use such personal data, this Privacy Policy will apply). We do
    not control such uses of your personal data, and by using such services you
    assume the risk and acknowledge that the personal data provided by you may be
    viewed and used by or third parties for any number of purposes and that the
    usage restrictions set forth in this Privacy Policy do not apply to such
    services.
8.
    Who do we share personal data with and where are they?
We will share
    your personal data with our service providers (who process data on our behalf),
    third party affiliates (which may process your personal data for their own
    purposes), our Business Partners and our Fanatics affiliated entities. Some of
    these parties may not be located where you reside.
Service
        Providers and Fanatic Group Entities and Other Third-Party Affiliates
We
    will have in place an agreement with our service providers which will restrict
    how they are able to process your personal data and require them to keep it
    secure. We use some service providers directly in the fulfilment of your
    orders, for example for personalisation services, or where products are shipped directly by the manufacturer from
    their warehouse. Other service provider examples include IT providers, internet
    service providers, data analytics providers, and Contact Center Automation platform services,
    which assist in managing customer interactions across various communication
    channels through AI-driven systems. We may also use
    service providers in less direct ways, such as in the provision of our payment
    and finance systems, and to anticipate, prevent, and detect fraud.
We also share
    personal data with our own affiliates, including our parent company Fanatics
    LLC, and other affiliated entities who provide some services for us, or where
    they process personal data for their own purposes (e.g., where you provide
    consent for them to send you direct marketing communications).
We may share
    your personal data with organizations we work with to organize various events,
    including competitions for our customers and other individuals, as well as
    educational and community outreach activities.
We may also
    share your personal data with various professional advisors such as lawyers,
    accountants, auditors, translators, and other professionals, where they advise
    us on our relationship.
Our website
    also contains scripts from third party affiliates who will gather Observed
    Information about you in order to verify referrals from third party advertising
    (i.e., to verify that you actually purchased something on our Properties, based
    on your interaction with an advertisement on a different site). We do not
    process this information, but it is collected directly by them and processed in
    accordance with their privacy policies.Some of our third-party
    affiliates, which we share your personal data with, also help us broaden our
    marketing activities to reach an audience, which is/may be interested in
    visiting our Properties.Some of our third-party affiliates, which
    we share your personal data with, also help us better understand our customers,
    by providing additional information collected about those customers.
Business
        Partners
We may share your personal data with third parties whose merchandise we
    sell on our Properties and are licensed to use their brand (“Business
    Partners”) (or their service providers).
    As part of that relationship, and based on our both legitimate
    interests, we share with Business Partners Contact Information, Voluntary
    Information, and Observed Information as well as Transactional Information when
    you purchase that Business Partner’s merchandise from us. Business Partners use the shared personal
    data for their own purposes. You may
    contact us at
privacy@fanatics.co.uk
to opt out of future sharing of your personal
    data with Business Partners. However, we do not control how Business Partners
    use and share your information after we have shared it with them. Please
    contact such Business Partners directly for information about their privacy
    practices or to exercise rights you may have (including if you would like to
    opt-out of receiving future emails from a Business Partner).
If you
    participate in our FanCash program, we may also share your personal data with
    Business Partners and other third parties to operate the program and allow you
    to acquire and redeem points.
Other Use Cases
We may share
    any of your personal data with a prospective purchaser or purchaser of any part
    of our business, or otherwise in connection with a sale, merger, change of
    control, bankruptcy, or similar transaction on the basis of our legitimate
    interests and the interests of our purchaser, so that they can appropriately
    value the business and assess any risks and continue doing business with you
    after the acquisition.
We may share
    your personal data: (a) as required by law or legal process; (b) to investigate
    suspected fraud, harassment, or other violations of any law, rule, or
    regulation; (c) to investigate suspected violations of any terms or policies
    applicable to the Properties or the services provided by us or our third party
    providers or affiliates; or (d) where we reasonably conclude that it is
    necessary for defending, exercising or establishing our legal rights.
We may also
    share your personal data with media, such as in instances where you
    participated in some of our competitions and events, youth and community
    programs and other Fanatics public engagement activities.
With other
    third parties with your consent.
International
        Transfers
If any
    service provider, this party affiliate, Business Partner or affiliated entity
    is based outside of the United Kingdom, the European Economic Area or
    Switzerland, in a country, which was not recognized as providing adequate
    protection to personal data by the European Commission the United Kingdom
    Secretary of State and/or the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information
    Commissioner, data protections provided by those countries may not be equal to
    those of the UK, EEA or Switzerland. In those cases, we will ensure that we
    have an appropriate contract for the international transfer of personal data
    with them, they have binding corporate rules, approved code of conduct or
    certification in place, or that we can apply a permissible statutory
    derogation. In respect of Fanatics LLC, and our affiliates entities we share
    your personal data with, we have a contract in place in the form authorised by
    the European Commission, the United Kingdom Secretary of State and Parliament
    and Swiss authorities, for the international transfer of personal data.
Please reach
    out to us using the contact information above, if you want to receive further
    information or, where available, a copy of the relevant data transfer
    mechanism.
9.
    How long do we keep your information for?
We will only
    retain your personal data for as long as we need to fulfil the purposes set out
    in the Privacy Policy and for as long as we have a legal requirement to do
    so. Different retention periods may apply for to different types of
    records and data, however the longest we will generally hold any personal data
    is 7 years from the date of your last transaction, for taxation, accounting,
    and risk management purposes. This may be extended in the event of a query,
    investigation, or dispute until fully resolved.
If you would
    like to know more about retention periods applicable to your particular
    circumstance, you can contact us using details provided above.
10.
    Updates to this Privacy Policy
We may update
    this Privacy Policy from time-to-time. When required under
    applicable law, we will provide you with an appropriate notification regarding
    any changes we make by posting the updated version of the Privacy Policy/
    provide a notification on this website/ or reaching out to you directly, as
    appropriate.
Sub-policy 2
http://www.compass-group.co.uk/about/privacy-notice/:
Contact
What We Do
Foodservice
Facilities Management
Guest Services
Cleaning Services
Vending & Micromarkets
Procurement & Supply Chain
Where You'll Find Us
Business & Industry
Education
Healthcare
Sport, Leisure & Hospitality
Defence & Government Services
Energy & Offshore
Jobs
Search Jobs
Why Compass
Early Careers
Grads
Our Impact
Social Value
Our Social Promise
Our Climate Promise
Our Wellbeing Promise
Responsible Sourcing
Media
About Us
Our People & Culture
Our Brands
Our Work
Our Resources & Insights
Our Executive Team
Our Heritage
Diversity & Inclusion
Armed Forces Community
COMPASS JOBS
Contact
Compass Jobs
Compass UK&I Privacy Notice
About this Privacy Notice
Purpose of the Privacy Notice
Contacts
How do you engage with our organisation
Giving us feedback
You are applying to work for us as an employee or apprentice
You supply food, equipment or services to us
You eat our food at a public venue, your place of work or study, or any other private site
You stay with us at a residential site
You visit an event or conference, sports event or venue, or any other leisure facility
You order or pay for your food via an app
You use one of our 'frictionless' retail units
You buy our services
You visit our offices or operational sites
You order through Foodbuy
You receive sales or marketing information about our food or services to you or your organisation
You’ve taken part in one of our surveys or a competition
You’ve engaged with us on social media
You’ve visited one of our websites
You receive a newsletter or other communication from us
General data protection information
Change of purpose
Failure to provide personal data
Your Rights
Data retention
Data security
Processing information outside the UK or EEA
How to complain
Compass UK&I Privacy Notice
Compass UK&I Privacy Notice
About this Privacy Notice
Purpose of the Privacy Notice
Contacts
How do you engage with our organisation
Giving us feedback
You are applying to work for us as an employee or apprentice
You supply food, equipment or services to us
You eat our food at a public venue, your place of work or study, or any other private site
You stay with us at a residential site
You visit an event or conference, sports event or venue, or any other leisure facility
You order or pay for your food via an app
You use one of our 'frictionless' retail units
You buy our services
You visit our offices or operational sites
You order through Foodbuy
You receive sales or marketing information about our food or services to you or your organisation
You’ve taken part in one of our surveys or a competition
You’ve engaged with us on social media
You’ve visited one of our websites
You receive a newsletter or other communication from us
General data protection information
Change of purpose
Failure to provide personal data
Your Rights
Data retention
Data security
Processing information outside the UK or EEA
How to complain
This is the external privacy notice of Compass Group, UK & Ireland Limited, a company incorporated in England & Wales under number 02272248 whose registered office is at Parklands Court, 24 Parklands, Birmingham Great Park, Rubery, Birmingham B45 9PZ together with all its subsidiary companies and trading divisions (“Compass”).
Compass respects your privacy and is committed to protecting your personal data. This privacy notice informs you of who we are, how we collect, share, use and protect your personal data, however you provide it to us, and tells you about your privacy rights and legal protections.
This privacy policy tells you how Compass collects and processes your personal data through your provision of that data to us and use of any of our group websites, including but not limited to any data you may provide when you sign up to a newsletter, purchase a product or service, take part in a survey or enter a competition, or are apply for a role within a Compass brand.
It is important that you read this privacy notice together with any other information we may provide on specific occasions when we are collecting or processing personal data about you so that you are fully aware of how and why we are using your data. This privacy notice is complementary to the other information which we might provide in specific circumstances and will not override it.
Who is the Controller and Data Protection Officer?
When we use ‘Compass’, ‘we’, ‘us’ or ‘our’ in this privacy notice, we are referring to Compass Group, UK & Ireland Limited. We are the ‘data controller’ for your personal data under the applicable legislation and it is primarily responsible for processing and ensuring proper protection of your data.
This means that we are responsible for deciding how we hold and use personal information about you. We are required under data protection legislation to notify you of the information contained in this privacy notice.
This notice does not form part of any contract we might have with you and we can update it at any time but if we do so, we will provide you with an updated copy as soon as reasonably practical.
It is important that you read and retain this notice, together with any other privacy notice we may provide on specific occasions when we are collecting or processing personal information about you, so that you are aware of how and why we are using such information and what your rights are under the data protection legislation.
As noted in the introduction, Compass has subsidiary companies through which it operates and operates through trading divisions. Some group subsidiaries will contract in their own legal name but for the purposes of this privacy notice, they will be operating as subsidiaries of Compass Group, UK and Ireland Limited. The trading divisions, by contrast, might have their own names or brands but they have no legal status themselves. Any contract you enter through them will be, legally speaking, with Compass.
We have appointed a Data Protection Officer (DPO) who is responsible for overseeing questions in relation to this privacy notice and data protection issues in general. If you have any questions about this privacy notice, including in relation to your legal rights, please contact the DPO using the details set out below.
Contact details
Full name of legal entity
Compass Group, UK and Ireland Limited
Who to contact
Data Protection Officer
Email address
DPO@compass-group.co.uk
Postal address
Parklands Court, 24 Parklands, Birmingham Great Park, Rubery, Birmingham. B45 9PZ
Please use the navigation bar on the left to go to the section that matches most closely with the way you engage with Compass.
Consumers provide feedback to businesses for various reasons, including the desire to share their experiences and influence future service and product offerings. Through comments, consumers can offer constructive suggestions for improvement or highlight areas that need attention. Compliments are often given to express appreciation for exceptional service, quality products, or a positive experience, which helps businesses recognize and reward their staff and maintain high standards. Conversely, complaints are submitted when consumers encounter issues or dissatisfaction, enabling businesses to address and resolve problems, enhance customer satisfaction, and foster loyalty. This feedback loop is crucial for businesses aiming to meet and exceed customer expectations continuously. Throughout this process, limited personal data supplied by the individual will be processed to ensure accurate and relevant feedback.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms you use to give us feedback will vary but the general theme applies where we aim to gather sufficient information to understand the feedback fully, whilst meeting the data minimisation principle.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses
Date of birth
Transaction or visit date
CCTV footage and other information obtained through electronic means
Voice recordings online with this facility. You will be informed if call is recorded
Other information you choose to share with us an any free text field
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information either directly from you or sometimes from a third party.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations when providing our services to you or under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
Where your personal data is not relevant to any follow on actions, we will anonymise the feedback.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Responding to your feedback either directly or via a third party or client
Processing payments or refunds
Administering the contract we have entered into with you
Conducting performance reviews, managing performance and determining performance requirements
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or other employees, workers and contractors, including accidents at our place of work
Complying with health and safety obligations
To detect or prevent fraud
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We do not ask for special category of personal data as part of our feedback processes, but you may share it with us as part of any free form text fields in our forms. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to providing our services to you (most importantly so that we provide them properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass as part of our process of dealing with your feedback.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer our service provision, or our contract with you.
We may be required to share your personal information with clients or suppliers to help resolve details of your feedback.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: receiving payment for the services we provide, product or service quality assurance, and meeting our health and safety obligations including accident and incident management.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
As a prospective employee, apprentice, trainee or site contractor, you will need to provide us with some personal data. We may need some data in order to take steps at your request prior to entering into a contract with you and, if your application is successful, in order to enter into the contract itself. In some cases, we need to process personal data in order to comply with legal obligations. For example we are required to check your eligibility to work before employment starts. Some personal data will be needed to generally manage the recruitment process, to assess and confirm your suitability for employment, and to decide whether to make a job offer. We may also need to process personal data in order to respond to or defend legal claims. Health and other special category data may be needed in order to make reasonable adjustments during the recruitment process and for equal opportunities monitoring purposes. And for certain types of roles we may be obliged to carry out a criminal records check in order to satisfy ourselves that there is nothing in your record that makes you unsuitable for the role. The different circumstances in which we will process your data are set out in more detail under "Situations in which we will use your personal information". The categories of personal data we need to collect, store and use in pursuit of those purposes is set out below:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and personal email addresses
Date of birth
Gender
National Insurance number
Salary and annual leave
Start date and, if different, the date of your continuous employment
Location of employment or workplace
Copy of passport (either as ID evidence or to use for travel arrangements if the role demands it)
Right to work in the UK status including current immigration status
Copy of driving licence (either as ID evidence or qualification evidence if the role demands it)
Recruitment information (including copies of right to work documentation, references and other information included in a CV or cover letter or as part of a job application process)
Any information you provide to us during an interview (whether face-to-face, by phone or video platform, or in any other way)
Previous employment records (including job titles, work history, working hours, holidays, training records and professional memberships)
Competency certification or other regulatory or industry-related certification necessary for your role
Professional or trade qualifications that are relevant to the industry and/or role for which you are applying
Tax documentation where this is necessary for us to work with national or international tax authorities to administrate your tax status or the status of emoluments you earn either in the UK or aboard, where applicable.
Credit history or other background checks. (Some of our clients operate in industries where they are obliged to undertake stringent vetting on their own employees and those of contractors. In such circumstances, we will have to undertake a level of investigation about you that might seem unnecessarily intrusive.  We will only do this where our client reasonably demands this of us.  If we do not do this, our client might not grant you access to their premises and you might be unable to perform your intended role.)
Results of government revenue & customs or local tax office employment status check, details of your interest in and connection with the intermediary through which your services are supplied (should you provide services in a way that might legally qualify you as an employee in the eyes of the law or in accordance with government revenue & customs or local tax office guidance and regulation on the status of individuals and their tax affairs)
Specific types of data that may be processed as part of any psychometric testing that we may carry out, such as test scores, personality traits, cognitive abilities and behavioral tendencies
We may also collect, store and use the following "special categories" of more sensitive personal information:
Information about your race or ethnicity, religious beliefs, sexual orientation and political opinions
Heath information (to make reasonable adjustments in the recruitment process)
Credit reference agency checks
Information about criminal convictions and offences, where these are relevant to the role for which you have applied (or to which you are being transferred if already employed by us) and where client expectations and regulation to which they are subject obliges us to obtain such data (for example; working in schools or hospitals where there are children or vulnerable adults and our clients have a safeguarding obligation and standard which we must meet ourselves, or other sites requiring high levels of security)
This sort of special category information is required if the role you are applying for demands it, or if the role is on a client site where the client has obliged us to vet potential staff to this extent (for example; clients in the finance industry or the defence sector are very strict about security, clients in the education and health sectors are very strict about criminal convictions because they have statutory or safeguarding obligations to meet, and to which our own staff or contractors must adhere).  These sorts of information might not seem to be appropriate to the nature of the role you are applying for, but we might still have to obtain it from you for the reasons above.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information about employees, workers, apprentices, trainees or learners and contractors (whether on a permanent, part-time or casual basis) through the application and recruitment process, either directly from candidates or sometimes from an employment agency or background check provider.
We may sometimes collect additional information from third parties including former employers, credit reference agencies or other background check agencies.
We may work with our third parties or agencies to help with our selection process.
We may also use other sources of personal information including but not limited to:
Sanctions and Watch Lists issued by governments, financial market regulators and law enforcement bodies form across the world
Baseline Personnel Security Standard (BPSS)
Outstanding County Court Judgments (CCJs), IVAs, Bankruptcies, alias names and address history using the electoral register
The Disclosure and Barring Service and Disclosure Scotland in respect of criminal convictions
The Home Office Employers Checking Service in respect of Right To Work in the UK
Your named referees
Trustees or managers of pension arrangements operated by a group company, if relevant.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need information prior to take steps at your request to enter into a contract (employment contract or training or learning agreement) and to enter into the contract or agreement itself
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and employer best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Assess your skills, qualifications, and suitability for the work generally or the role specifically
Carry out background and reference checks, where applicable
Communicate with you about the recruitment process
Carrying out interview either face to face, by phone or video links, or chat platforms
Make decisions throughout our recruitment process
Keep records related to our hiring processes
Determine the terms on which you work for us
Check you are legally entitled to work in the UK
Psychometric testing and evaluations
Keep your details on Compass systems (including Apps) that allow our contract managers to offer or select you for casual work, overtime or emergency cover
Defend or responding to legal claims
Comply with health and safety obligations
Equal opportunities monitoring
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to the contract or agreement, we have with you (most importantly so that we perform it properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to undertake your role, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the employment contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you. The most likely use of automated decision making is in response to questions we ask about your entitlement to work in the UK. These decisions will be based on the information you provide to us.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers, and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship, we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) or other entities within our group who we might use to help administer the employment contract or agreement we have with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the employment contract we have with you: IT services, foreign jurisdiction permission to work, occupational health, and security vetting.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider which triggers our obligation to disclose anonymised data under the Transfer of Undertakings (Protection of Employment) Regulations 2006 (TUPE).
In this situation we will, so far as possible, share anonymised data with the other parties before the transaction completes.  Once the transaction is completed, we will share your personal data with the other parties if, and to the extent required under the terms of the transaction or by TUPE.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law. This may include making returns to government revenue & customs or local tax office, disclosures to stock exchange regulators and disclosures to shareholders such as directors' remuneration reporting requirements.
Please note: if we on-board you as an employee, apprentice or trainee, please refer to our Employee Privacy Notice for further information.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data). For most of our suppliers, the vast majority of the data we process is not regarded as personal data. However, we do deal with a small number of sole traders. For sole traders, more aspect of the data is regarded as personal data. We apply appropriate standards of security to all data that we process. Please refer to the Security section to understand this further.
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms and processes we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to perform our contract with you and to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship. If you work for a limited company, the personal data will be minimal, but if you operate as a sole trader, there will be more data that is regarded as personal.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses
Date of birth
Bank account details, and tax status information
Credit history
CCTV footage and other information obtained through electronic means such as swipe/access card record
Information about your use of our information and communications systems
Photographs
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information during the on-boarding process, either directly from you or sometimes from your employer or credit check provider.
We may collect additional personal information in the course of job-related activities throughout the period for which you work with us.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to perform our contract with you.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Determining the terms on which you work for us
Administering the contract we have entered into with you
Business management and planning, including accounting and auditing
Conducting performance reviews, managing performance and determining performance requirements
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or other employees, workers and contractors, including accidents at work
Complying with health and safety obligations
Invitations to events, meetings, business briefings or other direct communication with you to add value to our relationship with you
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to the contract we have with you (most importantly so that we perform it properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer the contract we have with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the relationship we have with you: contract, finance, tax and treasury management, events training and conferences, business meetings with you or our clients.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law. This may include making returns to government revenue & customs or local tax office, or disclosures to other regulators.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to provide you with our services, perform a contract with you or to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses
Date of birth
Bank account details or other payment details
CCTV footage and other information obtained through electronic means
Information about your use of our information and communications systems
Photographs
If you received subsidies on goods or services, we may collect data to determine if you are eligible for the subsidy
Health or allergen information
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information either directly from you or sometimes from a third party.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations when providing our services to you or under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to provide our services to you or perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Providing you with food or our services
Processing payments or refunds
Administering the contract we have entered into with you
Business management and planning, including accounting and auditing
Conducting performance reviews, managing performance and determining performance requirements
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or other employees, workers and contractors, including accidents at our place of work
Complying with health and safety obligations
Where you have given your consent, use your image for internal or external marketing or promotion, the purpose of which will be documented when you gave your consent
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
Checking the eligibility of subsidies
We may process certain health or allergen information about you if you require a medical or special diet. Where you do, we will only process this personal data to provide you your meal, and statistical analysis. In some of our business contracts, we may be acting as the data processor of our client. Any personal data will be collected directly from you, your parent or guardian, or sometimes our client.
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to providing our services to you (most importantly so that we provide them properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer our service provision, or our contract with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: receiving payment for the services we provide, product or service quality assurance, marketing where we have your consent or a legitimate interest and meeting our health and safety obligations including accident and incident management.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to provide you with our services, perform a contract with you or to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses
Date of birth
Bank account details or other payment details
CCTV footage and other information obtained through electronic means
Information about your use of our information and communications systems
Photographs
Voice recordings online with this facility. You will be informed if call is recorded
Health or allergen information
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information either directly from you or sometimes from a third party.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations when providing our services to you or under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to provide our services to you or perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Providing you with food or our services
Processing payments or refunds
Administering the contract we have entered into with you
Business management and planning, including accounting and auditing
Conducting performance reviews, managing performance and determining performance requirements
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or other employees, workers and contractors, including accidents at our place of work
Complying with health and safety obligations
Where you have given your consent, use your image for internal or external marketing or promotion, the purpose of which will be documented when you gave your consent
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may process certain health or allergen information about you if you require a medical or special diet. Where you do, we will only process this personal data to provide you your meal, and statistical analysis. In some of our business contracts, we may be acting as the data processor of our client. Any personal data will be collected directly from you, your parent or guardian, or sometimes our client.
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to providing our services to you (most importantly so that we provide them properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer our service provision, or our contract with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: receiving payment for the services we provide, product or service quality assurance, marketing where we have your consent or a legitimate interest and meeting our health and safety obligations including accident and incident management.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to provide you with our services, perform a contract with you or to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses
Date of birth
Bank account details or other payment details
CCTV footage and other information obtained through electronic means
Information about your use of our information and communications systems
Photographs
Voice recordings online with this facility. You will be informed if call is recorded
Health information if it is relevant to the operation of the facility e.g. relating to the use of any gym or sports facilities
Allergen information
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information either directly from you or sometimes from a third party.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations when providing our services to you or under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to provide our services to you or perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Providing you with food or our services
Processing payments or refunds
Administering the contract we have entered into with you
Business management and planning, including accounting and auditing
Conducting performance reviews, managing performance and determining performance requirements
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or other employees, workers and contractors, including accidents at our place of work
Complying with health and safety obligations
Ensuring that sports activities are appropriate for you
To detect or prevent fraud
Where you have given your consent, use your image for internal or external marketing or promotion, the purpose of which will be documented when you gave your consent
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may process certain health or allergen information about you if you require a medical or special diet. Where you do, we will only process this personal data to provide you your meal, and statistical analysis. In some of our business contracts, we may be acting as the data processor of our client. Any personal data will be collected directly from you, your parent or guardian, or sometimes our client.
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to providing our services to you (most importantly so that we provide them properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer our service provision, or our contract with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: receiving payment for the services we provide, product or service quality assurance, marketing where we have your consent or a legitimate interest and meeting our health and safety obligations including accident and incident management.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online forms we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, we are likely to be collecting your personal information when you register for an app account, we provide you with our services, perform a contract with you or to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses
Date of birth
Bank account details or other payment details
Information about your use of our information and communications systems including transactional data
Profile data including your username and password (in those circumstances where you might have a technological relationship with us through a smartphone or computer), purchases or orders made by you, your interests, preferences, feedback and survey responses
Marketing and Communications Data may include your preferences in receiving marketing or service messages from us and will reflect your communication preferences. You will not be contacted for third party marketing purposes unless you have given us your express consent to do so
Location data may include your location, the location of your device or where the facility that serves you is located. You select the unit or location that you wish to use.
Voice recordings online with this facility. You will be informed if call is recorded.
The location data are selected by you so that we can offer you relevant menu and booking information for the location of the services we offer. We have a legitimate interest to know the location of the service you want us to offer you, but you can adjust this through your settings.
Where you receive marketing communications, we may use your contact information to market similar goods and services that you already used or purchased. You may object to us using your data for marketing purposes at any time by contacting us directly or adjusting your settings. If you contact us, we will use the information to give to manage your request.
We process payment information to receive payment for the goods or services you buy from us and, if you choose and the function is available, to hold a credit balance on your account. We partner with several payment providers to process card payments. We carry out due diligence on our partners to ensure their PCI compliance and we have standard contractual clauses in place with them. Our systems do not process any payment information or card details. Your payment is processed by our payment provider and the pseudonymised transactional data is then shared with us.
Information that we collect from your use of the app
Technical Data may include internet protocol (IP) address, login data, browser type and version, time zone setting and location, browser plug-in types and versions, operating system and platform and other technology on the devices you use to access any of our websites
Usage Data may include information about how you use our websites and purchase our products and services.
We also collect, use and share Aggregated Data such as statistical or demographic data that may be derived from your personal data but is not considered personal data as this data does not directly or indirectly reveal your identity. For example, we may aggregate your Usage Data to calculate the percentage of users buying a product.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information either directly from you or sometimes from a third party, for example we may receive a list of new users to set up with accounts from our client.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations when providing our services to you or under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to provide our services to you or perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Providing you with food or our services
Processing payments or refunds
Administering your account or the contract we have entered into with you
Presenting you with discounts or additional offers based on your preferences or agreements with our clients
Business management and planning, including accounting and auditing
Dealing with legal disputes involving you
Complying with obligations to ensure your health and safety when purchasing our goods or services
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to providing our services to you (most importantly so that we provide them properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer our service provision, or our contract with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: receiving payment for the services we provide, product or service quality assurance, marketing where we have your consent or a legitimate interest and meeting our health and safety obligations including accident and incident management.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online forms we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, we are likely to be collecting your personal information when you register for an app account, we provide you with our services, perform a contract with you or to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and/or email addresses
Date of birth
Bank account details or other payment details
Information about your use of our information and communications systems including transactional data
Profile data including your username and password (in those circumstances where you might have a technological relationship with us through a smartphone or computer), purchases or orders made by you, your interests, preferences, feedback and survey responses
Marketing and Communications Data may include your preferences in receiving marketing or service messages from us and will reflect your communication preferences. You will not be contacted for third party marketing purposes unless you have given us your express consent to do so
Location data may include your location, the location of your device or where the facility that serves you is located. You select the unit or location that you wish to use
Your image that are captured on cameras inside the unit.
The location data are selected by you so that we can offer you relevant information for the location of the services we offer. We have a legitimate interest to know the location of the service you want us to offer you, but you can adjust this through your settings.
Where you receive marketing communications, we may use your contact information to market similar goods and services that you already used or purchased. You may object to us using your data for marketing purposes at any time by contacting us directly or adjusting your settings. If you contact us, we will use the information to give to manage your request.
We process payment information to receive payment for the goods or services you buy from us and, if you choose and the function is available, to hold a credit balance on your account. We partner with several payment providers to process card payments. We carry out due diligence on our partners to ensure their PCI compliance and we have standard contractual clauses in place with them. Our systems do not process any payment information or card details. Your payment is processed by our payment provider and the pseudonymised transaction data is then shared with us.
In 'frictionless' retail units, we capture your image. We then process these images to create a pseudonymised avatar and associate a unique ID. We use machine learning to infer over 30 joints (or key points) on the body. We monitor the movements and gestures of this avatar to determine the products that you choose and will charge your account for those goods. If you select goods and leave the unit with those goods, you will be charged for those goods. Please refer to the Specific Terms and Conditions for full details. We do not use facial recognition technologies as you move around the unit, so we do not process this special category of personal data.
Information that we collect from your use of the app
Technical Data may include internet protocol (IP) address, login data, browser type and version, time zone setting and location, browser plug-in types and versions, operating system and platform and other technology on the devices you use to access any of our websites
Usage Data may include information about how you use our websites and purchase our products and services.
We also collect, use and share Aggregated Data such as statistical or demographic data that may be derived from your personal data but is not considered personal data as this data does not directly or indirectly reveal your identity. For example, we may aggregate your Usage Data to calculate the percentage of users buying a product.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information either directly from you or sometimes from a third party, for example we may receive a list of new users to set up with accounts from our client. We capture your image from equipment installed in the unit.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations when providing our services to you or under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to provide our services to you or perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Providing you with food or our services
Processing payments, receipts or refunds
Administering your account or the contract we have entered into with you
Presenting you with discounts or additional offers based on your preferences or agreements with our clients
Business management and planning, including accounting and auditing
Dealing with legal disputes involving you
Complying with obligations to ensure your health and safety when purchasing our goods or services
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to providing our services to you (most importantly so that we provide them properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Resolving disputes
In normal use, we use digital images which are not regarded as biometric data. In any case where there may be a dispute, for example if you were to query a transaction, we would review these digital images to identify you, and this would then be classified as special category of personal data, and only be processed as part of our contract with you.
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
In 'frictionless' retail units, we capture your image. We then process these images to create a pseudonymised avatar. We use machine learning to infer over 30 joints (or key points) on the body. We monitor the movements and gestures of this avatar to determine the products that you choose and will charge your account for those goods. If you select goods and leave the unit with those goods, you will be charged for those goods. Please refer to the Specific Terms and Conditions for full details.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer our service provision, or our contract with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: receiving payment for the services we provide, product or service quality assurance, marketing where we have your consent or a legitimate interest and meeting our health and safety obligations including accident and incident management.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms and processes we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to perform our contract with you and to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship. If you work for a limited company, the personal data will be minimal, but if you operate as a sole trader, there will be more data that is regarded as personal.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses. This information is about you at your place of work and your organisation contracts with us to provide services.
CCTV footage and other information obtained through electronic means such as swipe/access card record
Voice recordings during the sales process or to manage our service to you. We may record calls to improve our processes, or for training purposes. May may refer back to recordings or transcripts of calls to check details we agreed during the call to improve our service to you or in the case of any dispute. Our systems may process the recordings to help identify trends or profile prospects or customers. We have carried out a data protection impact assessment to document the controls we put in place to process special category of personal data and the profiling we may carry out.
You will be informed if the call is recorded.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information during the pre-contract or tendering process, either directly from you or sometimes from your employer or tender portal provider.
We may collect additional personal information in the course of job-related activities throughout the period you work with us.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Business development activity
Preparing contract or tender documents
Determining the terms on which you work with us
Administering the contract we have entered into with your organisation
Business management and planning, including accounting and auditing
Conducting performance reviews, managing performance and determining performance requirements
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or your organisation, including accidents at work
Complying with health and safety obligations
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to the contract we have with you (most importantly so that we perform it properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer the contract we have with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: contract, finance, tax and treasury management.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law. This may include making returns to government revenue & customs or local tax office, or disclosures to other regulators.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to provide you with our services, perform a contract with you or to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, email addresses, and vehicle registration number
CCTV footage and other information obtained through electronic means
Information about your use of our information and communications systems
Photographs
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information either directly from you or sometimes from a third party.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations when providing our services to you or under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to provide our services to you or perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Business management and planning, including accounting and auditing
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or other employees, workers and contractors, including accidents at our place of work
Complying with health and safety obligations
Where you have given your consent, use your image for internal or external marketing or promotion, the purpose of which will be documented when you gave your consent
To detect or prevent theft or fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to providing appropriate facilities for you (most importantly so that we provide them properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help operate our facilities.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us: providing access to, security for, or the safe management of our facilities, including the monitoring of and processing of CCTV and ANPR technologies.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms and processes we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to perform our contract with you and to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship. If you work for a limited company, the personal data will be minimal, but if you operate as a sole trader, there will be more data that is regarded as personal.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses
Date of birth
Bank account details, and tax status information
Credit history
Information about your use of our information and communications systems
Photographs
Voice recordings online with this facility. You will be informed if call is recorded.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information during the on-boarding process, either directly from you or sometimes from your employer or credit check provider.
We may collect additional personal information in the course of job-related activities throughout the period for which you work with us.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Determining the terms on which you work for us
Administering the contract we have entered into with you
Business management and planning, including accounting and auditing
Conducting performance reviews, managing performance and determining performance requirements
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or other employees, workers and contractors, including accidents at work
Complying with health and safety obligations
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to the contract we have with you (most importantly so that we perform it properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making, unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer the contract we have with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: contract, finance, tax and treasury management.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law. This may include making returns to government revenue & customs or local tax office, or disclosures to other regulators.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to provide you with our services, perform a contract with you or to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses. This information could be about you at your place of work, or at home.
Information about your use of our information and communications systems
Voice recordings during the sales process or to manage our service to you. We may record calls to improve our processes, or for training purposes. May may refer back to recordings or transcripts of calls to check details we agreed during the call to improve our service to you or in the case of any dispute. Our systems may process the recordings to help identify trends or profile prospects or customers. We have carried out a data protection impact assessment to document the controls we put in place to process special category of personal data and the profiling we may carry out.
You will be informed if the call is recorded.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information either directly from you or sometimes from a third party.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to tell you about our goods or services, or perform our contract with you if we already have one.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
This section makes a clear distinction between marketing communications, i.e. communicates that sell our goods or services, or to collect to help it (or others) to contact people for marketing purposes at a later date, and genuine service or market research communications. Direct marketing rules do not apply to the later.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests. For example, if we believe that we can offer you similar services to those you have either bought from us or expressed an interest in buying from us. In these circumstances, it won’t surprise you to hear from us, unless you’ve expressly asked us not to. All of our communications to you will give you that option and you can tell us at any time.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Tell you about our food or services
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
If we are marketing our goods and services to you at work, we are essentially marketing to your organisation rather than directly to you. That means that we may have sent unsolicited communications to you. However, we recognise that people work in the organisation we market our goods and services to. Your personal information is just that; personal to you, and you have the same rights. Please let us know if you do not want to receive this these communications. If you’d prefer those communications go to another role in your organisation, please let us know.
If we are marketing to you at home, we will not send unsolicited communications to you unless you have given us your consent to do so, or we have a legitimate interest in sending you information about goods or services similar to those you have either previously bought or expressed an interest in buying from us.
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to providing our services to you (most importantly so that we provide them properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us, including providing clients with such information to allow you to access their premises
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making, unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer our service provision, our contract with you, or how we communicate with you.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the relationship we have with you: receiving payment for the services we provide, product or service quality assurance, and marketing where we have your consent or a legitimate interest.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms and processes we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to perform our contract with you and to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship. If you work for a limited company, the personal data will be minimal, but if you operate as a sole trader, there will be more data that is regarded as personal.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses. This information could be about you at your place of work and your organisation contracts with us to provide services, or at home if you have bought food or services from us at a public venue.
Photographs
There may be other aspects of personal data we ask for in the survey or competition. If that is the case, we will explain the purpose of this within the survey or competition itself, and it will be supported by this Privacy Notice.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information when you complete the survey or enter a competition. This may be a paper or digital tool, or may be via one of our apps.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations under the terms of the survey or competition
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Processing the outcomes of the survey or competition
Making improvements to our food or services
Understanding how you use our services
Understanding how we interact with you and helping us improve
Understanding your use of our marketing channels and which produces the best outcomes for consumers and our operations
Conducting performance reviews, managing performance and determining performance requirements
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or your organisation, including accidents at work
Complying with health and safety obligations
Where you have given your consent, use your image for internal or external marketing or promotion, the purpose of which will be documented when you gave your consent
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
Other specific requirements set out in the introduction to specific surveys or competitions
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to the contract we have with you (most importantly so that we perform it properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making, unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer the delivery, use of or assessment of the survey or competition.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: service improvement, product improvement, operational and support improvements, as well as the delivery of the survey, how the survey operates and any assessment of completed surveys, processing the entries of the competition, fulfilling winners of the competition, processing any marketing consent given as part of the competition.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law. This may include making returns to government revenue & customs or local tax office, or disclosures to other regulators.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms and processes we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to perform our contract with you and to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship. If you work for a limited company, the personal data will be minimal, but if you operate as a sole trader, there will be more data that is regarded as personal.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, email addresses and profile information. This information could be about you at your place of work and your organisation contracts with us to provide services, or at home if you have bought food or services from us at a public venue.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information when you send us a message or interact with our social media channel. This may be via one of our apps.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Responding to your engagement with us
Making improvements to our food or services
Understanding how you use our services
Understanding how we interact with you and helping us improve
Understanding your use of our marketing channels and which produces the best outcomes for consumers and our operations
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or your organisation, including accidents at work
Complying with health and safety obligations
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify your use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to the contract we have with you (most importantly so that we perform it properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making, unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer the delivery, use of social media accounts.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: service improvement, product improvement, operational and support improvements, as well as the operation of our social media accounts.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law. This may include making returns to government revenue & customs or local tax office, or disclosures to other regulators.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms and processes we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to perform our contract with you and to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship. If you work for a limited company, the personal data will be minimal, but if you operate as a sole trader, there will be more data that is regarded as personal.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, email addresses and profile information. This information could be about you at your place of work and your organisation contracts with us to provide services, or at home if you have bought food or services from us at a public venue.
IP address, cookies and tracking technologies. The use of these technologies is covered in a separate Policy which can be found on our websites.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information when you send us a message, interact with our social media channels or visit our websites. This may be via one of our apps.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where want try to provide a tailored experience of our digital presence
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Responding to your engagement with us
Making improvements to our food or services
Understanding how you use our services
Understanding how we interact with you and helping us improve
Understanding your use of our web sites or marketing channels, and which produces the best outcomes for consumers and our operations
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or your organisation, including accidents at work
Complying with health and safety obligations
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify your use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to the contract we have with you (most importantly so that we perform it properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making, unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to pursue the contract or relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help administer the delivery, use of our websites or digital platforms.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: service improvement, product improvement, operational and support improvements, as well as the operation of our social media accounts.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law. This may include making returns to government revenue & customs or local tax office, or disclosures to other regulators.
The kind of information we hold about you
Personal data, or personal information, means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. It does not include data where the identity has been removed (anonymous data).
There are "special categories" of more sensitive personal data which require a higher level of protection, such as information about a person's health, religious beliefs or sexual orientation.
The online or hard-copy forms and processes we might ask you to complete from time-to-time will vary but, ordinarily, in the scenarios where we are likely to be collecting your personal information to perform our contract with you and to enable us to comply with our legal obligations. We are likely to collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you in order to fulfil that relationship. If you work for a limited company, the personal data will be minimal, but if you operate as a sole trader, there will be more data that is regarded as personal.
We may collect, store, and use the following categories of personal information about you:
Personal contact details such as name, title, addresses, post code, telephone numbers, and email addresses. This information could be about you at your place of work, or at home.
How is your personal information collected?
We collect personal information when you sign up for the newsletter. This may be a paper or digital tool, or may be via one of our apps.
How we will use information about you
We will only use your personal information when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform our obligations under our contract
Where we need to comply with a statutory obligation
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, including business interests and best practice (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests
Where we have your express consent
Situations in which we will use your personal information
Depending on the nature of our relationship, from time-to-time, we are likely to need most of the categories of information in the list above to allow us properly to perform our contract with you.  Some we will need to comply with legal obligations.
In some cases, we may use your personal information to pursue legitimate interests of our own or those of third parties, provided your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests. For example, if we believe that we can offer you similar services to those you have either bought from us or expressed an interest in. In these circumstances, it won’t surprise you to hear from us, unless you’ve expressly asked us not to. All of our communications to you will give you that option.
The situations in which we will process your personal information are listed below:
Provide you with the communications you want from us
Making improvements to our food or services
Understanding how you use our services
Understanding how we interact with you and helping us improve
Understanding your use of our marketing channels and which produces the best outcomes for consumers and our operations
Conducting performance reviews, managing performance and determining performance requirements
Dealing with legal disputes involving you, or your organisation, including accidents at work
Complying with health and safety obligations
To detect or prevent fraud
To ensure network and information security, including preventing unauthorised access to our computer and electronic communications systems and preventing malicious software distribution
We may from time to time carry out other types of processing. For example, to carry out activities necessary to the running of our business, including network monitoring, system testing, staff training, quality control and any legal proceedings. We have a legitimate interest or legal obligation to do so. For systems that require the use of personal data to conduct testing, production data may be copied to a non-production environment, then scrambled, masked or, by using another technique, anonymised to create test data. This data can therefore not be linked to you or another person. This process allows for the modification of personal data into anonymised, usable test records that we can use efficiently to test the integrity of the application or system. We may carry out activities that process personal data in order to monitor the performance of our network, systems or the activities of our teams, so that we can ensure the integrity and availability of those systems.
Some of the above grounds for processing will overlap and there may be several grounds which justify our use of your personal information.
How we use particularly sensitive personal information
"Special categories" of personal information require higher levels of protection. We need to have further justification for collecting, storing and using this type of personal information. We may process special categories of personal information in the following circumstances:
In limited circumstances, with your explicit consent
Where we need to carry out our statutory or contractual obligations or exercise rights in relation to the contract we have with you (most importantly so that we perform it properly and safely)
Where we need to provide a third party with health certification or evidence to allow you to work with us
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making takes place when an electronic system uses personal information to make a decision without human intervention. We are allowed to use automated decision-making in the following circumstances:
Where we have notified you of the decision arrived at through the automated process and given you 21 days to request some human intervention into that decision
Where it is necessary to perform the contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
In limited circumstances, with your explicit written consent and where appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making, unless we have a lawful basis for doing so and we have notified you.
Data sharing
We may have to share your data with third parties, including third-party service providers and other legal entities within the same group of companies as Compass.
We require our third-party processors to respect the security of your data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
Why might you share my personal information with third parties?
We will share your personal information with third parties where required by law, where it is necessary to maintain our relationship we have with you or where we have another lawful basis for doing so.
Which third-party service providers process my personal information?
"Third parties" includes third-party service providers (including contractors and designated agents) and other entities within our group who we might use to help develop and deliver our communications to consumers, clients or members of the public.
The following are the activities which are most likely to be carried out by third-party service providers for us, in relation to supporting the contract we have with you: developing relevant communications, delivery of our communications, reviewing and assessing the delivery methods we use.
How secure is my information with third-party service providers and other entities in our group?
All our third-party service providers and other entities in the group are required to take appropriate security measures to protect your personal information in line with our policies. We do not allow our third-party service providers to use your personal data for their own purposes. We only permit them to process your personal data for specified purposes and in accordance with our instructions.
What about other third parties?
We may share your personal information with other third parties, for example in the context of the possible sale or restructuring of the business or where there is a change in service provider.
We may also need to share your personal information with a regulator or to otherwise comply with the law. This may include making returns to government revenue & customs or local tax office, or disclosures to other regulators.
We will only use your personal information for the purposes for which we collected it, unless we reasonably consider that we need to use it for another reason and that reason is compatible with the original purpose. If we need to use your personal information for an unrelated purpose, we will notify you and we will explain the legal basis which allows us to do so.
Please note that we may process your personal information without your knowledge or consent, in compliance with the above rules, where this is required or permitted by law.
If you fail to provide certain information when requested, we may not be able to perform the contract we have with you, or we may be prevented from complying with our legal obligations (such as to ensure we comply with our health and safety obligations) or you may not be permitted to enter operational sites.
You have rights under data protection laws in relation to your personal data. Under certain circumstances your rights are as follows:
Request access to your personal data
(commonly known as a "data subject access request" or “DSAR”). This enables you to receive a copy of the personal data we hold about you in order to check that we are processing it lawfully
Request correction of the personal data that we hold about you
. This enables you to have any incomplete or inaccurate data we hold about you corrected, though we may need to verify the accuracy of the new data you provide to us
Request erasure of your personal data
. This enables you to ask us to delete or remove personal data where you believe we have no legitimate reason for continuing to process it. You also have the right to ask us to delete or remove your personal data where you have successfully exercised your right to object to processing (see below), where we may have processed your information unlawfully or where we are required to erase your personal data to comply with local law. Note, however, that we may not always be obliged to comply fully with your request of erasure for specific legal reasons which will be notified to you, if applicable, at the time of your request
Object to processing of your personal data
where we are relying on a legitimate interest (or those of a third party) and there is something about your situation which makes you want to object to processing on this ground as you feel it impacts on your fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we might demonstrate that we have compelling legitimate grounds to process your information which override your rights and freedoms
Request restriction of processing of your personal data
. This enables you to ask us to suspend the processing of your personal data in the following scenarios: (a) if you want us to establish the data's accuracy; (b) where our use of the data is unlawful but you do not want us to erase it; (c) where you need us to hold the data even if we no longer require it as you need it to establish, exercise or defend legal claims; or (d) you have objected to our use of your data but we need to verify whether we have overriding legitimate grounds to use it
Request the transfer of your personal data to you or to a third party
. We will provide to you, or a third party you have chosen, your personal data in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format. Note that this right only applies to automated information which you initially provided consent for us to use or where we used the information to perform a contract with you. Again, it is subject to any overriding legal, accounting and reporting rights we might have to retain copies of your data; and
Withdraw consent at any time where we are relying on consent to process your personal data
. However, this will not affect the lawfulness of any processing carried out before you withdraw your consent. If you withdraw your consent, we may not be able to provide certain products or services to you. We will advise you if this is the case at the time you withdraw your consent.
If you wish to exercise any of the rights set out above, please contact us at DPO@compass-group.co.uk
No fee usually required
You will not have to pay a fee to access your personal data (or to exercise any of the other rights). However, we may charge a reasonable fee if your request is clearly unfounded, repetitive or excessive. Alternatively, we may refuse to comply with your request in these circumstances.
What we may need from you
We may need to request specific information from you to help us confirm your identity and ensure your right to access your personal data (or to exercise any of your other rights). This is a security measure to ensure that personal data is not disclosed to any person who has no right to receive it. We may also contact you to ask you for further information in relation to your request to speed up our response.
Time limit to respond
We try to respond to all legitimate requests within one month. Occasionally it may take us longer than a month if your request is particularly complex or you have made several requests. In this case, we will notify you and keep you updated.
How long will you use my information for?
We will only retain your personal information for as long as necessary to fulfil the purposes we collected it for, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, accounting, or reporting requirements.
We maintain a Document and Data Retention Policy and record the retention period for data relating to each activity in our Records of Processing as defined in data protection legislation.
To determine the appropriate retention period for personal data, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the personal data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorised use or disclosure of your personal data, the purposes for which we process your personal data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal requirements.
In some circumstances we may anonymise your personal information so that it can no longer be associated with you, in which case we may use such information without further notice to you.
Once we no longer need to process your personal information, we will securely destroy your personal information in accordance with our Document and Data Retention Policy which is informed by the applicable laws and regulations that we are required to take into account.
At the end of
a client
contract to provide goods or services, we may share your personal data
as part of the staff transfer process
. This may be with our client or any new service provider. We do this to minimise the impact of any change of service provider of the goods or services
that
our client uses
. Any data sharing will be carried out in line with Data Sharing Code of Practice. We will document the data sharing and the controls we put in place to protect and respect your personal data. If there is likely to be high risk to you associated with this data sharing, we will carry out a Data Protection Impact Assessment (DPIA) at the start of the design of the data sharing so that we ensure we develop appropriate controls.
We have put in place appropriate security measures to prevent your personal data from being accidentally lost, used or accessed in an unauthorised way, altered or disclosed.
In addition, we limit access to your personal data strictly to those employees, agents, contractors and other third parties who have a need to know that data in order to further the transaction in which we are both concerned. They will only process your personal data on our instructions, and they are subject to a duty of confidentiality.
Whilst we are in control of our own data environment unfortunately the transmission of information via the internet is not always completely secure. Our organisations policy is to only send personal data through an encrypted format.
This makes it as secure as possible, but it is still not completely secure. You should be aware that if you send us anything in an unencrypted format that we will not be able to secure it until it has securely entered our network. As such any transmission is at your own risk. We have put in place procedures to deal with any suspected personal data breach and will notify you and any applicable regulator of a breach where we are legally required to do so and, in a format, and within timescales stipulated by the applicable regulator or the applicable data protection legislation.
You also play a part in ensuring the security of your personal data. We recommend that you choose a password that is unique to our service. You are responsible for keeping this password confidential. Please do not share this password with anyone else. We will not be liable for any unauthorised transactions performed through our service where the user's credentials have been compromised.
Where we, or our partners, process your personal information outside the UK or EEA, you can expect an essentially equivalent degree of protection in respect of your personal information (and certainly no less than expected in the data protection legislation in relation to the countries and entities which process your information). Where we do process your personal data outside the UK or EEA, we would only to so in order to carry out activities to operate our business and support the processing of personal data we need to carry out. This processing may include special category of personal data and this will depend on the activity being carried out by us or our partners. Such processing would be made only on terms that meet the UK or EU’s expectations in terms of the countries where that data is being processed and the specific terms on which the data processor is retained by us so that the process provides an adequate level of protection for your personal information. Your data will be processed in the UK, EU and US, but may be processed in other jurisdictions, such as India or other third countries, where we have service providers or data processors. In most circumstances, we rely on approved standard contract clauses (SCC) which we include in our agreements with data processors and service providers, but may also rely on other mechanisms recognised in data protection legislation including an International Data Transfer Agreement (IDTA) in the UK.
We use Office 365, which offers a suite of applications we use in our daily operations. These include for example Outlook, Word and Excel, but also other applications are included in our subscription. The data within our Office 365 tenant are processed in the US. Our contract with Microsoft is supported by a Data Processing Agreement which details the controls we have in place to protect and respect personal data, and which complies with UK and Irish law on international transfers of data.
You have the right to make a complaint at any time to your local supervisory authority.
In the UK that is the Information Commissioner's Office (ICO) (www.ico.org.uk)
In Ireland that is the Data Protection Commission (DPC) (www.dataprotection.ie)
We would, however, appreciate the chance to deal with your
concerns
before you approach the ICO or the DPC; so please contact us in the first instance.
Full name of legal entity
Compass Group, UK and Ireland Limited
Who to contact
Data Protection Officer
Email address
DPO@compass-group.co.uk
Postal address
Parklands Court, 24 Parklands, Birmingham Great Park, Rubery, Birmingham. B45 9PZ
2/14/2025, 9:50:24 AM
Cookies Button
By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts. For more information about cookies and how we use them, please click on the cookie icon.
Read our cookie policy.
Accept All Cookies
Reject All
Customise
Cookie Policy and Privacy Preference Centre
When you visit our website, we use cookies, which are small files of letter and numbers which sits on your device or browser and assists with information flow and functionality. 
This Cookie Policy Statement explains how Compass Group UK&I Limited (“Compass”, "we", "us", and "ours") use cookies and similar technologies when you visit one of our websites. It explains what these technologies are and why we use them, as well as your rights to control our use of them. 
If you have any queries in relation to data protection, please email us at gdpr@compass-group.co.uk. 
Your privacy is important to us and we want to be transparent about the types of cookies used by this Website. 
For more information about the cookies we use, please click on the icon below to expand the selection and see the cookie details
Read our cookie policy.
User ID:
0b2df225-7a42-4a69-9f78-dd5c1b1ca16d
This User ID will be used as a unique identifier while storing and accessing your preferences for future. Please make a note of this ID.
Timestamp:
--
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages.    If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Other cookies
Targeting Cookies
Switch Label
label
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites.    They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Performance Cookies
Switch Label
label
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site.    All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookies Details‎
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms.    You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Cookie Policy and Privacy Preference Centre
When you visit our website, we use cookies, which are small files of letter and numbers which sits on your device or browser and assists with information flow and functionality. 
This Cookie Policy Statement explains how Compass Group UK&I Limited (“Compass”, "we", "us", and "ours") use cookies and similar technologies when you visit one of our websites. It explains what these technologies are and why we use them, as well as your rights to control our use of them. 
If you have any queries in relation to data protection, please email us at gdpr@compass-group.co.uk. 
Your privacy is important to us and we want to be transparent about the types of cookies used by this Website. 
For more information about the cookies we use, please click on the icon below to expand the selection and see the cookie details
Read our cookie policy.
User ID:
0b2df225-7a42-4a69-9f78-dd5c1b1ca16d
This User ID will be used as a unique identifier while storing and accessing your preferences for future. Please make a note of this ID.
Timestamp:
--
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages.    If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Other cookies
Targeting Cookies
Switch Label
label
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites.    They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Performance Cookies
Switch Label
label
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site.    All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookies Details‎
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms.    You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Performance Cookies
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Cookie Policy and Privacy Preference Centre
When you visit our website, we use cookies, which are small files of letter and numbers which sits on your device or browser and assists with information flow and functionality. 
This Cookie Policy Statement explains how Compass Group UK&I Limited (“Compass”, "we", "us", and "ours") use cookies and similar technologies when you visit one of our websites. It explains what these technologies are and why we use them, as well as your rights to control our use of them. 
If you have any queries in relation to data protection, please email us at gdpr@compass-group.co.uk. 
Your privacy is important to us and we want to be transparent about the types of cookies used by this Website. 
For more information about the cookies we use, please click on the icon below to expand the selection and see the cookie details
Read our cookie policy.
User ID:
0b2df225-7a42-4a69-9f78-dd5c1b1ca16d
This User ID will be used as a unique identifier while storing and accessing your preferences for future. Please make a note of this ID.
Timestamp:
--
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages.    If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Other cookies
Targeting Cookies
Switch Label
label
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites.    They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Performance Cookies
Switch Label
label
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site.    All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookies Details‎
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms.    You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Performance Cookies
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 3
https://www.v12retailfinance.com/privacy-policy:
Cookie Notice
We use small text files called cookies, including those from third party analytics providers, to give you the best online experience. Blocking cookies means some parts of our site won't work. Find out more in our
Cookie Policy
and
Privacy Statement
.
Close
Accept Cookies
Cookie Settings
Your Privacy
Strictly Necessary Cookies
Performance Cookies
Targeting Cookies
More Information
Privacy Preference Centre
Save Settings
Allow All
Skip to main content
Skip to footer
Privacy statement
Use of personal information
We are V12 Retail Finance Limited, registered in England and Wales 4585692, authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority. We use the trading names V12 Retail Finance, V12 Personal Finance and AppToPay.
V12 Retail Finance Limited act as a credit broker and will introduce you to Secure Trust Bank PLC and other lenders or brokers if you opt to check your eligibility for loans.
Details of our panel can be found here
.
When we use "we" in this notice we mean us or anyone acting on our behalf. When we use "you", we mean the customer or applicant acting on their own behalf or for a business; or individuals associated with our commercial clients, retailers, partners and suppliers.
Please read this Privacy Statement carefully as it contains important information to help you understand our practices regarding any personal information that you give to us.
In relation to customers or applicants
We process your personal information including:
the personal information that you give us during an eligibility check or an application, or that you have given to us during a previous application or as a customer;
the personal information that we obtain about you from the retailer who helps arrange the application for you;
the personal information that we receive from third parties such as credit reference agencies and fraud prevention agencies (see below), companies you ask to share your 'Open Banking' information with us, where we need to contact these third parties as part of your application, in servicing your account with us, or for profiling purposes;
the personal information that you give us while servicing your account via our website, App, in writing or over the phone; and
the personal information that you give us if you register interest in a product and/or service, request information or assistance from us or make a complaint.
This personal information includes your:
name;
date of birth;
address including address history;
telephone numbers;
email address;
nationality;
credit history and records relating to your partner or anyone else you are financially linked with (we receive this information from the credit reference agencies and fraud prevention agencies);
transaction information on payments into and out of an account, and debit or credit card information;
marital status
information about your requirements (including the amount of finance, term and purpose);
your consumer classification profile;
passport, driving licence, national identity card, HM Forces ID card or fire arms licence details when you provide this as proof of identity;
details about whether you own your property, rent it or live with others;
financial information (including details of expenditure, bank details and credit history);
employment/self-employment details (including income and taxation);
information regarding whether you have any dependants;
identifiers assigned to your computer or other internet connected device including your IP address;
information linked to your mobile telephone number;
publicly available information (for example on the internet, social media and on public registers);
information relating to how you conduct your account and our dealings on it;
information about unspent criminal convictions or pending prosecutions relating to any aspect of dishonesty, which may have a bearing on your future employment or the likely conduct of the account;
the personal information that you give us during an eligibility check or an application for or purchase of any product or service from us, when registering for our app, or that you have given to use during a previous application or as a customer.
If you authorise a third party to act on your behalf, for example setting up a Power of Attorney for your account, we record the individual's name, date of birth, address, telephone number, email address, solvency status for Powers of Attorney, and bank details if the third party makes payments by direct debit for your account.
In the unfortunate circumstance that one of our customers passes away, we record the following details of the next of kin and any executors, administrators and legal representatives of the estate: name, address, telephone number and email address.
If you make an application on behalf of a business, we will process personal information about shareholders, directors, partners, beneficial owners, authorised signatories or other associated persons, including name, date of birth, address, credit history and publicly available information (for example on the internet, social media and on public registers).
Where information fields are marked as mandatory on any application form that you complete, you will need to provide such information in order for us to continue with your application.
Special categories of personal data include information about an individual’s physical or mental health or condition and other categories of personal information which are closely protected (e.g. biometric data).
We process such information, when you, or a third party provide that information to us. For example, where you notify us or a third party of a health issue that would mean, due to your personal circumstances or personal characteristics, you are especially vulnerable to financial detriment.
We use the information to make adjustments to support you in managing your account or protect your economic wellbeing. We process the information on the lawful basis of explicit consent or substantial public interest. You have the right to withdraw your consent or object to us holding details of your special category personal data at any time by contacting us by telephone, email or in writing.
Criminal offence information is not defined as special categories of personal data; however, this information does require additional protections. Criminal offence information covers information related to convictions and offences, including alleged offences, court proceedings, and sentencing.
Where permitted by law, we process criminal offence information for specific and limited activities and purposes, such as to perform checks to prevent and detect crime and to comply with laws relating to money laundering, fraud, terrorist financing, bribery and corruption, and international sanctions, or substantial public interest. It may involve investigating and gathering intelligence on suspected financial crimes, fraud and threats and sharing data between banks, with law enforcement and regulatory bodies.
In summary, we use your personal information for the purposes of:
servicing and internal processing (ie To assess and/or provide the loan and to service your account, including by way of automated decision making);
management relationship (e.g. to develop your relationship with us);
tracing customers and recovering debts;
resolving queries/problems (e.g. responding to complaints or contacting you if you do not complete your application);
training and service review (e.g. to help us enhance our services);
statistical analysis (e.g to help enhance our products and services);
developing our products and services;
understanding our customers and potential customers (e.g to understand whether our products and services are distributed to the expected target market); and
complying with legal obligations (e.g. to prevent, investigate and prosecute crime, fraud and money laundering).
As detailed below, we process your personal information where we have a legitimate interest to do so (except where it would override your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms which require the protection of personal information), where otherwise permitted by law, or to comply with applicable law and regulation.
PURPOSE
LAWFUL BASIS
(As set out under applicable data protection law - for more details visit the
Information Commissioner's Office (ICO) website
Servicing and Internal Processing
to provide the product or service that you applied for;
Necessary for entering into, or the performance of a contract.
to evaluate risk in connection with the provision of our services, in particular loans, including as noted in the section below 'Automated Decision Making';
To comply with legal obligations to manage and control risk; Automated Decision Making is necessary for entering into, or the performance of a contract
to verify the identity of our customers and potential customers;
To comply with legal obligations in financial services regulations for prevention of money laundering
to report on the performance of an account; (see 'Sharing with Credit Reference Agencies' section)
Legitimate interests to share performance information with credit reference agencies
to confirm, update and improve our customer records;
To comply with legal obligations in the Data Protection regulations
to assess what options are appropriate if you are in financial difficulties;
To comply with legal obligation to treat customers in financial difficulties fairly
to trace customers and recover debts; (see Debt Recovery section)
Legitimate interests to collect debts you owe us
to respond to any queries or complaints that you raise;
To comply with legal obligations for complaint handling
to prevent, investigate and prosecute crime, fraud money laundering or sanctions violations; (see 'For crime and fraud prevention and anti-money laundering' section)
To comply with legal obligations for prevention of financial crime and money laundering
to protect our legal rights and interests;
Legitimate interests to protect financial position and reputation
to conduct identity and bankruptcy checks on powers of attorney;
To comply with legal obligations to validate the fitness of attorneys
to inform you if an application you have started is incomplete or to pre-populate any future applications where you have told us we can keep your information for this purpose;
Legitimate interests to aid customers in completing applications
to troubleshoot problems with the Website, or to customise your experience on the Website;
Legitimate interests to optimise customers' experience on the Website. Please see our
Cookie Policy
to provide you with any information on the products or services you have requested, by completing an expression of interest form or otherwise (including to give you advanced notice of new products);
Legitimate interests to provide information on the products or services as requested
Management of Relationship
to manage, analyse, understand and develop your relationship with us, for example, to understand how often you access our services;
Legitimate interests to service customers' accounts, optimise customers' experience with us and develop our products and services
to inform you about improvements to the Website;
Legitimate interests to optimise customers' experience on the Website
to keep you informed of any of our other/new products and services and identify and market products and services that may be of interest to you, where you have chosen to be made aware of this; (see 'Marketing' section)
With consent
to request feedback or conduct research on our products and services (see 'Customer Survey' section)
Legitimate interests to optimise customers' experience with us and develop our products and services
Training and Service Review
for training purposes and to enhance or review the service we provide or have provided to you;
Legitimate interests to optimise customers' experience with us, to manage performance and develop our employees
Develop products and services
to conduct statistical analysis and research (see 'Statistical analysis' section);
Legitimate interests to develop our products and services
to test scorecards and systems (see 'Testing' section);
Legitimate interests to develop our products and services
To better understand our customers and potential customers, and whether they are from the expected target markets for each product;
Legitimate interests to develop our products and services
Other
for financial managements, treasury, risk management or auditing purposes;
To comply with legal obligations including accounting, audit, risk management standards, and requirements for listed companies
if we are obliged to disclose information by reason of any law, regulation or court order;
To comply with legal obligations
to transfer information to any entity which may acquire rights in us;
Legitimate interests in restructuring or selling parts of our business
to transfer information to any entity which may purchase your account;
legitimate interests in restructuring or selling part of our business or any of our debt
to monitor access to and use of the Group’s IT systems, including electronic communications and video conferencing technology;
Legitimate interests to manage and control information security risk and the risk of misconduct and to comply with legal obligations for prevention of crime
for contacting individuals in the event of a Health & Safety emergency;
Legitimate interests to provide information to relevant authorities
• for any other purpose to which you agree.
With consent
The personal information that you provide will be retained by us in accordance with applicable laws. We take reasonable steps to destroy or anonymise personal information we hold if it is no longer needed for the purposes set out above.
Set out below are our retention periods
Type of personal information
Retention period
General personal data - this includes the categories of normal personal data, personal identity and personal financial data
Completed and live retail finance applications - 7 years after end of relationship
Credit agreements cancelled under the Right to Withdraw - 7 years from the last activity on the application or agreement
Incomplete or declined applications - up to 7 years
If you have registered for V12 AppToPay but have not made a retail finance application, your app log in information will be removed after 12 months.
Special categories and criminal offence personal data may be captured if voluntarily provided to us. Criminal offence information could be disclosed to us by a third party or through screening checks.
7 years after end of relationship
Special categories of personal data will be erased if you no longer want us to retain the information
Call recordings
Up to 6 years, although some recordings are kept for shorter periods.
Recordings may be retained as evidence of a complaint investigation for 7 years after the resolution of the complaint
If you visit one of our offices:
CCTV - digital images
Visitor book
90 days
3 years
The recipients with whom we share personal information are:
lenders with whom we have a relationship including Secure Trust Bank PLC (we are part of the Secure Trust Bank Group) and other lenders or brokers if you opt to check your eligibility for loans.
Details of our panel can be found here
. If you want any information about how Secure Trust Bank process your information, please visit their website at
https://www.securetrustbank.com/privacy-statement
;
our third party service providers who act on our instruction and need to know the information in order to provide us or you with a product or service;
payment service providers including Adyen, Mastercard, Barclaycard, Pay360, in order to process payments to and from your account with us;
Open Banking providers when instructed by you;
our third party service providers who act on our instruction and process information on our behalf to help run some of our business operations including email distribution, electronic signature processing, storage of customer documentation, IT services and websites, diallers, for statistical analysis and profiling;
our partners including introducers and retailers we work with;
our affiliates, for the purpose of managing our customer relationships, administering our business and to provide you with information about other products and services which might be of interest to you;
our advisors, for the purpose of assisting us to better manage, support or develop our business and comply with our legal and regulatory obligations;
our regulators (including the Financial Conduct Authority and Information Commissioner's Office) to comply with our legal and regulatory obligations;
entities who may or do acquire any rights in us for the purpose of a business sale or reorganisation;
credit reference agencies (including TransUnion and Equifax) and fraud prevention agencies (including Cifas and Synectics Solutions) - see sections below 'Sharing with credit reference agencies','For crime and fraud prevention and anti-money laundering', 'Statistical analysis' and 'Testing');
HMRC, who may then pass information on to a relevant overseas tax authority;
law enforcement bodies in order to comply with any legal obligation or court order;
where you have agreed to receive such marketing, we may make your details available to reputable suppliers of credit and insurance related services that we feel may be of interest to you;
we reserve the right to sell accounts. In some circumstances, the firm to whom we sell accounts may require us to continue to process personal information. We will inform you if we do this; and
for season ticket finance, if you fail to keep to the terms of the agreement we share information with the club if they have arrangements in place to cancel the season ticket in these circumstances.
If you are an existing or new customer of V12 Retail Finance Limited and opt to check your eligibility for a loan with our panel of lenders and brokers, we will confirm or collect some personal information about you and the loan you require and share that information with our panel.
Details of our panel can be found here
.
Our panel of lenders and brokers will use the information we share with them to conduct a credit check (which will involve them collecting information from third parties, such as credit reference and fraud prevention agencies, to learn about your credit history). A soft credit check is not visible to third parties on your credit report and does not affect your credit score. A lender or broker will use this information to assess your eligibility for a loan.
When you leave our website, we encourage you to read the privacy policy of the partners' website you visit to understand how they handle your personal information. Each partner's privacy policy can be found
here
. All lenders on the panel will retain records of these checks.
Recipients with whom we share your personal information, for example our service providers, may be located in the UK, countries in the European Economic Area or elsewhere in the world. Different privacy laws may apply in these countries and you understand and unambiguously agree to the transfer of personal information to these countries and parties.
If we or our service providers transfer your personal information outside of the UK, there is either a legal framework in that country which has been assessed as providing adequate protection for people’s rights and freedoms about their personal information or other appropriate measures are in place, such as we or service providers impose standard data protection obligations to make sure that personal information is sent and received in line with any laws that apply.   More details on the standard contractual obligations and the international frameworks are available on the ICO's
website
, or you can contact our Data Protection Officer on the details below.
We record and monitor communications with us, including electronic communications and calls, to improve the quality of our service and for your protection and security.
Before we offer retail finance, we undertake checks with credit reference agencies for the purposes of assessing whether to lend to you. These checks require us to process personal information about you and include credit scoring. We continue to undertake these checks after we have given you retail finance to evaluate our risk and for statistical analysis (see 'Statistical Analysis' section).
Automated decision making is used for some retail finance applications (see 'Automated Decision Making' section).
Credit reference agencies add to the record about you, and your partner or anyone else with whom you are financially linked, information about your application and repayment history, including any default or failure to keep to the terms of an agreement with us.
Credit reference agencies hold your personal information for up to six years.
Any information you disclose to us that is false or inaccurate will also be recorded by the credit reference agencies. These records will be shared with other organisations and may be used and searched by us and them to:
consider applications for credit and credit related services, such as insurance, for you and any associated person; and
trace customers, recover debts, prevent or detect money laundering and fraud, and to manage accounts.
We use Equifax, TransUnion and Experian as our credit reference agencies. More information about the credit reference agencies and how they process your personal information is available at:
Equifax website
TransUnion website
Experian website
You can also find information about the credit reference agencies on the website of the
ICO's website
.
Before we offer a product or service, we will undertake checks for the purposes of detecting and preventing crime, fraud, money laundering and sanctions violations, and to verify your identity. These checks require us to process your personal information with the credit reference agencies or fraud prevention agencies. We may ask you to provide additional information. We continue to undertake these checks even after we have given you an account, for the same purposes. We will undertake checks for the purpose of detecting and preventing fraud when processing payments.
The consequences of these checks may mean that:
if we determine that you pose a risk of non or late repayment, we may refuse to lend to you
if we, or a fraud prevention agency, determine that you pose a fraud, money laundering or sanctions risk, we may refuse to open an account for you or to lend to you, or we may require repayment of your loan or we may stop providing existing services to you
we may reject a payment.
If you have an agreement with us then the terms of that agreement will dictate how we do this.
A record of any fraud or money laundering risk will be retained by the fraud prevention agencies and may result in others refusing to provide services or financing or employment to you. If you have any questions about this, please contact the fraud prevention agencies on the details below.
We, and fraud prevention agencies, may also enable law enforcement agencies to access and use your personal information to detect, investigate and prevent crime.
Fraud prevention agencies hold your personal information for up to two years, and if you are considered to pose a fraud or money laundering risk, your information is held for up to six years.
The fraud prevention databases we use are provided by CIFAS - The UK's Fraud Prevention Service, Synectics Solutions, TransUnion, Lexis Nexis and Iovation. Further information can be found at:
CIFAS website
Synectics Solutions website
TransUnion website
Lexis Nexis website
GBG website
Iovation website
As part of the processing of your personal information, some decisions for retail finance are made by automated means. The lawful basis for automated decision making is that it is necessary for entering into, or the performance of a contract.
Our processes to verify your identity and undertake checks to detect and prevent money laundering checks can result in an automated decision. This means we automatically decide that you pose a fraud or money laundering risk if:
our processing reveals your behaviour to be consistent with that of known fraudsters or money launderers;
is inconsistent with your previous submissions; or
you appear to have deliberately hidden your true identity.
In some cases, we also use automated decision making to decide whether to offer you a retail finance loan, whether we think that you can afford the loan and will abide by the terms of any loan agreement including whether you will repay the loan. This will involve us using logic to process different sources of information about you, such as from credit reference agencies, as well as our own algorithms to control our risk. Credit scores are produced from information such as credit commitments, whether you have made repayments on time, whether you have any history of insolvencies or court judgements, and how long you have lived at your current address. Our automatic decision may also be affected if we do not have enough statistically significant data about others who have similar circumstances to you to confidently assess our risk.
In some cases, if you are in financial difficulties, we use automated decision making to decide the most appropriate option to assist you.
If we make a decision solely on the basis of automated decision making, you have rights, for example, you can request human intervention and ask us to reconsider your application. If you want to know more please contact us.
Data Protection Officer for Secure Trust Bank PLC trading as V12 Retail Finance and V12 Retail Finance Limited
V12 Retail Finance
25-26 Neptune Court
Vanguard Way
Cardiff
CF24 5PJ
Telephone: 029 2046 8900
Email:
customerservices@v12finance.com
If you owe us money, or if we suspect fraud, we process your personal information in connection with pursuing the recovery of that money or prevention of that fraud. We disclose information about non-payment, late payment or suspected or actual fraud to credit reference agencies, fraud prevention agencies, and law enforcement or government agencies in accordance with the law. We may share your personal information with independent debt recovery agencies or service providers, tracing agents or investigators, solicitors or other agents in order to recover monies you owe us. We use additional sources of personal information such as data obtained from providers of debt recovery agencies or fraud prevention agencies and we also process other personal information about you such as CCTV footage and information that you make public, for example on social media.
In the unfortunate circumstance that one of our customers passes away, we share the name, address, telephone number, and email address of the next of kin and any executors of the estate with our third party service provider in order to recover monies from the estate.
We use personal information of individuals who have applied for a product with us (whether accepted or declined) for statistical analysis to create scorecards in connection with the assessment of creditworthiness, fraud, and risk, to refine lending, risk, collections, fraud, anti-money laundering and financial crime strategies, and for analysis such as loss forecasting.
Statistical analysis can involve personal information being shared with and obtained from our third party service providers, credit reference agencies and fraud prevention agencies. Wherever possible, this information is processed on an anonymised basis. The credit reference agencies will not add a record to your credit file of processing conducted for this purpose.
We use personal information of individuals who have applied for a product with us (whether accepted or declined) to test scorecards and our internal systems and those of our third party service providers. Testing can involve personal information being shared with and obtained from our third party service providers, credit reference agencies and fraud prevention agencies. Wherever possible, this information is processed on an anonymised basis. The credit reference agencies will not add a record to your credit file of processing conducted for this purpose.
We share customers' postcodes with a third party supplier who then provides a profile based on their analysis of the customers’ address. We do this to understand our customer base and whether our products and services are distributed to the expected target markets.
You have the right to object to this activity. To do so, please call us or write to us:
Data Protection Officer for Secure Trust Bank PLC trading as V12 Retail Finance and V12 Retail Finance Limited
V12 Retail Finance
25-26 Neptune Court
Vanguard Way
Cardiff
CF24 5PJ
Telephone: 029 2046 8900
Email:
customerservices@v12finance.com
From time to time, we may send you information regarding our products and/or services or those from carefully selected third parties, such as lenders and brokers, that we think may be of interest to you where we have your consent. You opt to receive this information by letter, telephone, SMS, email and/or push notification.
Where we have your consent, we use profiling to help us identify products that may be on interest to you, ensure that our communications are relevant to you and improve your experience when engaging with us.
We may also create profiles using personal information from you and other customers. We use these profiles to decide what marketing may be if interest to those with similar characteristics to you.
If, at any time, you prefer not to receive further communications from us in any or all forms (except in connection with information, products or services that you specifically request), you will have the ability to unsubscribe from such communications by means of a link provided in every e-mail that is sent to you by us or by contacting us. To unsubscribe from such communications by SMS, reply 'STOP' to the SMS.
From time to time, we may send you a request to take part in a customer survey for feedback or research purposes. this is in order to improve our products, processes and/or service. You may receive this information by letter, telephone, SMS and/or email.
This website contains links to other websites. We accept no responsibility or liability for the content of other websites which are not under our strict control, in particular, we are not responsible for the protection and privacy of any information which you provide whilst visiting other websites and such sites are not governed by this Privacy Statement. Please see section titled 'Access to Website' in our Website Terms and Conditions for further details.
Emails sent via the internet can be subject to interception, loss or possible alteration, therefore we cannot guarantee their security. Although we will do our best to protect your personal information, we cannot guarantee the security of your information sent by email and therefore will have no liability to you for any damages or other costs in relation to emails sent by you to us via the internet.
The Website is not intended for use by individuals under the age of 18 without the agreement and involvement of a parent or guardian. We do not knowingly collect personal information from individuals under the age of 18.
We will keep this Privacy Statement under review and make updates from time to time. We will notify you of any major changes which will affect the processing of your personal data, for example if we change the credit reference agencies we use. We may make minor changes (such as to correct typographical errors, or to add information about other products or services which do not affect your personal information at this time) without notifying you.
Our website uses cookies (including Google Analytics cookies to obtain an overall view of visitor habits and visitor volumes to our Website). To view more information on what cookies we use and how we use them please review our separate
Cookie Policy
.
You have the right to request copies of certain of your personal information within our custody and control and details of how we use that information. Your request can be made verbally or in writing.
If you think any of the personal information we hold about you is inaccurate, you can also request it is corrected or erased.
You also have rights, in certain circumstances:
to object to our processing of your personal information;
to request human intervention if a decision has been made solely on the basis of automated decision making;
to require us to stop processing your personal information; and
to withdraw your agreement to processing based on 'consent'.
You have a right to port personal information you have provided to us to a different service provider. In relation to all of these rights, please call us or write to us;
Data Protection Officer
V12 Retail Finance Limited
25-26 Neptune Court
Vanguard Way
Cardiff
CF24 5PJ
Telephone: 02920 468900.
Email:
customerservices@v12finance.com
Please note that we may request proof of identity when we receive your request.
You also have a right to complain to the
ICO
, which regulates the processing of personal data.
Our aim is to please but we know that sometimes things go wrong. If you have a problem, we want to know. Our staff will be happy to help you either on the telephone or in writing. Should you need to write to us, please address your complaint to The Chief Executive, V12 Retail Finance Limited, 25-26 Neptune Court, Vanguard Way, Cardiff, CF24 5PJ or
complaints@v12finance.com
If you are unhappy about how your personal information has been used, please contact our Data Protection Officer using the details set out below. You also have a right to complain to the
ICO
, which regulates the processing of personal data.
Our Data Protection Officer can be contacted by telephone or in writing:
Data Protection Officer
V12 Retail Finance Limited
25-26 Neptune Court
Vanguard Way
Cardiff
CF24 5PJ
Telephone: 02920 468900.
Email:
customerservices@v12finance.com
In relation to commercial clients, retailers, partners and suppliers
When we use "you", we mean individuals associated with our commercial clients, retailers, partners and suppliers, including shareholders, directors, partners, beneficial owners, authorised signatories or other associated persons.
We process your personal information including:
the personal information that you give us during an application to work with us;
the personal information that we receive from third parties such as credit reference agencies and fraud prevention agencies (see below), where we need to contact these third parties as part of your application to work with us or in servicing your account with us;
the personal information that you give us while servicing your account via our website, in writing or over the phone; and
the personal information that you give us if you register interest in working with us, request information or assistance from us or make a complaint; and
personal information captured in the course of doing business with us.
This personal information includes your:
name;
date of birth;
address;
telephone number;
email address;
passport, driving licence, national identity card or fire arms licence details when you provide this as proof of identity;
nationality
bank details - sort code, account number;
credit history and records relating to your partner or anyone else you are financially linked with (we receive this information from the credit reference agencies and fraud prevention agencies);
identifiers assigned to your computer or other internet connected device including your IP address;
information linked to your mobile telephone number;
publicly available information (for example on the internet, social media and on public registers);
information about unspent criminal convictions or pending prosecutions relating to any aspect of dishonesty, which may have a bearing on your future employment or the likely conduct of the account.
Records are kept of meetings, including those via electronic communications and video conferencing technology.
Where information fields are marked as mandatory on any application form that you complete, you will need to provide such information in order for us to continue with your application.
Special categories of personal data include information about an individual's physical or mental health or condition and other categories of personal information which are closely protected (e.g. biometric data).
We process such information, when you, or a third party supporting you, provide that information to us. For example, where you notify us of a health issue that would mean due to your personal circumstances or personal characteristics, you are especially vulnerable to financial detriment. We use the information to make adjustments to support you in managing your account. We process the information on the lawful basis of consent. You have the right to withdraw your consent for us to hold details of your special category personal data at any time by contacting us by telephone, email or in writing.
Criminal offence information is not defined as special categories of personal data, however, this information does require additional protections. Criminal offence information covers information related to convictions and offences, including alleged offences, court proceedings, and sentencing.
Where permitted by law, we process criminal offence information for specific and limited activities and purposes, such as to perform checks to prevent and detect crime and to comply with laws relating to money laundering, fraud, terrorist financing, bribery and corruption, and international sanctions. It may involve investigating and gathering intelligence on suspected financial crimes, fraud and threats and sharing data between banks, with law enforcement and regulatory bodies.
In summary, we use your personal information and the personal information of individuals associated with you for the purposes of:
servicing and internal processing;
management of our relationship with you (e.g. to develop your relationship with us);
resolving queries/problems (e.g. responding to complaints or contacting you if you do not complete your application);
training and service review (e.g. to help us enhance our services);
developing our services; and
complying with legal obligations (e.g. to prevent, investigate and prosecute crime, fraud and money laundering).
As detailed below, we process your personal information where we have a legitimate interest to do so (except where it would override your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms which require the protection of personal information), where otherwise permitted by law, or to comply with applicable law and regulation.
PURPOSE
LAWFUL BASIS (As set out under applicable data protection law - for more details click
here
)
Servicing and Internal Processing
to provide the product or service that you applied for;
Necessary for entering into, or the performance of a contract
to verify the identity of our customers and potential customers;
To comply with legal obligations in financial services regulations for prevention of money laundering
to confirm, update and improve our customer records;
To comply with legal obligations in the Data Protection regulations
to respond to any queries or complaints that you raise;
To comply with legal obligations for complaint handling
to detect, prevent, investigate and report actual or suspected ciminal activity such as, fraud money laundering or sanctions violations; (see 'For crime and fraud prevention and anti-money laundering' section)
To comply with legal obligations for prevention of financial crime and money laundering
to protect our legal rights and interests;
Legitimate interests to protect financial position and reputation
to troubleshoot problems with the Website, or to customise your experience on the Website;
Legitimate interests to optimise customers' experience on the Website. Please see our
Cookie Policy
Management of Relationship
to manage, analyse, understand and develop your relationship with us, for example, to understand how often you access our services;
Legitimate interests to service customers' accounts, optimise customers' experience with us and develop our products and services
to inform you about improvements to the Website;
Legitimate interests to optimise customers' experience on the Website
to keep you informed of any of our other/new products and services and identify and market products and services that may be of interest to you, where you have chosen to be made aware of this; (see 'Marketing' section)
With consent
to request feedback or conduct research on our services (see 'Customer Survey' section)
Legitimate interest to optimise experience with us and develop our services
Training and Service Review
for training purposes and to enhance or review the service we provide or have provided to you;
Legitimate interests to optimise customers' experience with us, to manage performance and develop our employees
Develop services
to conduct statistical analysis and research;
Legitimate interests to develop our services
to test systems (see 'Testing' section);
Legitimate interests to develop our services
Other
for financial management, treasury, risk management or auditing purposes;
To comply with legal obligations including accounting, audit and risk management standards, and requirements for listed companies
if we are obliged to disclose information by reason of any law, regulation or court order;
To comply with legal obligations
to transfer information to any entity which may acquire rights in us;
Legitimate interests for commercial interests
to monitor access to and use of the Secure Trust Bank Group's IT systems, including electronic communications and video conferencing technology;
Legitimate interests to manage and control information security risk and the risk of misconduct and to comply with legal obligations for prevention of crime.
for contacting individuals in the event of a Health & Safety emergency
Legitimate interests to provide information to relevant authorities.
for any other purpose to which you agree.
With consent
The personal information that you provide will be retained by us in accordance with applicable laws. We take reasonable steps to destroy or anonymise personal information we hold if it is no longer needed for the purposes set out above.
Set out below are our retention periods
Type of personal information
Retention period
General personal data - this includes the categories of normal personal data, personal identity and personal financial data
7 years after end of relationship
Special categories and criminal offence personal data may be captured if voluntarily provided to us. Criminal offence information could be disclosed to us by a third party or through screening checks.
7 years after end of relationship
Special categories of personal data will be erased if you no longer want us to retain the information
Call recordings
Recordings of video conferencing technology
Up to 6 years, although some recordings are kept for shorter periods.
Recordings may be retained as evidence of a complaint investigation for 7 years after the resolution of the complaint.
6 months
Recordings may be retained as evidence of a complaint investigation for 7 years after the resolution of the complaint.
If you visit one of our offices:
CCTV - digital images
Visitor book
90 days
3 years
The recipients with whom we share personal information are:
our third party service providers who act on our instruction and need to know the information in order to provide us or you with a product or service;
our third party service providers who act on our instruction and process information on our behalf to help run some of our business operations including email distribution, electronic signature processing, storage of customer documentation, IT services and websites;
our partners including introducers and retailers we work with;
our affiliates, for the purpose of managing our customer relationships, administering our business and to provide you with information about other products and services which might be of interest to you;
our advisors, for the purpose of assisting us to better manage, support or develop our business and comply with our legal and regulatory obligations;
our regulators or other relevant authorities (including the Financial Conduct Authority and Information Commissioner's Office) to comply with our legal and regulatory obligations or for our legitimate interests;
entities who may or do acquire any rights in us for the purpose of a business sale or reorganisation;
credit reference agencies (including TransUnion and Equifax) and fraud prevention agencies - see sections below 'Sharing with credit reference agencies', and 'For crime and fraud prevention and anti-money laundering', 'Statistical analysis' and 'Testing' );
HMRC, who may then pass information on to a relevant overseas tax authority;
law enforcement bodies in order to comply with any legal obligation or court order;
Recipients with whom we share your personal information, for example our service providers, may be located in the UK, other countries in the European Economic Area or elsewhere in the world. Different privacy laws may apply in these countries and you understand and unambiguously agree to the transfer of personal information to these countries and parties.
If we or our service providers transfer your personal information outside of the UK, there is either a legal framework in that country which has been assessed as providing adequate protection for people’s rights and freedoms about their personal information or other appropriate measures are in place, such as we or service providers impose standard data protection obligations to make sure that personal information is sent and received in line with any laws that apply.  More details on the standard contractual obligations and the international frameworks are available on the ICO's
website
, or you can contact our Data Protection Officer on the details below.
We record and monitor communications with us, including electronic communications, video conferencing technology and calls, to improve the quality of our service and for your protection and security.
In order to process the application for a business of which you are shareholder, director, partner, beneficial owner, authorised signatory or other associated person, we will undertake checks on you for the purposes of detecting and preventing crime, fraud, money laundering and sanctions violations, and to verify your identity.  These checks require us to process your personal information with the credit reference agencies and fraud prevention agencies. We may ask you to provide additional information. We continue to conduct regular or extraordinary checks for the same purposes while you have a relationship with us, for example an annual check with credit reference agencies and fraud prevention agencies or for a change in company structure. We will undertake checks for the purpose of detecting and preventing fraud when processing payments, the consequence of these checks may mean that we reject a payment.
Credit reference agencies will supply us with information about you. This will include both public information (including the electoral register) and shared credit, financial situation and financial history information and fraud prevention information. They will add information about our search to the record about you.
If we determine that you pose a fraud, money laundering or sanctions risk, we may refuse to work with you or we may stop providing existing services to you.
A record of any fraud or money laundering risk will be retained by the fraud prevention agencies and may result in others refusing to provide services or financing to you. If you have any questions about this, please contact the fraud prevention agencies on the details below.
We, and fraud prevention agencies, may also enable law enforcement agencies or relevant authorities to access and use your personal information to detect, investigate and prevent crime.
Credit reference agencies hold your personal information for up to six years. These records will be shared with other organisations and may be used and searched by us and them to consider applications for credit and credit related services, such as insurance, for you and any associated person; and to trace debtors, recover debts, prevent or detect money laundering and fraud, and to manage accounts.
Fraud prevention agencies hold your personal information for up to two years, and if you are considered to pose a fraud or money laundering risk, your information is held for up to six years.
We use Equifax, TransUnion and Experian as our credit reference agencies. More information about the credit reference agencies and how they process your personal information is available at:
Equifax website
TransUnion website
Experian website
You can also find information about the credit reference agencies on the ICO's
website
.
The fraud prevention databases we use are provided by CIFAS - The UK's Fraud Prevention Service, Synectics Solutions, TransUnion, Lexis Nexis and Iovation. Further information can be found at:
CIFAS website
Synectics Solutions website
TransUnion website
Lexis Nexis website
GBG website
Iovation website
We use personal information of individuals associated with our commercial clients, partners and suppliers to test our internal systems and those of our third party service providers.
Testing can involve personal information being shared with and obtained from our third-party service providers, credit reference agencies and fraud prevention agencies. Wherever possible, this information is processed on an anonymised basis. The credit reference agencies will not add a record to your credit file of processing conducted for this purpose.
From time to time, we may send you information regarding our products and/or services or those from carefully selected third parties, such as lenders and brokers, that we think may be of interest to you where we have your agreement. You opt to receive this information by letter, telephone, SMS and / or email.
If, at any time, you prefer not to receive further communications from us in any or all forms (except in connection with information, products or services that you specifically request), you will have the ability to unsubscribe from such communications by means of a link provided in every e-mail that is sent to you by us or by contacting us. To unsubscribe from such communications by SMS, reply 'STOP' to the SMS.
From time to time, we may send you a request to take part in a customer survey for feedback or research purposes. this is in order to improve our products, processes and/or service. You may receive this information by letter, telephone, SMS and/or email.
This website contains links to other websites. We accept no responsibility or liability for the content of other websites which are not under our strict control, in particular, we are not responsible for the protection and privacy of any information which you provide whilst visiting other websites and such sites are not governed by this Privacy Statement. Please see section titled 'Access to Website' in our Website Terms and Conditions for further details.
Emails sent via the internet can be subject to interception, loss or possible alteration, therefore we cannot guarantee their security. Although we will do our best to protect your personal information, we cannot guarantee the security of your information sent by email and therefore will have no liability to you for any damages or other costs in relation to emails sent by you to us via the internet.
The Website is not intended for use by individuals under the age of 18 without the agreement and involvement of a parent or guardian. We do not knowingly collect personal information from individuals under the age of 18.
We will keep this Privacy Statement under review and make updates from time to time. We will notify you of any major changes which will affect the processing of your personal data, for example if we change the credit reference agencies we use. We may make minor changes (such as to correct typographical errors, or to add information about other products or services which do not affect your personal information at this time) without notifying you.
Our website uses cookies (including Google Analytics cookies to obtain an overall view of visitor habits and visitor volumes to our Website). To view more information on what cookies we use and how we use them please review our separate
Cookie Policy
.
You have the right to request copies of certain of your personal information within our custody and control and details of how we use that information. Your request can be made verbally or in writing.
If you think any of the personal information we hold about you is inaccurate, you can also request it is corrected or erased.
You also have rights, in certain circumstances:
to object to our processing of your personal information;
to require us to stop processing your personal information; and
to withdraw your agreement to processing based on 'consent'.
In relation to all of these rights, please call us or write to us;
Data Protection Officer
V12 Retail Finance Limited
25-26 Neptune Court
Vanguard Way
Cardiff
CF24 5PJ
Telephone: 029 2046 8900
Email:
customerservices@v12finance.com
Please note that we may request proof of identity when we receive your request.
You also have a right to complain to the
ICO
, which regulates the processing of personal data.
Our aim is to please but we know that sometimes things go wrong. If you have a problem, we want to know. Our staff will be happy to help you either on the telephone or in writing. Should you need to write to us, please address your complaint to The Chief Executive, V12 Retail Finance Limited, 25-26 Neptune Court, Vanguard Way, Cardiff, CF24 5PJ or
complaints@v12finance.com
. You can reach our Customer Services team by telephone by calling 02920 046 8900.
If you are unhappy about how your personal information has been used, please contact our Data Protection Officer using the details set out below. You also have a right to complain to the ICO1, which regulates the processing of personal data.
Our Data Protection Officer can be contacted by telephone or in writing:
Data Protection Officer
V12 Retail Finance Limited
25-26 Neptune Court
Vanguard Way
Cardiff
CF24 5PJ
Telephone: 029 2046 8900
Email:
customerservices@v12finance.com